(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited that Brad has returned to acting?”
“After all he went through over the past year with Angelina and their nasty divorce and custody battle, at least he’s at a place where he’s physically and emotionally ready to get back to the business of being a movie superstar!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how he stormed off the set after fighting with his director on his new film.”
“It’s been so long since we’ve seen Brad Pitt, 53, on the silver screen, being the dreamy movie star that he is.”
“Nearly a year after Angelina Jolie, 42, filed for divorce from him, he’s hard at work filming the sci-fi thriller Ad Astra.”
“But the pain of his personal life is never far from his mind.”
““Brad stormed off set after one of his toughest days yesterday.”
“He has been really stressed out over his divorce with Angelina and yesterday while shooting difficult scenes including stunts, his emotions got the best of him,” a source close to the actor tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Jim Gray, whom he has known for decades got very heated.”
“There was some creative tension, but it wasn’t anything that could have derailed the production in any way.”


"Hollywood stars, are you excited about Brad's return to acting?"
"In the past year, he and Angelina have gone through divorce and custody disputes together, but at least his body and emotion are ready to return to the ranks of movie stars!"
"We had an exclusive report on how he got out of the set after a fight with the director in his new film."
"It's been a long time since we saw Brad Pitt, 53, on the screen as a fantastic movie star."
"Nearly a year after Angelina Jolie, 42, filed for divorce, he's working on a science fiction thriller ad for Astra."
"But the pain of his personal life has never been far away from his heart."
"Brad stormed out of the set after yesterday's toughest day."
A source close to Angelina told reporters: "he and Angelina are really under a lot of pressure after their divorce. Yesterday, when shooting difficult scenes including special effects, his mood prevailed." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Jim gray, he's known him for decades and has become very enthusiastic."
"There's tension in creation, but nothing can destroy it in any way."



**Something goes wrong**
“Ed may be getting a phone call from his bestie sometime soon…””
“...about this although she s never confirmed it Katy is totally the subject of her song Bad Blood and their feud has played out in the public eye since 2014”
“The singer s longtime BFF Ed Sheeran crashed her nemesis Katy Perry s BBC Radio 1 interview on Feb 22 and he had nothing but great things to say about the 32 year old The site goes on to say So of course we have to wonder how Taylor feels...”
“The webloid writes, “Cover your ears, Taylor Swift!”
““Ed Sheeran Gushes Over Taylor Swift’s Nemesis Katy Perry — Breaking Friend Code?” asks the pot-stirrers at HollywoodLife.”
“Gossip Cop can reveal what’s going on.”
“Ed Sheeran did not “break” the “friendship code” with Taylor Swift, despite a ridiculous report about Katy Perry.”


"ED may get a call from his best friend soon..."
“… On this matter, although she has never confirmed that Katie is the theme of her song "bad blood", their grudge has been on the public eye since 2014
"Ed Sheeran, the singer's old friend, ran into her arch rival Katy Perry in an interview with BBC Radio on February 22. He said nothing to the 32 year old except some good words, the website continued. Of course, we have to doubt Taylor's feelings..."
"Cover your ears, Tyler swift!" wrote the online character
"Ed Sheeran talks endlessly about Katie Perry, Tyler Swift's arch enemy - cracking the friend code? "Hollywood Life asked
"Gossip, the police can tell the truth."
Ed Sheeran did not break the "code of friendship" with Taylor Swift, despite an absurd report about Katie Perry



**Something goes wrong**
““New York City wasn’t ever going to be home for Jen.”With reporting by Jen Heger.”
““Jen tried the whole living in New York City thing with Justin, but at heart, she is a California girl,” a source previously told Us.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”The separation was caused in part by distance.”
“Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else’s fictional narrative.”
“...to convey the truth directly...”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship Aniston 49 and Theroux 46 added Normally we would do this privately but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent we wanted...”
““This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
““In an effort to reduce any further speculation, we have decided to announce our separation,” they told Us in a joint statement on Thursday, February 15.”
“He didn’t want to lose her, so they got married.”In the end, things didn’t work out and the couple decided to call it quits after two years of marriage.”
““It was obvious Jen needed more than an engagement or to be life partners with Justin.”


"New York will never be Jan's home." Janhaig reports
"Jen has tried everything to live with Justin in New York, but in fact, she is a California girl," a source told us earlier
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other." To some extent, this separation is caused by distance
"Anything printed about us, not directly from us, is someone else's fiction."
“… Direct the truth... "
"We are two best friends who have decided to break up but are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship Aniston 49 and Cyrus 46 added that normally we do it privately, but given that the gossip industry can't resist an opportunity to guess and invent what we want..."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
"To reduce further speculation, we decided to announce separation," they told us in a joint statement on Thursday, February 15
"He didn't want to lose her, so they got married." in the end, the matter didn't settle, and they decided to break up after two years of marriage. "
"It's clear that Jane needs more than an engagement or a life partner with Justin."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The little girl, named Chicago, was born January 15.”
“Us also broke the news that Kim Kardashian and Kanye West were expecting their third child, a baby girl, via surrogate.”
“The 20-year-old reality star has welcomed her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott on February 1.”
“Jenner, who never confirmed her pregnancy, announced her baby’s arrival in an Instagram post on Sunday, February 4.”
““I’m sorry for keeping you in the dark through all the assumptions,” the new mom wrote.”
““I understand you’re used to me bringing you along on all my journeys.”
“...my pregnancy was one I chose not to do in front of the world.”
“I knew for myself i needed to prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way i knew how.”
“...there was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal i had planned.”
“I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness pregnancy has been the most beautiful empowering and life changing experience I ve had in m entire life and I m actually going to...”


The little girl, named Chicago, was born on January 15
"There is also news in the United States that Kim Kardashian and Kanye West are pregnant through surrogacy. Their third child is a baby girl."
"On February 1, the 20-year-old reality TV star and her boyfriend Travis Scott ushered in her first child."
"Jenna has never confirmed that she is pregnant, and she announced her baby's arrival in an instagram post on Sunday, February 4."
"I'm sorry to let you get caught up in all the assumptions," the new mother wrote
"I know you're used to taking you with me every time I travel."
“… My pregnancy is what I choose not to do in front of the world. "
"I know for myself that I need to prepare for my role in this life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."
“…… I didn't seize the opportunity. I didn't plan to expose it. "
"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and every kind of emotion, so I choose to spend my little life in this way. Our happy pregnancy is the most beautiful empowerment and life changing experience in my life. I really want to..."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Rodriguez, despite his rocky tenure with the team, is now a “special instructor” in pinstripes.)”
“...next day when the pair decamped to noted hotspot George M Steinbrenner Field in noted love nest Tampa Florida to quietly drop in on New York Yankees spring training...”
“That was the state of affairs earlier this year.”
“Sometimes it comes at an inopportune time, like a month before Drake raps about drunk-texting you.”
“Sometimes it shows up when you’re least expecting it, like less than a month after you’ve announced your breakup with Silicon Valley CEO Anne Wojcicki.”
“Love is thorny, friends.”
“We’re about to find out.”
“If Alex Rodriguez had Jennifer Lopez’s love, and she gave him all her trust, would he comfort her?”
“Let’s do what any good gossip cop would do: establish a timeline and subject paparazzi photos to extreme scrutiny.”
“How did we get here?”


"Rodriguez, despite his precarious tenure in the team, is now the" special coach "of pinstripes
“… The next day, when the two went to the famous hot spot, George M. Steinbrenner quietly trained with the New York Yankees in the famous love nest Tampa Florida field in spring
"That was earlier this year."
"Sometimes it's inappropriate, like Drake started nagging you a month ago when he was drunk and texting you."
"Sometimes it comes when you least expect it, such as less than a month after you announced your break-up with Silicon Valley CEO Annie voicic."
"Love is a thorn, friend."
"We're about to know."
"If Alex Rodriguez is loved by Jennifer Lopez and she trusts him completely, will he comfort her?"
"Let's do what any good gossip cop would do: set a schedule for paparazzi photos to be strictly censored."
"How did we get here?"



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now that time has gone by and they’re both single again, it wouldn’t surprise us if they find their way back into each other’s arms.”
“Only time will tell whether or not they rekindle a romance but the two have seemed to stay friendly over the years.”
“After a highly public marriage and split, the former lovebirds are used to being in the spotlight both professionally and personally.”
“...s concern for Jen may be appropriate since there s been reports that Jen and Brad have been talking regularly ever since her split from Justin...”
“Courteney s warning made it clear to Jen that friendly conversation with Brad may be OK but she better not jump back in bed with him just because she is feeling weak or is going through a tough breakup Courteney...”
““Courteney pressured Jen as she issued a stern warning, move forward and find someone new,” the source continued.”
“...go back to something that already ended badly...”
“Through good times and the bad Courteney has helped Jen through relationship issues over the years and she still feels very protective of her friend Now that Jen is single Courteney wants her to get a fresh start and not...”
““Courteney was with Jen through it all with Brad and with Justin too.”
““Courteney immediately reached out to Jennifer urging her to leave Brad in the past after hearing rumors that Jen may be rekindling things with her ex,” a source close to Courteney EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”


"Now that time goes by and they are single again, we won't be surprised if they can come back to each other's arms."
"Only time will tell us if they will rekindle a romance, but the two seem to have been friendly for years."
"After a highly open marriage and breakup, the former couple are used to being the spotlight both professionally and personally."
“…… Her concern for Jen may be appropriate because it has been reported that Jen and Brad have been talking regularly since she broke up with Justin... "
"Courtney's warning clearly tells Jane that a friendly conversation with Brad may be OK, but she'd better not go to bed with him just because she feels weak or is going through a difficult breakup..."
"Courtney put pressure on Jane, she issued a stern warning, went forward and found a new person," the source continued
“… Back to things that have ended badly
"After good times and bad days, Courtney has helped Jane solve her love problems for many years. Now that Jane is still single, she still feels very protective of her friends. Courtney hopes that she will have a new start instead of..."
"Courtney and Jane went through this together, and Brad and Justin were together."
"Courtney immediately contacted Jennifer after hearing the rumor that her ex girlfriend might be back in love with her, urging her to leave Brad in the past," a source close to Courtney told Hollywood life exclusively



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MBK was renamed just before Obama left the White House and seems to have gone quiet as a federal government initiative.”
“MBK offered a way to identify healthy role models at different stages of a young man’s life without being overly exclusive in defining who and what a man can be.”
“He had no examples from his past or his presentI have no interest in blaming Jay-Z – or any other man – for playing a role in my life he didn’t ask for.”
“My father didn’t know how to be a husband to my mom or a dad to me.”
“Delayed gratification, which is vital to living life with long-term benefits in mind, was a foreign concept.”
“Studying seemed boring when compared with the gangster fairytales we shared.”
“My friends and I wanted to use drugs and thought selling them was cool; we got into fights, skipped classes and in some cases dropped out altogether.”
“I tried my best to emulate him and other rappers.”
“His tough-guy bravado, glorification of crime, flashy jewelry and videos full of dancing women captivated me.”
“Jay-Z was one of them: the pre-Beyoncé Jay-Z of the late 1990s and early 2000s, big pimpin’ and trading disses with fellow New York rapper Nas.”


"Just before Obama left the White House, MBK was renamed as an initiative of the federal government, which seems to have been silent."
"MBK provides a way to identify healthy role models at different stages of young people's lives without having to define too exclusively who and what a man can be."
"He has no past or present examples, and I'm not interested in blaming Jez or anyone else because he plays a role in my life that he doesn't ask for."
"My father didn't know how to be my mother's husband or my father."
"Delay in gratification is an unfamiliar concept that is essential to a life with long-term benefits in mind."
"Compared with the gangster fairy tales we shared, learning seems boring."
"My friends and I both want to take drugs and think it's cool to sell drugs; we fight, skip classes and sometimes drop out of school together."
"I try to imitate him and other rappers."
"I was fascinated by his tough bravado, his praise of crime, his gorgeous jewelry and his videos full of dancers."
"Jay-Z is one of them: before Beyonce in the late 1990s and early 21st century, Jay-Z boasted and traded with his colleagues in New York rap singer NAS."



**Something goes wrong**
“Lies Shailene Woodley Big Little Lies...”
“Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Tom Hanks The Post Gary Oldman The Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq...”
“(It will also be live-streamed online for the first time.)”
“The annual event, which honors performances in both television and film, is considered one of Hollywood’s most “fun” awards shows due to how early the awards fall in the season, the presence of alcohol (resulting in more celebrities letting loose), and general unpredictability about the winners.”
“In other words, they’re usually a pretty good time, as far as three-hour awards shows go.”
“But this year’s event might take on a more somber tone, due to the recent wave of revelations regarding sexual harassment in the entertainment industry, and the rise of the #MeToo movement.”
“Many actors and actresses have promised to wear black to raise awareness of the movement and protest sexual harassment in Hollywood.”
“And the marketing for the ceremony has implied that it will offer a platform for speaking out one promo even features Meyers declaring Hollywood we ve got a lot to talk about When it comes to the awards themselves the film frontrunner appears to be The Shape of Water Guillermo...”
“...del Toro s grown up fairy tale about a mute woman and a fish man which leads the nominations with seven...”
“Steven Spielberg’s The Post and Martin McDonagh’s Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri follow, with six nominations each.”


"Big lie, little lie"
"Call me Daniel Day Lewis mirage thread Tom Hanks the darkest moment of old Gary Denzel Washington Rome J Israel Esq..."
"(it will also be broadcast live online for the first time.)
The annual awards ceremony, which honors performances on television and in movies, is considered one of Hollywood's most "interesting" awards ceremonies because the awards ceremony is held ahead of time this season, the presence of alcohol (which leads to more celebrity laissez faire), and the general unpredictability of the winners
"In other words, they usually have a pretty good time, just three hours to go to the awards ceremony."
"But this year's event is likely to take a more somber tone, thanks to the recent wave of revelations about sexual harassment in the entertainment industry and the rise of the" Mayo movement. "
"Many actors and actresses promised to wear black to raise awareness of the movement and protest against sexual harassment in Hollywood."
"The marketing of the award ceremony means that it will provide us with a platform to speak out a promotional film. Even Meyers claimed that Hollywood has a lot to talk about. When it comes to the award itself, the leader of the film seems to be the shape of shuiguillermo..."
“…… Deltoro's growing up fairy tale tells the story of a dumb woman and a fishman, who lead by seven nominations... "
Steven Spielberg's "post" and Martin MacDonald's three billboards outside of Missouri's "ebb" followed, with six nominations each



**Something goes wrong**
“(Like Brooke Shields and Glenn Close!)”
“Not only are the couple each great-great-grandchildren of Queen Victoria, making them third cousins, they also share an ancestor in Christian IX of Denmark, who was Phillip’s great-grandfather and Elizabeth’s great-great-grandfather, thus making them second cousins once removed.”
“As a 2000 New York Observer profile observed, when asked about Gwyneth, “a wary look crossed Ms. Moennig’s eyes and her facial muscles seemed to freeze up.”Later, she revealed a certain gratefulness for their lack of resemblance: “We’re totally different people.”
“Gwyneth Paltrow and Katherine MoennigEven before she came to fame on The L Word, actress Katherine Moennig was haunted by questions about her blonder, goopier cousin.”
“Other Coppola cousins in the entertainment industry include Sofia’s older brother Roman, who co-wrote The Darjeeling Limited and Moonrise Kingdom, and Jason’s younger brother Robert, lead singer of the band Rooney.”
“...his favorite superheroes and became the Internet s One True God...”
“Decades later the second generation of Coppola cousins has gotten mixed up in the family business Frances s daughter Sofia and Talia s son Jason have each followed in their parents footsteps while their cousin Nicolas son of the comparatively unknown August Coppola took a new name from one of...”
“Sofia Coppola, Jason Schwartzman and Nicolas CageComposer Carmine Coppola unwittingly spawned a Hollywood dynasty: His son Francis became the famed director of The Godfather and Apocalypse Now, while his daughter Talia Shire starred as Adrian in the Rocky movies.”
“Mapother has acted in five films with Cruise – Born on the Fourth of July, Magnolia, Mission: Impossible II, Vanilla Sky and Minority Report – but to us, he’ll always be Ethan, the duplicitous member of the Others from Lost.”
“(Look at their chins!)”


"(like Brooke Shields and Glenn cross!)"
The couple are not only the great grandchildren of Queen Victoria, but also the great grandparents of Philip and Elizabeth in Denmark. Once they are removed, they become the second representative
"As the New York Observer reported in 2000, when asked to pass Winnie," there was a cautious look in Monin's eyes, and her facial muscles seemed stiff. " Later, she expressed some gratitude for their lack of similarity: "we are totally different people."
"Gwyneth Paltrow and Katherine monigwen before she became famous for the L word, actress Katherine monigwen was always troubled by questions about her blonde, dumber cousin."
Coppola's other cousins in the entertainment industry include Sophia's brother Roman, co-author of Darjeeling limited and moonrise Kingdom, and Jason's brother Robert, the lead singer of Rooney
“… His favorite superhero, and become a real God of the Internet... "
"A few decades later, Coppola's second representatives were involved in the family business. Francis's daughter Sophia and Talia's son Jason followed their parents' footsteps, while their cousin Nicholas was the son of Auguste Coppola, whose name came from..."
"Sofia Coppola, Jason Schwarzman and Camin Coppola, the composer of Nicholas Cage, inadvertently gave birth to a Hollywood Dynasty: his son Francis became the famous director of Godfather and apocalypse, while his daughter Talia shire played Adrian in rocky."
"Mapother and cruise have starred in five films -" born on July 4 "," Magnolia "," mission: impossible 2 "," vanilla sky "and" minority report "- but for us, he will always be Ethan, a member of the mouth and heart of others in" lost. "
"Look at their chins!"



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, which celebrity do you think Caitlyn should date?”
“Believe it or not, this actually isn’t the first supposed date Caitlyn’s been on with this lady, according to the publication.”
“Caitlyn Jenner was spotted leaving hotspot restaurant Craig’s with a much younger light-haired lady, who a recent report claims is the reality star’s new girlfriend.”
“Is Caitlyn Jenner, 67, dating again?!”
“The former KUWTK reality star was spotted out in Los Angeles with a young blonde lady on the night of June 22.”
“The mystery woman, who appears to be at least 20 years younger than Caitlyn, is believed to be her new girlfriend, according to MTO News.”
“The pair enjoyed a nice dinner together at West Hollywood hotspot restaurant Craig’s, a popular watering hole for photographers and reporters — so it kinda’ seems like Caitlyn wanted to be seen in public with this blondie.”
“The former Olympian sat in the driver’s seat with her rumored GF by her side as she drove off.”
“They reportedly were seen out together last month in Malibu right around Mother’s Day.”
“Regardless of who Caitlyn is dating, we’re just happy that she’s comfortable in her skin!”


"Hollywood, which celebrity do you think Caitlin should date?"
"Believe it or not, this is not actually Caitlin's first date with this lady."
"Caitlin Jenner was found leaving Craig's, a hot restaurant, with a much younger woman with shallow hair who, according to a recent report, is the new girlfriend of a reality TV star."
"Is 67 year old Caitlin Jenner dating again?"
"On the night of June 22, the former Kurt reality star was found in Los Angeles with a blonde."
According to MTO news, the mystery woman appears to be at least 20 years younger than Caitlin and is believed to be her new girlfriend
"They had a big dinner at Craig's, a popular restaurant in West Hollywood. Craig's is a popular place for photographers and journalists, so Caitlin seems to want to appear in public with the blonde."
"The former Olympian drove away in the driver's seat with her rumored girlfriend by her side."
"It's reported that they went out together in Malibu just before and after mother's day last month."
"No matter who Caitlin goes out with, we're glad she's comfortable!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
“… Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



**Something goes wrong**
“Kristen Stewart is romantically involved with Stella Maxwell but her representatives have yet to confirm the claims of the news suggesting a near marriage.”
“The recently uploaded picture on Stella's Instagram shows that the couple is happy with their relationship and it seems like the actress' mother has no objection with the ongoing affair.”
“After the actress’ intimate photos with her "Snowwhite and The Huntsman" movie director Rupert Sanders were leaked online, her live-in boyfriend Pattinson decided to part his ways.”
“Ever since then, the movie actress has been linked with other girls from tinsel town but there are reports that suggest that her latest affair with Victoria Secret Model Stella Maxwell is getting more serious with each passing day.”
“Earlier today, the model uploaded a picture of herself snuggling a cute dog and it shows how serious their relationship is despite all the rumors and speculations.”
“Kristen Stewart Lesbian Romance SpreeThe “American Ultra” movie actress amazed everyone when she came out as a lesbian.”
“Her fans were baffled as they were hoping that sooner or later Robert would forgive her and they both would get back together.”
“However, after some leaked images it was confirmed to the fans that Kristen was romantically involved with her personal assistant Alicia Cargile.”
“However, the affair with Cargile did not last long as OK!”
“...magazine recently reported that Kristen and Miley Cyrus ex-girlfriend Stella have decided to move in together at the actress’ four-bedroom apartment in L.A.”


"Kristen Stewart has a romantic relationship with Stella Maxwell, but her agent has yet to confirm the hint that she is about to get married."
"Photos recently uploaded to Stella instagram show that the couple are very happy with their relationship, and it seems that the actress's mother has no objection to the ongoing relationship."
Pattinson, the actress's cohabitant boyfriend, decided to split up after intimate photos of the actress and Rupert Sanders, director of snow white and the hunter, were leaked online
"Since then, the film actress has been associated with other girls from Kingstown, but it has been reported that her relationship with Victoria's Secret model Stella Maxwell has been growing
"Earlier today, the model posted a picture of herself cuddling up with a cute dog, which shows how serious their relationship is despite all kinds of rumors and speculation."
"Christine Stewart lesbian romantic Carnival" this "American Superman" movie actress made everyone Marvel when she acted as a lesbian
"Her fans are confused because they hope Robert will forgive her sooner or later and they will get back together."
"However, after some leaked photos, it was confirmed to fans that Christine and her personal assistant Alicia Cargill had an affair."
"But the relationship with Cargill didn't last long!"
“…… The magazine recently reported that Christine and Millie Cyrus's ex girlfriend Stella decided to move into the actress's four bedroom apartment in Los Angeles



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Ideally she d like a splashy white wedding but with nobody in her corner it ll more likely be a straight elopement instead Meanwhile the KarJenners refuse to be anywhere near Thompson after he was caught on camera making out with other women just days before Khloe gave birth to...”
“Inside Khloe's Secret Plans To Elope With Cheating Tristan Kardashian family will not support the nuptials & refuse to attend, says source.”
“RadarOnline.com learned exclusively Khloe Kardashian is rushing down the aisle in a quickie wedding to Tristan Thompson, but her famous family refuses to take part in any of it!”
“Sources revealed the new mother, 33, is “desperate” to tie the knot with her baby daddy, 27, but her family have made it plain they won’t be attending the ceremony “under any circumstances.”Her famous family was not in support of Khloe’s plans for a quickie nuptials.”
““They detest this guy with a passion and cannot believe Khloe’s let him walk all over her like this.”Khloe is said to be in denial over the NBA star’s cheating scandal.”
““Even after their intervention to Ohio, she’s defending him and refusing to believe the cheating stories which she insists were exaggerated,” snitched the informant.”
““He has a real grip over her and it speaks volumes that Khloe’s desperate to get hitched this summer.”The reality star is even willing to give up on her dreams of a big wedding.”
“...their baby daughter True...”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Ideally, she would like to have a gorgeous white wedding, but no one in her corner, which would be more likely to be a direct elopement than at the same time, kajenna refused to approach Thompson after he was photographed making out with other women a few days ago, Chloe gave birth to..."
"Inside Chloe's secret plan to elope with the cheating Tristan Kardashian, Kardashian's family will not support the wedding & refuse to attend," the source said
“ RadarOnline.com Website Kardashian is having a quick wedding with Tristan Thompson, but her family refuses to attend
The 33 year old new mother "can't wait" to marry her 27 year old father, but her family has made it clear they won't attend the wedding "under any circumstances," sources said. "Her family doesn't support Khloe's quick wedding plan."
"They hate this guy so much that they can't believe Chloe would let him bully her like this." Colo is said to have denied the NBA star's cheating scandal
"Even after they got involved in Ohio, she was defending him, refusing to believe the deceptive stories she insisted were exaggerated," the informant said
"He has a lot of control over her, which fully demonstrates Khloe's desire to get married this summer." The reality TV star is even willing to give up her dream of holding a grand wedding
“… Their baby daughter really... "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I feel sometimes that my body has taken a hit, but I try to laugh as much as possible.”
“So my health is something I have to monitor,' she relayed.”
“...been working on the script and this is going to be a really strong sequel Angelina and Brad separated in September 2016 and Angelina took a year off from acting to concentrate on her personal situation and to take care of her kids she told THR com during the festival...”
“Happy days Angelina pictured with daughter Vivienne at the Telluride Film Festival this past weekend has been separated from husband Brad for a year and has primary custody of the kids Back to wicked The actress said of returning to the Disney role she first played in 2014 We have...”
“'We have been working on the script and this is going to be a really strong sequel,' she said.”
“The actress confirmed she will star in a follow-up to Disney's Maleficent released in 2014.”
“The industry site caught up with Angelina at the Telluride Film Festival over the weekend where she was showing her directorial debut and passion project First They Killed My Father.”
“'I am now the breadwinner for the family so it’s time,' the mother-of-six laughed as she spoke about returning to acting after a hiatus.”
“She joked to Deadline.com that since splitting from Brad, it's up to her to step up.”
“Earlier this week, Angelina revealed she is going back in front of the camera because she needs to provide for her children.”


"Sometimes I feel like my body is hit, but I try to laugh."
"So my health is something I have to monitor," she says
“… Angelina and Brad separated in September 2016. Angelina took a year off from acting to focus on her personal situation and take care of her children. She told thr.com during the film festival... "
"Angelina and her daughter Vivian took a group photo at the telluride film festival last weekend. Happy time has been separated from her husband Brad for a year. The main custody of the child belongs to the villain. The actress said that she will return to her first Disney role in 2014. We have... "
"We've been writing scripts and it's going to be a great sequel," she said
"The actress confirmed that she will play in the sequel to the 2014 Disney film prank."
"The industry website caught up with Angelina at the weekend's telluride film festival, where she showed her directorial debut and passion project, killing my father for the first time."
"I'm the breadwinner of the family now, so it's time," the mother of six said with a smile, talking about her return to acting after a break
”She joked Deadline.com Since breaking up with Brad, the website has asked her to stand up. "
"Earlier this week, Angelina revealed that she was going back to the camera because she needed to support her children."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementJennifer Aniston has yet to publicly comment on the rumors surrounding Justin Theroux’s very active dating life.”
“She also is involved in multiple philanthropic efforts, including supporting AmeriCares and donating to last year’s hurricane victims.”
“Specifically, Theroux has turned to pal Emma Stone quite a bit recently.”
“Cameras have spotted the two grabbing a bite to eat in New York and vacationing together late last month in France.”
“Now, according to Life & Style, the 46-year-old actor is planning to move in with Stone – who lives in Bel Air, not far from Aniston – even though New York is his home.”
““Jen’s worst nightmare is about to come true,” says an insider.”
““He’s told friends he’s moving to LA for a while, and it looks like he’ll be staying at Emma’s house.”
“It’s the ultimate girl-code betrayal.”
“Poor Jen just can t seem to catch a break The source goes on to reveal that things are heating up between Theroux and Stone and they could become Hollywood s next power couple And for Aniston this could end up being similar to an experience she after her last...”
“...divorce avoiding her ex and his new woman on the red carpet and at Hollywood events like she did with her first husband Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie...”


"Jennifer Aniston hasn't commented publicly on the rumors about Justin serrux's very active dating life."
"She also participated in a number of charitable activities, including supporting AmeriCares and donating to last year's hurricane victims."
"To be specific, seru has recently turned a little bit to her friend Emma stone."
"The camera caught two people eating in New York and spending a holiday together in France at the end of last month."
"Now, according to life and fashion magazine, the 46 year old actor is planning to move in with stone to live in Bel Air, not far from Aniston, even though New York is his home."
"Jane's worst nightmare is about to come true," one person familiar with the matter said
"He told his friends that he was moving to Los Angeles for a while. It looks like he's going to live with Emma."
"It's the ultimate betrayal of a girl."
"Poor Jen can't seem to rest. Sources continue to reveal that the relationship between Cyrus and stone is heating up, and they may become the next strong couple in Hollywood. For Aniston, it may be similar to her last experience... "
“… Avoid divorcing your ex boyfriend and new girlfriend on the red carpet and in Hollywood activities, just like she did with her first husbands Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie... "



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementGwen Stefani told Ryan Seacrest in an interview in early December, that since she had the kids this Christmas, she and Blake Shelton were going to split their time between Oklahoma and Los Angeles.”
“Back indoors, they continued their holiday festivities by goofing off in pajamas in front of the Christmas tree.”
“The mother-of-three began to panic about Shelton’s possible infidelity, and it resulted in a huge fight, with Stefani ultimately deciding the two shouldn’t tie the knot.”
“Could there be any truth to the story?”
“Life & Style is claiming that Stefani was not happy with how close Shelton had become with Chloe Kohanski, his 24-year-old team member on The Voice.”
“Their student-teacher relationship unnerved the No Doubt singer, and after Kohanski won the show, Stefani decided to confront Shelton – and that’s when the fight and wedding cancellation happened.”
“It makes sense that Stefani would be insecure about cheating since her 13-year marriage to Gavin Rossdale ended when he had an affair with their nanny.”
“It seems unlikely that Shelton would cheat, but just the thoughts of infidelity are enough for Stefani to call off their planned nuptials.”
“Sources claim the couple is still together and they will get married someday, but right now the couple is working on their issues.”
“The last thing either of them wants is another divorce.”


In an interview with Ryan Seacrest in early December last year, Gwen Stephanie said that she and Blake Sheldon planned to separate in Oklahoma and Los Angeles because she had children this Christmas
Back indoors, they strolled in front of the Christmas tree in their pajamas to continue their holiday celebrations
"The mother of three began to panic about Sheldon's possible infidelity, which led to a huge quarrel, and Stefani finally decided that they should not get married."
"Is there any truth in this story?"
Life and fashion magazine claimed that Stephanie was not satisfied with Sheldon's intimate relationship with Chloe kohanski, a 24-year-old member of his team on voice
"Their teacher-student relationship upset the unquestionable singer, and after kohanski won the show, Stefani decided to confront Sheldon - just then, the quarrel and the wedding were cancelled."
"Stefani has a sense of insecurity about cheating because her 13 year marriage to Gavin Rossdale ended when he had an affair with their nanny."
"Sheldon seems unlikely to cheat, but the thought of infidelity is enough to get Stefani to cancel their planned wedding."
"It is said that the couple are still together and they will get married one day, but now the couple are solving their problems."
"Neither of them wants another divorce."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tesla shares have dropped about 20 percent to $305 a share since Musk tweeted about going private.”
“Musk announced last Friday, after talking to shareholders, to keep Tesla a publicly traded company.”
“Musk is under the regulatory microscope after bringing Wall Street to a halt earlier this summer, tweeting he had “funding secured” to take Tesla private.”
“Even without a potential civil suit on his hands, it’s already been a controversial month for 47-year-old entrepreneur.”
“A representative for Musk did not immediately respond to TheWrap’s request for comment.”
““You did so without any basis.”Wood added that he’s prepping a civil libel complaint against Musk.”
“...so at a time when he was working to save the lives of twelve Thai children Wood said in his letter dated August 6 to Musk...”
“Musk later apologized for his comment saying it was spoken in anger Also Read Elon Musk Says He Won t Take Tesla Private After All You published three different tweets to your twenty two million followers that Mr Unsworth engages in the sexual exploitation of Thai children and you did...”
“Musk s attempts to help the Thai soccer team trapped in a cave as a PR stunt a pedo guy in July...”
“Also Read Elon Musk Needled for Tearful NY Times Interview About Having to Work Through His Birthday Attorney L Lin Wood who is representing diver Vernon Unsworth replied to the thread on Wednesday saying that Musk should check his mail before tweeting Musk originally called Unsworth a diver that criticized...”


"Since musk announced his privatization on twitter, Tesla's share price has fallen about 20% to $305 a share."
Musk announced on Friday that it would keep Tesla as a public company after discussions with shareholders
"Musk brought Wall Street to a standstill earlier this summer, tweeted that he had" got the money "to privatize Tesla and is now under the microscope of regulation."
"Even without a possible civil lawsuit, it's already a month of controversy for a 47 year old entrepreneur."
"A representative of musk did not immediately respond to the wrap's request for comment."
"There is no basis for you to do so." Wood added that he was prepared to file a civil libel suit against musk
“…… So in his efforts to save the lives of 12 Thai children, wood said in a letter to musk on August 6... "
"Musk later apologized for his comments. He said this in anger. He also read that Elon Musk said that he would not take Tesla private. After all, you sent three different tweets to your 22 million followers saying that Mr. wunsworth was involved in the sexual exploitation of Thai children, but you did..."
"Musk tried to help the Thai football team get trapped in a cave as a PR stunt for a pedo in July..."
"I also read that Elon Musk was in tears in an interview with the New York Times, talking about that he had to work on his birthday, and that he had to work on behalf of the diver Vernon ensworth's lawyer, l Lin Wood) replied to the New York Times on Wednesday that musk should check his email before tweeting. Musk initially called ensworth a diver and criticized... "



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...cover...”
“Once Suri was born the paparazzi struggled to get a shot of the baby but it was Vanity Fair that scored the first official photo of Suri selling 70 000 copies of the issue that had the pic on its...”
“Among the stories was that Tom allegedly bought an expensive sonogram machine so he and Holmes could track Suri's development.”
“The press had been aware of Suri's upcoming arrival for months with headlines about Katie's pregnancy and relationship with Tom on the covers of many gossip magazines.”
“They named their daughter Suri, which Tom believed meant "red rose" in Persian and "princess" in Hebrew, but some linguists say it actually means "from Syria" in Hebrew.”
“On April 18, 2006, Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes gave birth to a little girl at a Santa Monica, California hospital.”


“… Cover... "
"After Suri was born, it was very difficult for the paparazzi to take pictures of her child, but it was vanity fair that took her first official picture, in which Suri sold 70000 pictures..."
"Tom is said to have bought an expensive ultrasound so that he and Holmes can track Suri's progress."
"The media knew a few months ago that Suri was coming, and there were headlines on the covers of many gossip magazines about Katie's pregnancy and her relationship with Tom."
They named their daughter Suri. Tom thought she meant "red rose" in Persian and "Princess" in Hebrew, but some linguists said that she actually meant "from Syria" in Hebrew
On April 18, 2006, Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes gave birth to a little girl at a hospital in Santa Monica, California



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Emma Stone has responded to the teen who asked her to prom with a La La Land-inspired videoMORE : Ryan Gosling and La La Land director Damien Chazelle’s Neil Armstrong biopic has a new release date...”
“Suddenly, their dancing turns from being nice enough, to amazingly poised.’AdvertisementAdvertisementLa La Land is out on DVD next month.”
“(Picture: Black Label Media/REX)Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling used body doubles for La La Land’s most complex dance scene, a shocking new report has claimed.”
“Storm Darcy to bring coldest night in 10 years as temperatures drop to 18C The sensational report throws the film s integrity into question given that it was widely reported how the two stars of the film underwent intense dance training for their roles of which Emma won an Oscar...”
“...for...”
“But according to a film insider, the iconic Griffith Observatory scene, which is thought of as the film’s most intricate dance sequence in which Emma and Ryan fly through the observatory, apparently looked so good because it was crafted by professional dancers and not Emma and Ryan.”
“Is that Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling dancing… or body doubles?”
“(Picture: Lionsgate)A stunt double allegedly used in the film has told The Sun how Ryan had two doubles for his dance scenes, whilst Emma’s moves were performed for her by pro-dancer Emilie Livingston, who is the dancer wife of Jeff Goldblum.”
“‘Ryan had three stunt doubles — two were dancers — and Emma’s dancing was done by Emilie Livingston,’ the inside tole The Sun On Sunday.”
“Advertisement Advertisement The sequence where they danced in the clouds was filmed on a platform and was not Ryan and Emma Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling filmed a magical scene in the Griffith Observatory for La La Land Picture Lionsgate Claiming film makers had tried silencing the dancers on the...”


"More: Emma stone responded to the young people who invited her to the prom and offered a video inspired by land of Los Angeles. More: Ryan Gosling and Damien chazel's Neil Armstrong biography have a new release date..."
"All of a sudden, their dancing changed from good enough to surprisingly calm. "Advertising for the earth" will be on DVD next month
(photo source: black label media / Rex) Emma stone and Ryan Gosling used human doubles in the most complex dance scenes in Los Angeles, according to a shocking new report
"The sensational report that storm Darcy brought the coldest night in 10 years to 18 degrees Celsius called into question the integrity of the film, because it was widely reported that the two stars of the film had conducted high-intensity dance training for their characters, in which Emma won an Academy Award..."
“… For... "
"But according to a person in the film industry, the iconic Griffith Observatory scene, which is considered to be the most complex dance sequence of Emma and Ryan flying over the observatory in the film, obviously looks good, because it is elaborately created by professional dancers rather than Emma and Ryan."
"That's Emma stone and Ryan Gosling dancing Or a double? "
(photo: Lion Gate) the stunt stunt stunt stand in the film is said to have told the sun that there are two stand ins in Ryan's dance scene, while Emma's steps are performed by professional dancer Emily Livingston, the wife of Jeff Goldbloom's dancer
"Ryan has three stunt doubles - two dancers - and Emma's dance was done by Emily Livingston," the Sun reported on Sunday
"The scene where they danced in the cloud was shot on a platform, not Ryan. Emma stone and Ryan Gosling shot a magical scene for lion gate at Griffith Observatory, claiming that the filmmakers tried to calm the dancers on the stage..."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She doesn’t need her family’s approval and will keep doing her thing.””
“While she and Thompson have yet to publicly address the allegations that he cheated on her throughout her pregnancy, a source tells PEOPLE that the new parents are working through the scandal.”
“Thompson don t have a lot of time to themselves so grabbing a bite to eat can t always be a sit down affair...”
“One day after returning to L.A. for the first time since Thompson’s cheating scandal, the couple was spotted in a Rolls Royce making a quick dash through a McDonald’s drive-thru in Woodland Hills, California, Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian noshed down on some fries, breaking from her usual order of an Artisan Grilled Chicken Sandwich.”
“Such a fan of the fast food restaurant is the new mom that a McDonald’s hash brown is the first thing the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star ate after giving birth to daughter True in April.”
“Kardashian, 33, looked content as she snacked away in the passenger seat, while Thompson, 27, took the wheel.”
“Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and Tristan Thompson | Credit: Clint Brewer/Splash“Khloé and Tristan seem to be in the best place they’ve been since the scandal,” the source says.”
““She still thinks she’s making the best choice for her and True.”


"She doesn't need the approval of her family. She will continue to do her own business."
"Although she and Thompson have yet to publicly respond to the charges that he cheated her during her pregnancy, a source told people that the new parents are trying to resolve the scandal."
"Thompson doesn't have much time to be alone, so he can't always sit down to eat..."
"The couple returned to Los Angeles for the first time since Thompson's fraud scandal, and one day later, on Tuesday, they were found driving Rolls Royce into a McDonald's straight through in woodland hill, California."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Kardashian ate some French fries and broke her usual hand-made grilled chicken sandwich
"New mothers are fans of fast food restaurants. After giving birth to their daughter Zhen in April, the first thing they eat is McDonald's potato cakes."
Kardashian, 33, walks leisurely in the co pilot's seat, while Thompson, 27, looks content in the steering wheel
"Picture zoom Kardashian and Tristan Thompson | credit: Clint brewer / splash" Kardashian and Tristan seem to be in the best place they've been in the scandal, the source said
"She still thinks she's making the best choice for herself, and it's true."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for Kardashian’s protective family members, an insider told PEOPLE they “respect her decision.””
“...the summer in L A with their newborn daughter who was born just two days after allegations surfaced that Thompson cheated on Kardashian throughout her pregnancy and will return to Cleveland when Thompson s basketball season starts up again...”
“No one was anticipating he was going to come out with her and that they would be so public last night RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Slams Claims She s on a Ridiculous Post Baby Diet After Showing Off Weight Loss Sources have also told PEOPLE that the couple will spend...”
“The focus is on their newborn daughter,” the source shared, adding, “Tristan’s been supportive and helping out when he can.”
“Since the couple’s return to L.A., a source told PEOPLE that they “seem to be in the best place they’ve been since the scandal.”“Khloé’s super family-focused and wants to keep her family together.”
“She did cover her left hand in an Instagram photo she shared Tuesday.”
“For her big night out, “True’s mom” wore a tight black top, camo jacket and her hair in a sleek half-up hairstyle with textured waves.”
“It remains unclear if Kardashian’s new bling is in fact an engagement ring, or maybe even an early present from Thompson leading up to her 34th birthday on Wednesday.”
“I ll have the most energy these days She also said she d rather stay home with her daughter...”
“Khloé looked great a source tells PEOPLE She wore a huge new ring Kardashian was quick to clap back at reports that she and Tristan were not getting along writing on Twitter that as a new mom she s tired AF and being out past 10 pm is not where...”


As for Kardashian's protective family, a person familiar with the matter told people that they "respect her decision."
“…… In the summer of Los Angeles, their newborn daughter was born two days after the accusation of cheating Kardashian during Thompson's pregnancy surfaced. When Thompson's basketball season starts again, she will return to Cleveland... "
"No one expected that he would come out with her. They were so public last night. Khlo é Kardashian criticized that she was on a ridiculous postpartum diet after showing off weight loss. The source also told people that the couple would spend..."
"The focus is on their newborn daughter," the source said. "Tristan has been supporting and helping when he can."
"Since the couple returned to Los Angeles, a source told people that they" seem to be in the best place since the scandal. " "Heroe's super family is focused and wants to reunite her family."
"In the instagram photo she shared on Tuesday, she did cover her left hand."
"When sleeping out on the street, real mom wore a black tights, a camouflage jacket, and her hair was combed into a smooth half curl, with textured waves on it."
"It's not clear whether Kardashian's new jewelry is really an engagement ring or even an early gift from Thompson before her 34th birthday on Wednesday."
"I'm full of energy these days. She also said that she would rather stay at home with her daughter..."
"Khlo é looks great. A source told people that she was wearing a huge new ring. Kardashian soon applauded the report that she and Tristan didn't get along well. She wrote on twitter that as a new mother, she was tired and going out at 10 p.m. was not a place..."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The newlyweds of three months are pictured in a tight embrace, both leaning toward each other.”
“Getty Images2015: When they got married.”
“We know this because other clues override the separation: the smile on Jen's face, the way their fingers are interlocked, and the placement of their feet.”
“And despite the space between them—which is a huge indicator of distance in a relationship—Wood says the relationship was in a good place; the pull away must have been due to movement here.”
“Wood describes it as "real pleasure," which makes a lot of sense considering the photo was taken just months before Brad and Jen's wedding.”
“Notice Jens's smile in this photo.”
“Getty Images2000: When they got married.”
“This means that his facial expressions are more subtle; he tends to smile less in photos or save his smiles for more intimate, private moments.”
“One thing to keep in mind about Brad is that he is a "C personality type," according to Wood.”
“"It says, 'When we're out together, I'm going to always do this...I never want to be more than an arms length away.'"”


"The three-month-old newlyweds are hugging each other in the picture, both of them nestling up to each other."
"Getty images2015: when they got married."
"We know this because other clues mask the separation: the smile on Jane's face, the way their fingers cross, and the position of their feet."
"Although the distance between them is a huge indicator of the distance in a relationship, wood said the relationship is in a good place; pulling away must be due to the movement here."
Wood described it as "real happiness," which makes sense considering that the photo was taken a few months before Brad and Jan's wedding
"Notice Jans' smile in this picture."
"Getty images2000: when they got married."
"It means that his facial expression is more subtle; he tends to smile less in the picture, or leave it for more intimate and private moments."
"One thing Brad has to remember is that he's a type C character," Wood said
"It says," when we go out together, I'll do it all the time I never want to be more than one arm away. "



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you squint, you might be able to make out a shape of some sort.”
“Meanwhile, Kylie shares this photo of herself wearing an oversize shirt with her friends on Snapchat.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“(Travis is the one hiding behind his own hands.)”
“GettyMay 4, 2017A blonde Kylie sort of makes things Instagram official in this group photo taken during the 2017 Met Gala.”
“Innnteresting….”
“Hours after E!’s report, Kylie is spotted at Cipriani in New York City for Travis’s 25th birthday party.”
“According to one source, “they looked really into each other” and were spotted dancing and making out.”
“News reports that Kylie and Travis spent the weekend together in Boston, where he was scheduled to perform two shows.”


"If you squint, you may be able to recognize a shape."
"At the same time, Kelly shared this photo of herself in a oversized shirt with her friends on snapchat."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Travis is the man behind his own hand."
"Gettymay 42017a the blonde Kelly made instagram official in this group photo taken during the 2017 metropolitan Festival."
"Interesting..."
"In a few hours! Kelly was found attending Travis's 25th birthday party in Cipriani, New York City, the report said
"According to one source," they really looked at each other "and were found dancing and making out."
"According to the news report, Kelly and Travis are spending the weekend in Boston, where he is scheduled to perform two shows."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on Heidi's antics?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID“All she talks about is working out and what she’s eaten that day – which is usually not much more than a handful of nuts and steamed kale.” That doesn’t sound like fun.”
“...and pizza...”
“She even pretends to eat junk food when the cameras are on her but she hasn t actually swallowed a bite of a burger in years Source BACKGRID Just last month she and her boyfriend spent time in Italy so we really have no idea how she avoided the pasta...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAdds the insider, “What also really annoys people is how Heidi fakes being normal.”
“But her loved one are over her ramming her perfection down their throats.”
“Source: BACKGRIDHeidi, 44, looks like a fountain of youth but it obviously takes more of an effort than we knew.”
“...exclusively, “Heidi has nothing to talk about except her workout routine, how she avoids carbs, the tricks her private chef or personal trainer are implementing…it’s so tedious for everyone in her life, including Vito Schnabel and a big reason why he needs a break so often.” Ouch.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDA source tells OK!”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
Background: what do you think of Heidi's antics? "
The article goes on to the following ad source: backgrid: "all she said was exercise and what she ate that day - usually just a handful of nuts and steamed collards." It doesn't sound like fun
“… And pizza... "
"She even pretended to eat junk food when the camera was on her, but she didn't actually swallow a hamburger. Just last month, she and her boyfriend spent some time in Italy, so we really don't know how she avoided spaghetti..."
The article continues with the following ad source: backgrid insiders add, "what's really annoying is how Heidi pretends to be normal."
"But the people she loves despise her and keep her perfection in their throats."
"Source: 44 year old backgrid Heidi looks like a spring of youth, but it's obviously harder than we know."
“… Exclusive, "Heidi has nothing to talk about except her exercise program, how she avoids carbohydrates, and the skills that her personal chef or trainer is implementing It was so boring for everyone in her life, including Vito Schnabel, and it was an important reason why he needed to rest so often. "Ouch."
The following continues the article advertisement source: backgrida source tells can



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“...into going on tour for the first time in years but they may have been better off staying home...”
“RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal the band is struggling to sell tickets.”
“The pop punk band is going on a North American tour in support of album “Generation Rx.” Tickets for the general public went on sale on Friday, July 13.”
“After nearly a month of being on sale, the band has struggled to fill seats.”
“For the November 1 show at the Fillmore Detroit in Detroit, MI, 297 tickets are available, while only 130 tickets were purchased.”
“Ticket sales are even worse for the November 3 show at 20 Monroe Live in Grand Rapids, MI, as only 116 tickets were sold.”
“A whopping 323 are still available.”
“For the November 10 show at the Aztec Theatre in San Antonio, Texas, 152 tickets have been sold, with 420 tickets still available.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
“…… For the first time in years, they're on tour, but it might be better for them to stay at home... "
“ RadarOnline.com The website can reveal exclusively that the band is hard to sell tickets. "
Pop punk bands will tour North America to support the album "RX generation.". Tickets for the public will be on sale on Friday, July 13
"After nearly a month's discount, the band has been difficult to fill seats."
"There were 297 tickets at the auto show in Fillmore, Michigan on November 1, and only 130 tickets were purchased."
"Ticket sales for the 20 Monroe live shows in Grand Rapids, Michigan, on November 3 were even worse because only 116 tickets were sold."
"There are still 323 vehicles to choose from."
"152 tickets have been sold for the November 10 show at the Aztec theater in San Antonio, Texas, with 420 tickets left."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a living designer after 1983 s Yves Saint Laurent event...”
“He’s made a lot of good progress and is in a much better place.”(Image: Wireimage)(Image: KimKardashian/Instagram)They added: “He’s still very much enjoying his time off from public events.”
“Kim Kardashian...”
“However, this year the rapper won't be attending and instead will stay in Los Angeles with their two young children, while Kim attends with sisters Kylie and Kendall Jenner.”
“According to US reports, the reason Kanye is skipping this year's soiree is because he isn't yet ready to return to the spotlight following his breakdown and hospitalisation late last year.”
“A source told People magazine : “It had nothing to do with the Met Gala.”
“It was more about the stress and pressure of a big red carpet.”
“He just wasn’t quite there yet.”
“Kanye has been doing okay.”
““He’ll be staying back in LA with their kids [North and Saint].”


“… Living designers after the San Laurent incident in 1983... "
"He's made a lot of progress and it's much better now." (image source: WireImage) (image source: Kim Kardashian / instagram) they added: "he still enjoys taking a break from public activities."
"Kim Kardashian..."
"This year, however, the rapper will not attend, but will stay in Los Angeles with his two children, while Kim will attend with his sisters Kelly and Kendall Jenner."
"According to us reports, Kanye didn't attend this year's party because he wasn't ready to return to the spotlight at the end of last year after a mental breakdown and hospitalization."
"This has nothing to do with the met Party," a source told people
"It's more pressure and pressure from the red carpet."
"He's just not there yet."
"Kanye has been doing well."
"He's going to stay in Los Angeles with their kids (North and St.)



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This is definitely the year of LOVE!”
“It s still just an idea for her the insider says adding Kourtney s not ready to take that step with him The source notes that Kourt is being very cautious as she wants to take her time and so does Younes But it can t hurt to daydream a...”
“In fact, she felt so ‘inspired’ by JB’s whirlwind romance that she’s got weddings on the brain!”
“Does she finally want to take the next step with Younes?”
“Will we finally see Kourtney Kardashian, 38, walk down the aisle?”
“— While that’s been the burning Kardashian question for years, the eldest K sister has recently been thinking of marriage.”
“And, it’s all because of her own ex, Justin Bieber, 24.”
““Seeing how happy Justin is with Hailey (Baldwin) is very inspiring to Kourtney,” a source close to the famous family tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Bieber proposed to his model girlfriend, 21, on July 7.”
““His relationship with Hailey and how peaceful and stable it is reminds Kourtney a lot of her and Younes (Bendjima).”


"This is definitely the year of love!"
"It's still just an idea for her, people familiar with the matter said. In addition, Courtney is not ready to take this step with him. The source pointed out that Courtney is very cautious, because she wants to take her time, and so do you, but it's OK to daydream..."
"In fact, she felt that JB's whirlwind romance had given her so much inspiration that she was thinking about the wedding in her mind."
"Does she finally want to take the next step with yones?"
"Will we finally see Courtney Kardashian, 38, walk down the aisle?"
"Although this has been a hot issue for Kardashian for many years, sister K has been thinking about getting married recently."
"And it's all because of her ex-wife, Justin Bieber, 24."
"It's very inspiring for Courtney to see how happy Justin and Haley (Baldwin) are together," a source close to the famous family told reporters
On July 7, Bieber proposed to his 21-year-old model girlfriend
"His relationship with Haley, and how peaceful and stable it is, reminds Courtney of her and yones."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comment below with your thoughts.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — Are you concerned that the end of Kimye is near?”
“Are Kim Kardashian and Kanye West headed for splitsville?”
“A new report claims that there is definitely trouble in paradise, and the couple are even sleeping in different beds.”
“Kim Kardashian, 35, could be preparing to divorce for a third time.”
“After her husband, Kanye West, 38, had a number of different outbursts on social media, a new report says that Kim — and her family — have had enough and are ready to cut the cord.”
“Yikes!”
““Kim is at a loss,” a family insider shared with OK!”
“Magazine inside their March 21 issue.”
“Of course, the insider is talking about Kim’s relationship with Kanye, and how it’s allegedly falling apart at the seams due to his reckless behavior on social media and at Saturday Night Live.”


"Comment below with your thoughts."
"Tell us, Hollywood - are you worried about the end of the golden leaf?"
"Are Kim Kardashian and Kanye West going to springsville?"
"A new report says there must be trouble in heaven, and the couple even sleep in different beds."
"Kim Kardashian, 35, may be preparing for a third divorce."
"After her husband Kanye West, 38, broke into a series of different emotions on social media, a new report says Kim and her family have had enough and are ready to cut the umbilical cord."
"Oh dear!"
"Kim is at a loss," a family insider shares with OK
"March 21 issue."
"Of course, the insider is talking about Kim Jong Un's relationship with kenno and the breakdown of the relationship caused by Kim Jong Un's reckless behavior on social media and live on Saturday night."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Katie Holmes Was The “Least Warm” Star on the ‘Dawson’s Creek’ Set!”
“...support plus another 5 million for herself More From Life Style Jamie Foxx a Victim of Racist Attack During Trip to Croatia Jennifer Lopez and Jamie Foxx Have Mini In Living Color Reunion See the Selfie...”
“Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx have been dating for four years and managed to keep their relationship completely under wraps.”
“However, sources reveal exclusively to Life & Style that the secretive couple is finally ready to tie the knot — but don’t expect to see any wedding photos.”
“MORE: Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx Seemingly Confirm Their Relationship With Dinner Date!”
““They would want it to be a quiet, under-the-radar ceremony in a romantic spot like Italy or the coast of France,” the insider says.”
“Katie and Jamie spent a few days together in Paris, where Jamie is filming Robin Hood, earlier this month, and managed to stay completely out of sight of photographers, spending time together at the luxe Park Hyatt Paris-Vendôme.”
“The wedding could happen as soon as the summer for the super-private pair as Katie’s 10-year-old daughter Suri will be out of school.”
“Last year, Katie was spotted at the Barbra Streisand concert supporting her boyfriend as he took the stage.”
“A few months later, the couple was spotted ringing in the New Year in Miami — and an eyewitness saw them “holding hands and walking near the pool” at the SoHo House.”


Katie Holmes is the "least enthusiastic" star on the set of Dawson Creek
“… Support plus another 5 million for their more lifestyle Jamie fox, a victim of a racist attack in Croatia, Jenny Lopez and Jamie fox have Mini Color reunion in life to watch selfie... "
"Katie Holmes and Jamie fox have been dating for four years, and their relationship is completely covered up."
"However, according to the exclusive report of life and fashion, the mysterious couple are finally ready to get married, but they don't want to see any wedding photos."
More: Katie Holmes and Jamie fox seem to confirm their relationship with the dinner date! "
"They want it to be a quiet ceremony under radar in a romantic place like the coast of Italy or France," the source said
"At the beginning of this month, Katie and Jamie spent a few days together in Paris, where Jamie shot Robin Hood, and managed to stay out of sight of photographers and spend time together at the luxury Park Hyatt Paris vend ô me."
"As Katie's 10-year-old daughter Suri will drop out of school, the wedding of the super private couple is likely to take place as soon as summer."
"Last year, Katie was found supporting her boyfriend at Barbara Streisand's concert."
A few months later, the couple were found in Miami for the new year, and a witness saw them "walking hand in hand near the swimming pool."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If anyone is ever planning on having sex on top of a pile of cash: don’t.”BLOOMING LOVELY: Margot Robbie hit the big time in The Wolf Of Wall Street [ PH]”
“It’s not as glamorous as it sounds.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Twelve months ago nobody had heard of Margot Robbie.”
“But all that changed when she went toe to toe with Leonardo di Caprio, and flaunted her incredible curves, in last year's smash hit The Wolf Of Wall Street.”
“Before she shot to stardom the Aussie actress had done the obligatory stint on Neighbours and then headed to Hollywood quickly landing a role in the cancelled TV drama Pan Am and a supporting part in last year s Richard...”


"If someone is going to have sex on a pile of money, don't do it." "Blooming loveliness: Margot Robbie shines in the wolf of Wall Street."
"It's not as glamorous as it sounds."
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"No one heard of Margot Robbie 12 months ago."
"But when she and Leonardo di Caprio showed off their incredible curves in last year's the wolf of Wall Street, everything changed."
"Before she became famous, the Australian actress played a voluntary role in neighbors, then quickly went to Hollywood, played a role in the canceled TV series pan America, and played a supporting role in Richard last year..."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Zayn debuts drastic new ‘do as he bleaches hair and beard in wake of Gigi Hadid splitMORE : Gigi Hadid and Lewis Hamilton ‘sending flirty texts’ days after Zayn Malik split...”
“Bella Hadid’s sister announced the news earlier this month by sharing a statement on Twitter.”
“The Little Mix singer was spotted touching down in Tokyo with her bandmates – rocking a very similar pair of black sunglasses to ones the Victoria’s Secret supermodel was photographed in recently.”
“She nailed airport chic as she headed to Japan, opting for a pair of tiny specs for the day.”
“And eagle-eyed fans wondered if she was making a point with her choice of eyewear – with Gigi constantly pictured in tiny sunnies, and even launching her own collection filled similar shades for Vogue Eyewear.”
“Perrie Edwards followed suit in a pair of mini shades (Picture: Sato)AdvertisementAdvertisementIt seems they’ve both been getting style tips from Kanye, who famously said told wife Kim Kardashian that ‘big glasses are out’.”
“This isn’t the first time the two have been compared over their fashion choices, with the Shout Out To My Ex singer sharing snaps of herself on Instagram wearing an outfit very similar to those from Gigi’s collection with Tommy Hilfiger.”
“However, the X Factor star later deleted her upload, after fans questioned whether she was ‘shading’ the 22-year-old.”
“Gigi Hadid recently made headlines after confirming her split from Zayn, after two years together.”
“Zayn and Gigi dated for two years (Picture: Getty)‘Breakup statements often seem impersonal because there is really no way to put into words what two people experience together over a few years,’ she told her 8.81million followers.”


"More information: for the first time, Zane has released a brand new series," with the arrival of Gigi Hadid split, he bleached his hair and beard. ". More information: Gigi Hadid and Lewis Hamilton sent flirting text messages a few days after Zahn Malik broke up... "
"Bella Hadid's sister announced it in a twitter statement earlier this month."
"The little Remix singer was found meeting with her band mates in Tokyo - she was wearing a pair of black sunglasses very similar to Victoria's Secret Supermodel's recent shoot."
"She was very fashionable on her way to Japan and chose a pair of small glasses that day."
"Sharp eyed fans want to know if she makes sense in choosing glasses - Gigi often takes pictures in the small sun and even launches her own series to fill vogue glasses with similar hues."
"Perrie Edwards also took an ad for a pair of mini Sunglasses (picture: Sato). It seems that they all got the fashion secret from Kanye, who famously told his wife, Kim Kardashian," the big glasses are broken. "
"It's not the first time the two have compared their fashion choices. My former singer shared her photo on instagram, wearing a dress that is very similar to that of Gigi and Tommy Hilfiger."
"However, the X factor star later deleted her upload because fans questioned whether she was" shading "the 22-year-old girl."
"Gigi Hadid recently made headlines after confirming her break-up with zayn, who has been together for two years."
"Zayn and Gigi have been dating for two years (photo source: Getty)," breakup statements tend to be impersonal because they can't express their experiences together in words, "she told 8.81 million fans



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That person could be Jamie Foxx.”
“There appeared to be another person at the table who stepped away, leaving their glass of white wine and cell phone.”
“...in child support and a 3 8million payment for herself writes The Sun...”
“It s confirmed Foxx and Holmes who are believed to have been dating since 2013 finally appeared in public together as they enjoyed a day at the beach on Monday Radar Online reported that Katie agreed not to publicly date another man for five years in exchange for 3 8million...”
“It has now been suggested that the pair have been keeping a lid on things as a clause in her Tom Cruise divorce settlement sees her receive £7million.”
“For years, the pair have dodged rumors that they were an item.”
“...lean legs The former Dawson s Creek star looked lovely in a summery blue patterned frock while the Oscar winning actor sported sweatpants and a T shirt...”
“Good times The Gift actress was also seen smiling as she arrived in a black SUV with her publicist Leslie Sloane The lady is happy Holmes stopped to smile for a photographer in the middle of the street Flawless female The Ice Storm actress showed off her toned arms and...”
“They held hands as they strolled on the beach, looking blissed out as they talked and giggled.”
“Katie and Jamie looked very in love in the new photos that were taken in Malibu on Monday.”


"It could be Jamie fox."
"There seems to be another person walking away from the table, leaving behind a glass of white wine and a mobile phone."
“… Of the $3.8 million raised and paid for themselves, the sun wrote
"It's confirmed that Fox and Sherlock Holmes have been dating since 2013, and they finally showed up in public because they enjoyed a day on the beach on Monday. According to radar online, Katie agreed not to date another man in public for five years in exchange for 3.8 million..."
"Now some people think that they have been hiding things because there is a clause in her Tom Cruise divorce agreement that says she will get 7 million pounds."
"For years, the two have shunned rumors that they are objects."
“… Slim former Dawson s Crick star looks cute in summer blue pattern dress, while Oscar winning actor sweatpants and T-shirt
"The good time gift actress is also seen as smiling because she is happy with her PR Leslie Sloan in a black SUV. Sherlock Holmes stops to smile and shows the photographer the perfect female ice storm actress in the middle of the street her strong arms and
"They were walking on the beach hand in hand, laughing and looking very happy."
"Katie and Jamie look very much in love in a new photo taken by Malibu on Monday."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Top image credit Public DomainWishing all our Welsh followers a very happy #StDavidsDay #DyddGŵylDewi A post shared by Kensington Palace (@kensingtonroyal) on Mar 1, 2017 at 7:00am PST”
“The conspiracy theories surrounding Princess Diana’s death were always so salacious and extreme that this just feels… strangely low-key.”
“Conspiracy theories surrounding Princess Diana’s death have flown wild for decades, but the whole thing was dredged up all over again by the Enquirer’s new story.”
“According to the Enquirer’s sources, Princess Diana‘s body was never buried at the famous memorial site in England (where visitors are sent to pay tribute), but rather is currently next to her father’s ashes in a coffin in St. Mary’s Church.”
“The Enquirer’s source claims that this is because, “Althorp Park is more secure and visitors can be more controlled.” The source adds, “No one working at the estate now was at the funeral, so we all believe what we are told.”
“It’s just better that we keep our mouths shut!”Uh… huh.”
“Sources close to the Spencer family have confirmed – several times over – that Princess Diana’s body is buried in Althorp Park, and has been there since she died twenty years ago.”
“These baseless claims of a conspiracy are misplaced, although I question the intent behind this particular report.”
“Security?”
“Accessibility?”


"Top image credit public domain wishes all our Welsh followers a happy holiday with a post from PST Kensington Palace (@ kensingtonroyal) at 7:00 am on March 1, 2017"
"The conspiracy theories surrounding the death of Princess Diana are always so obscene and extreme that people feel that Strangely low key. "
"Conspiracy theories surrounding the death of Princess Diana have been raging for decades, but the new story of the inquirer has once again made the whole thing clear."
"According to the inquirer, Princess Diana's body has never been buried in a famous British Memorial (where tourists are sent to mourn), but is now in the coffin of St. Mary's church, next to her father's ashes."
Inquirer sources said it was because "Alsop park is safer and visitors can get more control." The source added, "there is no one in the manor at the moment to attend the funeral, so we all believe what others told us."
"We'd better shut up! "Well Well
"Sources close to the Spencer family have repeatedly confirmed that Princess Diana's body is buried in Alsop Park, where it has been since her death 20 years ago."
"These groundless claims about the plot are wrong, although I doubt the intention behind the report."
"Security?"
"Accessibility?"



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But hey, she loves Swift as a songwriter still!”
“They’ve been fueling the feud fire ever since, most recently when Perry may have seduced Karlie Kloss away from Swift’s girl gang.”
“The two singers have been publicly feuding since Swift called them “enemies” in a 2014 Rolling Stone interview.”
“When a contestant on American Idol apologized to Perry for saying that he loved Swift and looked up to her as a musician, Perry said, “I love her, as a songwriter, as well.” Then she made a face most accurately described as “¯\_(ツ)_/¯” and looked away.”
“But amid all of that, Perry is still giving the people what they really want — reasons to believe she dislikes Taylor Swift.”
“Photo: Getty ImagesIt’s been quite the month in Katy Perry news: She gave a boy his first kiss on American Idol and has been embroiled in a legal battle with a group of nuns over property in L.A.”
“Taylor Swift, Katy Perry.”


"But, hey, she still likes swift as a composer!"
"Since then, they've been adding fuel to the feud, and Perry may have recently seduced Carly Klaus from Swift's gang."
"The two singers have been openly at loggerheads ever since swift called them" enemies "in an interview with Rolling Stone magazine in 2014."
A contestant on "American Idol" apologized to Perry, saying that he loved swift and regarded her as a musician. Perry said, "I love her, too, as a songwriter." Then she made a face, best described as "'\ \ (ツ) \ /'", and looked away
"But still, Perry is giving people what they really want - there's reason to believe she doesn't like Taylor Swift."
"Photo: Katy Perry news had a good month: she gave a boy her first kiss on American Idol and got involved in a legal dispute with a group of nuns over property in Los Angeles."
"Taylor Swift, Katie Perry."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kamau Bell United Shades of America With W Kamau Bell...”
“Other notable achievements included Julia Louis-Dreyfus winning her sixth consecutive Emmy for Veep, and Elisabeth Moss winning her first ever Emmy for her starring role on The Handmaid’s Tale after being nominated six times before for Top of the Lake and Mad Men.”
“Best TV Movie Black Mirror San Junipero WINNER Dolly Parton s Christmas of Many Colors The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks Sherlock The Lying Detective The Wizard of Lies Best Actress in a Limited Series or TV Movie Nicole Kidman Big Little Lies WINNER Carrie Coon Fargo Felicity Huffman American...”
“Grace and Frankie Allison Janney Mom Ellie Kemper Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt Tracee Ellis Ross Black ish Lily Tomlin Grace and Frankie Best Actor in a Comedy Series Donald Glover Atlanta WINNER Anthony Anderson Black ish Aziz Ansari Master of None Zach Galifianakis Baskets William H Macy Shameless Jeffrey Tambor Transparent...”
“Sterling K Brown This Is Us WINNER Anthony Hopkins Westworld Bob Odenkirk Better Call Saul Matthew Rhys The Americans Liev Schreiber Ray Donovan Kevin Spacey House of Cards Milo Ventimiglia This Is Us Best Actress in a Comedy Series Julia Louis Dreyfus Veep WINNER Pamela Adlon Better Things Jane Fonda...”
“...and Joan Genius The Night Of Best Actress in a Drama Series Elisabeth Moss The Handmaid s Tale WINNER Viola Davis How to Get Away With Murder Claire Foy The Crown Keri Russell The Americans Evan Rachel Wood Westworld Robin Wright House of Cards Best Actor in a Drama Series...”
“Best Drama Series The Handmaid s Tale WINNER Better Call Saul The Crown House of Cards Stranger Things This Is Us Westworld Best Comedy Series Veep WINNER Atlanta Black ish Master of None Modern Family Silicon Valley Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt Best Limited Series Big Little Lies WINNER Fargo Feud Bette...”
“See the full list of winners below.”
“This Is Us star Sterling K. Brown became the first black actor to win the Outstanding Lead Actor in a Drama Series award since 1998, when Andre Braugher won for his performance on NBC’s Homicide: Life on the Street.”
“Drunk History Portlandia Tracy Ullman s Show Best Host for a Reality or Reality Competition Program Martha Stewart and Snoop Dogg Martha Snoop s Potluck Dinner Party Gordon Ramsay MasterChef Junior Alec Baldwin Match Game Heidi Klum and Tim Gunn Project Runway RuPaul Charles RuPaul s Drag Race WINNER W”


"Carmobel and w carmobel join hands"
Other notable achievements include Julia Louis Dreyfus's sixth consecutive Emmy Award for "WIP," and Elizabeth Moss's six previous nominations for "the top of the lake" and "mad man."
"The immortal life of Henrietta in the best TV movie" St. Junipero in the black mirror "by dolly Patton is short of the best actress in Shylock's" the liar detective "and" the liar wizard limited series "or" the American "by Carly Kuhn Fargo felicity Huffman, the winner of Nicole Kidman's" the big lie "..."
"Grace and Frankie Alison Jennie, mother Ellie kapper, the impregnable Kimmie Schmidt Tracy Ellis Ross black ish Lily Tomlin grace and best actor of Frankie comedy series Donald Glover, Atlanta prize winner Anthony Anderson black ish Aziz Ansari, the great master with nothing William H. Messi under the basketball of lifianakis, and the shameless Jeffrey Tambor transparency... "
"Stirling K. brown, this is American champion Anthony Hopkins, western world Bob odenke, the best name is solmathurius, American Lev schleiber, Donovan, Kevin Spacey, house of cards, Milo Ventimiglia, this is American best actress in comedy series Julia Louis dreyford, winner Pamela adelon, better thing, Jane Fonda..."
“… And Joan night of genius best actress in a drama series Elizabeth moss maid's story winner Viola Davis how to escape the murder of Claire foy crown Kerry Russell American Evan Rachel wood westwaldo binglet house of cards best actor in a drama series
"Best drama series" the maid's story "champion best title Saul crown house of cards" strange things "this is the best comedy series in the western United States, veep champion, Atlanta Black Non modern family master, Silicon Valley impregnable, Kimmy Schmidt best limited edition series" big lie "champion Fargo feud bette..."
"Please refer to the full list of winners below."
"This is the first black actor to win the drama series Award for her performance in NBC's" killing: street life "in 1998."
"Drunken history Portland Tracy Ullman's show best host reality or reality competition show Martha Stewart and snoop dog Martha snoop's Luncheon dinner Gordon Ramsay chef Alex Baldwin Jr. competition game Heidi Kram and Tim Gunn Project Runway Rubel Charles Rubel's drag and drop champion W"



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are you anxious for her to reveal her pregnancy at last?”
““ Kylie wants to eat healthier, and she knows how important it is for her baby to get good nutrition, but spending time with her family is making things hard,” our insider explained.”
“We exclusively learned the star is struggling with her diet.”
“The holidays are known for throwing people off their diets, and apparently, Kylie Jenner, 20, is no exception!”
“But while the reality star is apparently desperate to avoid excess weight gain, she’s finding herself craving all sorts of sugary desserts and unhealthy snacks.”
“We don’t blame her for indulging either — after all, during the holidays it’s nearly impossible to completely refrain from satisfying your sweet tooth!”
“Click here to see pics of Kylie’s and Khloe Kardashian’s pre-pregnancy bodies.”
““ Kylie is struggling with pregnancy food cravings.”
“She is overwhelmed with nowhere to turn because there is yummy holiday food everywhere she looks,” a source close to Kylie revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She feels like being pregnant during the holidays is the most challenging time because everywhere she goes there is great food, snacks, and yummy treats.” Regardless, Kylie is at least TRYING to control her cravings.”


"Are you in a hurry for her to finally reveal her pregnancy?"
"Kelly wants to eat healthier, she knows how important it is to get good nutrition for her baby, but being with her family makes things more difficult," our insider explained
"We know exclusively that the star is trying to diet."
"Festivals are famous for getting people to stop dieting, and obviously 20-year-old Kelly Jenner is no exception!"
"But while the reality star is clearly desperate to avoid weight gain, she finds herself craving sugary desserts and unhealthy snacks."
"We don't blame her for indulging in it - after all, it's almost impossible to completely refrain from satisfying your sweets during the holidays!"
"Click here to see pictures of Kelly and Carol Kardashian's bodies before they became pregnant."
"Kelly is fighting the hunger for food during her pregnancy."
A source close to Kelly told reporters: "she has nowhere to run, because there are delicious holiday food everywhere." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She thinks pregnancy during the holiday is the most challenging time, because she has delicious food, snacks and delicacies everywhere she goes." Anyway, Kelly is at least trying to control her appetite



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo by Kevin Winter/Getty Images...”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.”
“Chelsea Handler and Jennifer Aniston were long time BFFs and did everything that best friends would do, including hate each others ex-boyfriends, ex-husbands, and ex-husbands’ new partners.”
“In fact, Handler has been especially vitriolic towards Angelina Jolie in the past, publicly speaking out against Jolie for ‘stealing’ Brad Pitt away from Jennifer Aniston.”
“Yes, it takes two people to break up a marriage, but Handler always reserved her vitriol for Angelina Jolie, much like the rest of Jennifer Aniston’s close-knit BFF crew (albeit none as vocally as Chelsea Handler).”
“However, Chelsea and Jennifer have allegedly had a falling out recently, as they’ve barely spent any time together and are clearly (and visibly) on the outs with each other.”
“Some reports claim that this is because Chelsea has been spilling secrets about Jennifer’s marriage to Justin Theroux, and others claim that it was just them naturally growing apart.”
“Regardless, Chelsea’s already gone as far as to find a new BFF in Charlize Theron, and Jennifer?”
“Well, she’s busy with her new husband and working hard to reboot her TV career.”
“As this has all been happening, a new report from Radar Online claims that Chelsea has been in the process of replacing her friendship with Jennifer Aniston with another relationship – this time with Jennifer’s ex, Brad Pitt!”


"Kevin winter / Getty pictures..."
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below."
"Chelsea Handler and Jennifer Aniston have been good friends for a long time. They have done everything a best friend would do, including hating each other's ex boyfriends, ex husbands and their new partners."
"In fact, handler used to be very mean to Angelina Jolie, publicly criticizing Jolie for" stealing "Brad Pitt from Jennifer Aniston."
"Yes, it takes two people to break up a marriage, but handler is always mean to Angelina Jolie, just like other friends around Jennifer Aniston (though none of them can talk like Chelsea Handler)
"However, there has been a recent alleged quarrel between Chelsea and Jennifer because they have hardly ever been together and it is clear that they are quarreling with each other
"Some reports say it's because Chelsea have been divulging the secret of Jennifer's marriage to Justin serrux, while others say it's just a natural separation
"Anyway, has Chelsea found a new boyfriend with Charlize Theron and Jennifer?"
"Well, she's busy with her new husband, trying to restart her TV career."
"With all this happening, a new report from radar online says that Chelsea is replacing her friendship with Jennifer Aniston with another relationship - this time with her ex girlfriend Brad Pitt!"



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But did Kim let the cat out of the bag on all three pieces of pregnancy news weeks ago in a nonchalant Instagram post?”
“...confirming anything...”
“News that Khloe Kardashian 33 is expecting her first baby with boyfriend Tristan Thompson and many recent reports have said youngest sister Kylie Jenner 20 is pregnant with her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott although when asked about it their mom Kris Jenner told Ryan Seacrest Kylie s not...”
“It's apparently a baby boom for the Kardashian-Jenner family, as the reality star recently revealed she and Kanye West are expecting their third child—reportedly via surrogate, multiple sources recently told E!”
“Kim Kardashian, did you do what we think you did?”


"But a few weeks ago, in a cool post on instagram, did Kim disclose all three pregnancy stories?"
“… Confirm anything... "
"It has been reported that Khloe Kardashian, 33, will have her first child with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson, while many recent reports say that her 20-year-old sister Kylie Jenner is pregnant with her boyfriend Travis Scott When asked about it, their mother, Kris Jenner, told Ryan·
Many sources recently told e
"Kim Kardashian, did you do what we thought you did?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Clarke’s organization, for example, has highlighted “special guests” at their annual gala, like Laz Alonso, a Hollywood star from box office hits like Avatar; Mike Tomlin, head coach of the Pittsburgh Steelers; and Jim Nantz, a CBS sports personality.”
“Many organizations rely on celebrities to draw attention to their cause.”
“She makes millions selling a brand on top of questionable products.”
“She’s a reality star.”
“Tomorrow's cover: Kim Kardashian visits the White House to discuss prison reform with President Trump https://t.co/1N3bNkVmK7 pic.twitter.com/yPaL93Tyhe — New York Post (@nypost) May 30, 2018It’s tempting to say that Kardashian just isn’t serious.”
“The image was retweeted and liked thousands of times.”
“...pic.twitter.com/uOy4UJ41JF — Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) May 30, 2018The New York Post went with not one, but two references to Kardashian’s rear end on its Thursday cover.”
“Great meeting with @KimKardashian today, talked about prison reform and sentencing.”
“It wasn’t criticism; it was an assault.”
“The media pounced.”


Clark's group, for example, highlighted "special guests" at their annual party, such as Hollywood star Laz Alonso in box office hits like Avatar, Pittsburgh Steelers coach Mike Tomlin and CBS sports celebrity Jim Nantz
"Many organizations rely on celebrities to attract attention to their cause."
"She made millions of dollars selling a brand on a problematic product."
"She's a reality star."
"Tomorrow's cover: Kim Kardashian visits the White House to discuss prison reform with President trump https://t.co/1N3bNkVmK7pic.twitter.com/yPaL93Tyhe- The New York Post said on May 30, 2018 that Kardashian was not serious
"This picture was forwarded and liked thousands of times."
“... pic.twitter.com/uOy4UJ41JF -Donald J. trump (@ real Donald Trump) May 30, 2018, the New York Post didn't mention one on its cover on Thursday, but two mention Kardashian's tail. "
"It was a great meeting with @ Kim Kardashian today to discuss prison reform and sentencing."
"It's not criticism, it's attack."
"The media suddenly attacked."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““Setting down roots is something she’s thought long and hard about.”
“Gossip Cop reports that an insider close to Swift confirmed she is not house-searching in England at all—especially as she's about to set off on her Reputation world tour this spring.”
“Original, 4/5, 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, the pop star and very secretive girlfriend of British actor Joe Alwyn, is ready to commit!”
“To England full-time, that is.”
“The Sun's Dan Wootton—the guy who broke the news the two were secretly dating last May—reports that Swift is looking for a North London house to make her home base.”
“Alwyn and his family live in North London's Crouch End; Swift would like to be near that and the countryside near Soho Farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside of the city.”
“(Soho Farmhouse, by the way, is where Meghan Markle had her swanky bridal shower.)”
““Taylor loves the UK and how she can live a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said.”
“The Sun previously reported that Swift went undetected in disguises around the city.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Taking root is something she has been thinking about for a long time."
"Gossip police reported that an insider close to swift confirmed that she was not looking for a house in the UK at all, especially when she was about to start her world tour this spring."
"Original, 4:5 p.m., 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, pop star, secret girlfriend of British actor Joe Alvin, ready!"
"It was a full-time trip to England."
Dan Wootton of the Sun reported last May that Swift was looking for a house in North London as her base
"Alvin and his family live in crouch, north of London; swift wants to be close to the countryside there and near SOHO farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside the city."
(by the way, SOHO farmhouse is the place for Megan markel's luxurious wedding.)
"Taylor loves Britain and how she can lead a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said
The sun had previously reported that swift had absconded in disguise in the city without being found



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether she’s rockin’ the single life or workin’ it as a doting life, she sure knows how to capture attention with confidence and grace.”
“The award-winning actress has made several appearances at public award ceremonies and events in the past few months and she’s looked incredible each time.”
“Angelina seems to be enjoying the single life by focusing on her six children since her split from Brad but we can’t help but wonder when she’ll decide to date again.”
“After all, just think of the amazing women he’s romanced in the past: Madonna, Charlize Theron, and even Jewel!”
“He’s happy to bide his time, flirting and ingratiating himself with Angelina, and he’s confident she’ll give in to his charms eventually.” Sean is definitely a charmer.”
“Sean’s not one to give up however, once he sets his sights on something he’s pretty dogged in pursuing it until he achieves his aims—so, it’s unlikely he’s just going to fold.”
““Angelina really has no interest in dating right now though, she’s focused on the kids and her work, and really isn’t interested in getting involved with anybody.”
““Sean thinks Angelina is amazing—he loves her dedication to humanitarian work, and really admires how smart and deep she is, not to mention, stunningly beautiful,” the source continued.”
“There is a possibility of a romance between the two talented stars, but they are taking things slow and no matter how long it takes, Sean is not ready to give up on the brunette beauty.”
“...group situation Since Sean and Brad are known to be good friends we think this could be a tad bit awkward especially if Angelina and Sean become a serious item in the future...”


"Whether she is enjoying her single life or treating it as a doting life, she knows how to attract people's attention with confidence and grace."
"In the past few months, the award-winning actress has appeared at public awards ceremonies and events many times, and every time it seems incredible."
"Since Angelina and Brad broke up, she seems to enjoy being single and focusing on her six children, but we can't help wondering when she will decide to date again."
"After all, think of the great women he's romanticized in the past: Madonna, Charlize Theron, and even Javier!"
"He's happy to wait, flirt and please Angelina, and he believes she will eventually succumb to his charm." Sean is definitely a charismatic person
"Sean is not a person who can give up, but once he sets his eyes on something, he will persevere until he achieves his goal, so he is unlikely to give up like this."
"However, Angelina is really not interested in dating right now. She only focuses on children and work, and is not interested in dating anyone."
"Sean thinks Angelina is amazing, he loves her dedication to humanitarian work and really admires how smart and profound she is, let alone amazing beauty," the source continued
"There is a possibility of romance between the two talented stars, but they take their time. No matter how long it takes, Sean is not ready to give up the brunette."
“… Group situation since Sean and Brad are well-known good friends, we think it might be a bit embarrassing, especially if Angelina and Sean become a serious project in the future... "



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for the latest news and updates about Liam Hemsworth and Miley Cyrus!”
“The pair has yet to comment on the reports stating that they are fighting over having babies.”
“Many fans were disheartened when Liam Hemsworth and Miley Cyrus called off their engagement in 2013.”
“The Paranoia star previously claimed that their age and “different directions” were among the reasons why they decided to end their romance four years ago.”
“Now that they are back together, avid followers of the couple are thrilled to see them tie the knot despite the fact that they had been keeping the details of their wedding under wraps.”
“Daily Mail previously shared that an anonymous NW Magazine insider stated that Liam Hemsworth and Miley Cyrus had planned to tie the knot in a private wedding ceremony in Los Angeles on July 4 last year.”
“The same tipster added that the pair had also scheduled a trip to Australia for their honeymoon.”
“Though these claims remain unconfirmed up to this writing, recent reports have it that the couple is “planning to elope” over the holidays.”
“Speculations suggest that The Hunger Games star and his fiancee are flying off to Australia after Christmas.”
“Liam Hemsworth is reportedly celebrating Christmas along with Miley Cyrus in Nashville, Tennessee — the hometown of the Hannah Montana actress.”


"Keep an eye on Liam Hemsworth and Millie Cyrus
"The two have yet to comment on reports that they were arguing over the birth of a child."
"When Liam Hemsworth and Millie Cyrus cancelled their engagement in 2013, a lot of fans were frustrated."
The paranoid star previously claimed that their age and "different directions" were one of the reasons why they decided to end their relationship four years ago
"Now they're together again, and although they've been hiding the details of the wedding, the couple's fanatical followers are thrilled to see them get married."
"The daily mail previously revealed that an anonymous NW magazine insider said Liam Hemsworth and Millie Cyrus planned to have a private wedding in Los Angeles on July 4 last year
"The same source added that they also planned to go to Australia for their honeymoon."
"Although these claims have not been confirmed before writing this article, there have been recent reports that the couple" plan "to elope during the holidays."
"It is speculated that the hunger game star and his fiancee will fly to Australia after Christmas."
Liam Hemsworth and Millie Cyrus are reported to be celebrating Christmas in Nashville, Tennessee, home of Hannah Montana actress



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“At the time, he made it clear that he wanted Meghan to join him, saying, "I am also incredibly grateful that the woman I am about to marry, Meghan, will be joining me in this work, of which she too is hugely excited to take part in."”
“...today...”
“Taking on his new job in April 2018 Prince Harry said via The Daily Mail In my new role I will work to support The Queen my father The Prince of Wales and my brother William all of whom know that young people are the answer to the challenges of...”
“The programme aims to recognize the work of exceptional young people and the work that they do within the Commonwealth nations.”
“Getty ImagesPrince Harry is already the patron of the Queen's Young Leaders, a role that he took on in 2018.”
“While the Queen is taking a step back from her role in the Queen's Young Leaders programme, it's clear that she's leaving in very capable hands.”
“According to The Express, Prince Harry and the Duchess of Sussex "will welcome those in the Queen's Young Leaders programme to Buckingham Palace this summer, continuing the role started by the Queen during her lifetime of service to the Commonwealth nations."”
“Following her solo outing with the Queen earlier this month, it's now being reported that Meghan is about to take over one of Queen Elizabeth's royal duties.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"At that time, he made it clear that he wanted Megan to join him, and he said," I'm also very grateful to the woman I'm going to get married. Megan will join me in this work, and she's very excited to participate in it. "
“… Today... "
"In April 2018, Prince Harry accepted his new job. He said through the daily mail that in my new position, I will try my best to support the queen, my father, the prince of Wales and my brother William. They all know that young people are coping with The answer to the challenge. "
"The programme aims to recognize the work of outstanding young people and their work in Commonwealth countries."
"Getty Images Harry is already a patron of the Queen's young leader, and he took up the role in 2018."
"Although the queen is taking a step back from her role in the Queen's youth leadership project, it is clear that she left in the hands of very capable people."
Prince Harry and the Duchess of Sussex "will welcome people from the Queen's youth leadership program to Buckingham Palace this summer to continue the role that the queen has begun in her life of serving the Commonwealth countries," the express said
Earlier this month, after a separate visit with the queen, Megan was reported to be about to take over one of Queen Elizabeth's Royal duties



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Alex also has children, two daughters from his marriage to psychology graduate Cynthia Scurtis, whom he married in 2002 before they divorced in 2008.”
“In 2004 J-Lo married singer Marc Anthony, and the singer gave birth to twins Emme Maribel and Maximillian David in 2008 before they divorced six years later.”
“But she also has a long history on the romance scene, with a fourth wedding on the horizon - this time to Alex Rodriguez.”
“3 Jennifer Lopez has announced that she’s engaged to her baseball legend boyfriend Alex Rodriguez Credit: Getty - ContributorIs Jennifer Lopez engaged to Alex Rodriguez?”
“In March 2019 it was revealed that Jennifer Lopez had got engaged to her baseball legend boyfriend Alex Rodriguez during a romantic beach getaway.”
“The three-times married singer, 49, announced the news by posting a pic of her massive diamond sparkler on Instagram with a number of heart emojis.”
“Before the announcement, in July 2018 Jen sparked rumours she was engaged to Alex after sporting a Cartier ring on her wedding finger.”
“The pair also sent the rumour mill in full motion when they were spotted buying jewellery on Valentine's Day 2018.”
“3 The pair has been dating since 2017 Credit: AP.ASSOCIATED PRESSWhen did she start dating the baseball star?”
“Jennifer first started dating A-Rod in March 2017 after first meeting him in 2005 at a baseball game she had attended with her then-husband Marc Anthony.”


"Alex also has children. He has two daughters in his marriage to psychology graduate Cynthia Scudetti. He got married in 2002 and divorced in 2008."
In 2004, J-Lo married singer Marc Anthony and gave birth to twins Emme Maribel and Maximilian David in 2008. They divorced six years later
"But she also has a long history on the stage of love, and is about to have her fourth wedding - this time with Alex Rodriguez."
"3. Jennifer Lopez announces her engagement to baseball legend Alex Rodriguez credit: are Getty - funders Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez engaged?"
"In March 2019, it was reported that Jennifer Lopez was engaged to baseball legend Alex Rodriguez on a romantic beach holiday."
The 49 year old singer, who has been married three times, announced the news by posting a huge, glittering picture of diamonds with many heart-shaped expressions on instagram
"Before the announcement, in July 2018, Jennifer wore a Cartier ring on her wedding finger, sparking rumors of her engagement to Alex."
"When the two were found buying jewelry on Valentine's day in 2018, rumors were also flying."
"3 two dating since 2017 credit: AP when did she start dating baseball stars?"
"Jennifer first dated A-Rod in March 2017, when she first met him at a baseball game with her then husband, Marc Anthony, in 2005."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or could it be that he never wants the preparation for a role to end and only ‘retirement’ offers him the solace of being in character forever?”
“He's known to fully immerse himself in the character that he is playing to an unbelievable degree.”
“There is a 'great' Daniel Day-Lewis preparation for every decade from the 1990s till the 2010s and these roles have been acknowledged by the biggest honour possible for any actor - an Academy Award.”
“...his threadbare coat for a warmer one because it hadn t existed in the 19th century and even wandered about Rome where Gangs was filmed in character fighting strangers...”
“For The Crucible 1996 he lived in the film set s replica village without electricity or running water and built his character s house with 17th century tools and most famously for Gangs of New York he trained as a butcher caught pneumonia while on set after effusing to change...”
“For In the Name of the Father (1993) he slept in an abandoned jail and ate only prison rations.”
“During the making of My Left Foot he famously remained in character, as the writer with cerebral palsy, to the extent that he was spoon-fed by the crew.”
“To say that Day-Lewis is merely acting for the camera while in a film would be an understatement.”
“The thing that probably makes Day-Lewis one of the most preeminent actors of our times, in not just his craft but also the way his craft touches the audiences.”
“Are there then no other people left for him to be that he decided to quit at 60, an age when many other great actors have hit a golden phase of their career?”


"Or does he never want the preparation for the role to end, and only" retirement "can comfort him forever in the role?"
"As we all know, he's completely immersed in the role he plays to an incredible degree."
"From the 1990s to the 2010s, every decade there will be a" great "preparation by Daniel Day Lewis, and these roles have been recognized by the biggest honor that any actor can possibly get - the Oscar."
“…… He replaced his old coat with a warm one, because it didn't exist in the 19th century, and even wandered around Rome, where he photographed Gang figures fighting with strangers... "
"In the crucible in 1996, he lived in a village where there was no electricity or running water in the movie scene. He built his character's house with 17th century tools, the most famous of which was the house built for the New York Mafia. He was trained to be a butcher during shooting, contracted pneumonia during shooting, and later donated blood for change..."
"Because in the name of his father (1993), he sleeps in an abandoned prison and only eats prison rations."
"In the process of making my left foot, as a writer with cerebral palsy, he has always maintained his famous personality, so that he was fed with spoons by the crew."
"It would be understatement to say that Lewis was just acting for the camera in the film that day."
"The reason why Day Lewis is the most outstanding actor of our time lies not only in his acting skills, but also in the way that his acting moves the audience."
"So when he decided to resign at the age of 60, was there no one else left for him? At this age, many other great actors have entered the golden stage of their careers? "



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I only wish they could have had more people… Every person who walked in that night, we handed then an invitation, they opened it up and it said “surprise!” you are here for the wedding and not the engagement party.”
“It was so beautiful.”
“What was the original wedding going to be like?”
“Very much in love, very touchy feely.”
“They were like any young couple.”
“Britney’s so polite, she kept calling me Miss Alyson, and I was like, ‘Oh my God don’t do that; that makes me feel old.’And then you met Kevin.”
“I mean they’re from the South.”
“The sweetest.”
“I first interviewed with Felicia, her assistant for years, and I didn’t know who I was meeting with, just that it was a VIP… I met Britney and her mom the next day and they all couldn’t be nicer.”
“Yes, I mean, she is Britney Spears.”


"I just hope they have more people We handed out an invitation to everyone who came in that night. They opened the invitation and it said, "surprise! "You're here for the wedding, not for the engagement party."
"It's beautiful."
"What would the first wedding look like?"
"Very much in love, very sensitive."
"They're like any young couple."
"Britney was very polite. She kept calling me miss Alison, and I said," oh my God, don't do that. It makes me feel old. " And then you met Kevin
"I mean they're from the south."
"The sweetest."
"I interviewed Felicia, her assistant for many years, for the first time. I don't know who to meet. I only know that she is a VIP The next day I met Britney Spears and her mother, and they couldn't be better
"Yes, I mean, she's Britney Spears."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It brought me a lot of happiness being able to lay out there and get that vitamin D.”According to the Daily Mail, Aniston and Sandler play a married couple in the film who go on a European vacation to attempt to revive their marriage.”
“And I miss it.”
“As Aniston told Harper's Bazaar, “Being Greek, we love our tanning, but I’ve been on hiatus.”
“But really, that should come as no surprise for this sun worshiper.”
“According to People, Aniston was spotted in a bright blue bikini and oversized sunglasses as she tanned by the water in Portofino during a day off.”
“In between shoots, Aniston and Sandler have been busy taking in all the sights and relaxing by the water.”
“In the paparazzi shots, the entire crew can be seen filming the new movie on a gorgeous yacht, so apparently it was a tough day at the office.”
“According to the Daily Mail, Aniston, Sandler, and their third co-star Luke Evans were filming in the town of Portofino, Italy, a popular travel destination for the rich and famous.”
“On Tuesday, Sandler and Aniston were spotted filming their new Netflix comedy, "Murder Mystery," on the Italian Riviera.”
“Not only do they get to work with their buddies on some of the funniest movies in cinematic history, but they also get to make those movies in paradise.”


Aniston and Sandler play a married couple who go on holiday in Europe to try to restore their marriage, the Daily Mail reported
"I miss it."
As Aniston said in Harper's bazaar, "as Greeks, we like tanning, but I've been resting."
"But really, it's no surprise to this sun worshiper."
"According to people familiar with the matter, Aniston was wearing a bright blue bikini and oversized sunglasses when she was sunburned in water during a day off in Portofino."
Between shots, Aniston and Sandler are busy enjoying all the scenery and relaxing by the water
"In the paparazzi footage, you can see the whole crew filming the new film on a gorgeous yacht, so it's obviously a tough day in the office."
Aniston, Sandler and their third partner, Luke Evans, are filming in Portofino, Italy, a tourist destination for the rich and famous, the Daily Mail reported
Sandler and Aniston were filmed shooting their new comedy "the mystery of murder" in the Italian Riviera on Tuesday
"They can not only work with their partners to make the most interesting movies in film history, they can also make these movies in paradise."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What do you think about the supposed name change, HollywoodLifers?”
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out for a comment on this report.”
“Did President Donald Trump just fire ‘Black History Month?’ February has been the time when America celebrates the contributions made by its citizens of color, but after four decades of going by ‘Black History Month,’ Trump reportedly has given the name the boot!”
“Say good bye to Black History Month and hello to National African American History Month Just like with many of his casinos and hotels President Donald Trump 70 has decided to take a pre existing institution and slap his own branding on it as TMZ reports Trump s changing the...”
“...name of the month dedicated to celebrating America s finest citizens of color...”
“After Trump met with African American leaders, a senior administration official tells TMZ, Donald was convinced that the term “black” is outdated, and the more appropriate way to refer to the community is “African American.” Hmmm, sounds like Donald’s trying to be a little bit more politically correct!”
“Update: Guess what!”
“TMZ has updated their story to point out that yes, most modern presidents have referred to it as “National African American History Month” and Donald did NOT change it.”
“Trump also noticed how the newest addition to the Smithsonian museum was called the “National Museum of African American History and Culture,” the official tells TMZ.”
“So, Trump decided to change the month’s name.”


"What do you think of a new name, Hollywood star?"
"Hollywood life has asked for comments on this report."
"Did President Donald Trump just fire black history month? February has always been a time for the United States to celebrate the contribution of citizens of color, but after 40 years of "Black History Month", it is reported that trump gave the name "boot"! "
"Say goodbye to black history month and say hello to the national African American history month. Like many of his casinos and hotels, Donald Trump's 70 year old president has decided to buy an existing institution and put his own brand on it, because TMZ reports that trump is changing..."
“… The name of the month in honor of America's best citizens of color... "
"After trump met with African American leaders, a senior government official told TMZ that Donald was convinced that the word" black "was out of date and that the more appropriate way to address the community was" African American. ". Well, it sounds like Donald wants to be more politically correct! "
"Guess what!"
"TMZ updated their report, pointing out that yes, most modern presidents call this month" national African American history month, "and Donald has not changed this month."
"Trump has also noticed the latest addition to the Smithsonian Museum, known as the National Museum of African American history and culture," the official told TMZ
"So trump decided to change the name of this month."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They share one child.”
“Shookus previously married Miller, a then-fellow SNL producer, in 2010 before splitting a few years ago.”
“A People magazine report dates their friendship to at least May 2013 when five-time “SNL” host Affleck last appeared on the show.”
“He was still married to actress Jennifer Garner at the time.”
“The next month witnesses spotted Affleck and Shookus acting flirty at a premiere afterparty for the movie The Heat They were at the bar of the Stone Rose Lounge on New York City s Upper West Side chatting and laughing together He definitely looked interested in her a partygoer told...”
“People at the time...”
“The two later left together with other friends and headed to the nearby Mandarin Oriental hotel bar.”
“Since then, Affleck would always stop by and visit her at the “SNL” studios whenever he was appearing on Jimmy Fallon’s show, according to a source.”
““They were both married at the time, but there was definitely a flirtation.”Darrell Hammond (left) and Lindsay Shookus (center) attend The Museum Gala at American Museum of Natural History on Nov. 16, 2006 in New York City.”
“(Photo by Will Ragozzino/Patrick McMullan via Getty Images)But Us Weekly, citing an insider close to Garner, alleges there was more than a flirtation.”


"They share a child."
"Shookus married SNL producer Miller in 2010 and broke up a few years ago."
According to a report in people magazine, their friendship dates back at least to may 2013, when five time SNL host Alfred appeared on the show for the last time
"He was married to actress Jennifer Garner at the time."
"Next month, an eyewitness found that Affleck and shokus were flirting at the party after the premiere of the movie" heat ". They were chatting and laughing together in the bar of the stone Rose Bar on the upper west side of New York City. A party participant told him that he must look interested in her..."
"People at that time..."
"They later left with other friends and went to the nearby Mandarin Oriental hotel bar."
"Since then, every time Affleck appeared on Jimi Fallon's show, she would visit SNL studio, according to a source
Darrell Hammond (left) and Lindsay schokus (Center) attend the museum celebration of the American Museum of natural history in New York on November 16, 2006
"(will lagozino / Patrick McMullen filmed through Getty pictures) but US weekly quoted an insider close to Ghana as saying it wasn't just a flirtation."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Perlman and del Toro are friends and collaborators and the director has spoken about clashing with Weinstein during the making of Mimic In Perlman s original tweet the actor shared Did I ever tell you about when Harvey Weinstein told me to make sure I shook his hand at a...”
“Donald Trump Jr. criticized Ron Perlman on social media in an accusatory tweet implying the “Hellboy” actor knew about Harvey Weinstein’s history of sexual harassment and abuse.”
“Trump Jr. was responding to a story Perlman shared in which he remembered urinating on his hands before giving Harvey Weinstein a handshake at a charity event.”
“Trump Jr. called Perlman a “coward” for staying silent all these years.”
““So you knew he was a rapist and rather the actually do something or say anything you pissed all over your hand?” Trump Jr. asked Perlman on Twitter.”
““Imagine how many assaults on innocent women you could have prevented if you weren’t a coward.”Perlman’s original tweet detailing the story of his Weinstein handshake never said he knew about the ex-studio head’s predatory behavior.”
“The actor responded to Trump Jr. informing him he never said what Trump Jr. was accusing him of in his question.”
“Perlman proceeded to tell Trump Jr. that the reason he urinated on his hands was because he knew Weinstien was “a prick.”“I never said I knew Harvey was a rapist,” Perlman wrote to Trump Jr. “I never worked for Harvey…I DID know he was a prick though.”
“A prick and a bully.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Perlman and del Toro are friends and collaborators. The director once talked on Perlman's initial twitter about conflicts with Weinstein in the process of making" imitation ". Have I told you that Harvey Weinstein told me to make sure I'm in a good company
"Donald Trump Jr. criticized Ron Perlman on social media for tweeting that Hellboy actors knew about Harvey Weinstein's history of sexual harassment and abuse."
"Little trump is responding to a story shared by Perlman. He remembers urinating on his hands before shaking hands with Harvey Weinstein at a charity event."
"Little trump called Perlman a 'coward' who has been silent all these years."
"So you know he's a rapist, and what did he do or say that you pissed him all over his hands?"? "Little trump asked Perlman on twitter."
"Imagine how many attacks on innocent women you could have prevented if you hadn't been a coward." Perlman initially tweeted a detailed account of his handshake with Weinstein, but he never said he knew about the looting of the former studio director
"The actor responded to little trump and told him that he never said what little trump accused him of in his questions."
"Perlman went on to tell little trump that the reason he urinated on his hands was because he knew that Winston was an" asshole. ". "I never said I knew Harvey was a rapist," Perlman wrote to little trump. "I never worked for Harvey But I do know he's a jerk. "
"An asshole and a villain."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, did you freak out over the false rumors that Kylie was in labor?”
“While the gossip has since been debunked by TMZ and The Blast, the spike in interest surrounding her pregnancy didn’t go unnoticed.”
“Get the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Kylie Jenner, 20, can induce hype like no other.”
“From her hugely successful Kylie Cosmetics brand to her reported pregnancy people will stop everything to try to keep up with her but apparently all of the attention surrounding the upcoming birth of her first child has even surpassed her...”
“...own expectations...”
““Kylie is pretty blown away by quite how much people seem utterly obsessed with her pregnancy, it’s like no other 20-year-old has ever given birth before,” a source close to the Kardashian family told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“The baby hype grew to new extremes on Jan. 12 when a rumor that the youngest KarJenner sister was in labor started gaining traffic on Twitter.”
““She’s been trying to keep off line as much as possible, but she couldn’t escape all the speculation yesterday as her phone started ringing as soon as the rumors started,” the source added.”
“Being enamored by Kylie’s pregnancy is totally ok, but let’s all make sure to be nice about it.”


"Hollywood stars, have you ever been panicked by the rumor that Kelly was in labor?"
"Although the scandal was later exposed by TMZ and the explosion, the high interest surrounding her pregnancy has not been ignored."
"Get exclusive details!"
"Kylie Jenner, 20, can be as hype as anyone else."
"From her very successful Kylie cosmetics brand to reports of her pregnancy, people will stop trying to keep up with her, but it's clear that all the attention around her upcoming first child is even more than her..."
“… My expectations... "
A source close to the Kardashian family told reporters: "Kelly is fascinated by people's obsession with her pregnancy, just like any other 20-year-old girl who has never had a baby." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"On January 12, rumors began to spread on twitter that the youngest sister kajana was in labor, and the baby propaganda reached a new extreme."
"She has been trying to stay away from the Internet, but yesterday she couldn't escape all speculation because her mobile phone rang at the beginning of the rumor," the source added
"It's all right to be fascinated by Kelly's pregnancy, but we all have to make sure we treat her better."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“John Mayer & Amy Schumer is the celebrity couple we deserve in 2017 — elle (@elbusyo) July 25, 2017This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“While this might seem like an unlikely coupling if their Instagram posts are anything to go by the pair definitely enjoy spending time together Just a couple of weeks ago on July 14 Schumer shared this photo taken at Comedy Cellar with John Mayer standing right behind her Prior to...”
“...that Schumer was spotted commenting on Mayer s Instagram after he dyed his hair This content is imported from Instagram...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“According to The Sun, "Amy and John have been friends for years but they have been growing closer over the past few months...”
“It is early days but they have been on a few dates."”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“This is a guess based on nothing but Instagram clues: But are John Mayer and Amy Schumer secretly dating ?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"John Mayer and Amy Schumer are the celebrity couple we deserve in 2017 - Elle (@ elbusyo) July 25, 2017 this content was created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email address."
"Although this seems to be an unlikely coupling, if their instagram post is what to go for, the two definitely like to spend time together. Just a few weeks ago, on July 14, Schumer shared this photo with John Mayer standing behind her in the comedy cellar, just in front of her..."
“… After dyeing his hair, Schumer was found commenting on Mayer's instagram, which was imported from instagram... "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
According to the sun, "Amy and John have been friends for many years, but they have become closer and closer in the past few months..."
"It's still early, but they've had several dates."
"This content was imported from twitter."
It's a guess based on instagram: but are John Mayer and Amy Schumer on a secret date? "



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read original story ‘Genius: Aretha’ Trailer: Watch Cynthia Erivo Fight to Keep Her ‘Queen of Soul’ Crown (Video) At TheWrap...”
“She begins a successful career at Arista, with the help of Clive Davis, and in an unforgettable GRAMMY performance in 1998, she solidifies her eternal reign as the Queen of Soul.”
“Franklin and meets her idol, Clara Ward.”
“Meanwhile, Little Re has her first touring experience on the Gospel Circuit in 1954 with C.L.”
“UNTIL THE REAL THING COMES ALONG Sunday, March 21 at 10/9c Struggling to find her sound, Aretha catches the attention of Jerry Wexler at Atlantic Records in 1966.”
“Franklin, church.”
“After suffering the loss of her surrogate mother, Little Re braves her first solo in 1953, in her father’s, C.L.”
“Also Read: Here Are the Premiere Dates for Broadcast TV's New and Returning Midseason Shows (Updating) RESPECT Sunday, March 21 at 9/8c Desperate for a hit, Aretha travels to Muscle Shoals in 1967 to record her first album with Atlantic Records.”
“See below for the list of “Genius: Aretha” episode descriptions and air dates.”
““Genius: Aretha” hails from 20th Television and Imagine Entertainment, in partnership with Warner Music Entertainment.”


"Read the original story 'genius: Aretha' Trailer: watch Cynthia erivo fight to keep her 'soul Queen' crown (video) in the packaging..."
"With the help of Clive Davis, she started a successful career in Arista and consolidated her eternal dominance as Queen of the soul in an unforgettable performance at Grammy in 1998."
"Franklin met her idol Clara ward."
At the same time, young re had his first tour experience with C.L. on the gospel tour in 1954
"It wasn't until March 21 (Sunday) at 10 / 9 degrees Celsius that the real sound appeared, and Aretha caught the attention of Atlantic record company Jerry Wexler in 1966."
"Franklin, church."
After losing her surrogate mother, in 1953, the little girl was in her father's C.L
"Also read: Here's the premiere date of radio and TV's new and returning mid season show (update). Respecting Sunday, March 21, 9 / 8 degrees Celsius, desperate hit, Aretha went to muscle bank in 1967 to record her first album with Atlantic Records."
The following is the plot description and broadcast date of "Genius: Aretha"
"Genius: Aretha" is from TV 20, working with Warner Music Entertainment company



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the New Black Mindy Kaling The Mindy Project Melissa McCarthy Mike Molly Amy Poehler Parks and Recreation Samira Wiley Orange is the New Black Best Actor in a Comedy Series Louis CK Louie Don Cheadle House of Lies Neil Patrick Harris How I Met Your Mother William H Macy Shameless...”
“Best Drama Series House of Cards Breaking Bad Sleepy Hollow The Good Wife Orphan Black Best Comedy Series Orange is the New Black Modern Family The Mindy Project Parks and Recreation Brooklyn 99 Best Actress in a Comedy Series Uzo Aduba Orange is the New Black Dannielle Brooks Orange is...”
“Cable provider HBO led the networks with a whopping 99 nominations, including 19 for the top-nominated program Game of Thrones.”
“Between its critically acclaimed series Orange is the New Black and House of Cards, Netflix garnered a total of 31 nominations, impressive for a network only in its second year at the Emmy’s.”
“Netflix has recently joined cable as an outlet for intense storytelling.”
“In the past few years, nominations have crept away from networks and toward cable television, which allows for gritty dramas, edgy comedies and a lower season episode count, which means overall less work for writers and production teams and some network folks aren’t happy about it.”
“Actress in a Comedy Series respectively...”
“Uzo Aduba Suzanne Crazy Eyes Warren and Natasha Lyonne Nicky Nichols joined Cox in the Outstanding Guest Actress category the only category with more than one person of color in it while Taylor Schilling Piper Kerman and Kate Mulgrew Galina Red Reznikov got nods in Best Actress and Best Supporting...”
“The binge-watch favorite earned 12 nominations in all, including a nomination for Best Comedy Series.”
“Orange is the New Black dominated the comedy category and helped offer some color to a very white ballot.”


“… The new black Mindy Carlin Mindy project Melissa McCarthy, Michael Molly, Emile Boller Park and entertainment Samira Willie orange is the new black best actor in the comedy series Louis don sheder lie house Neil Patrick Harris how I met your mother William H. Macy shameless... "
"Best drama series" house of cards "sleeping valley of destruction" good wife orphan "black best comedy series" orange is the new black modern family "Mindy project Park and entertainment Brooklyn 99 comedy series best actress uzzo aduba orange is the new black Danielle Brooks orange is..."
HBO, the cable provider, led the networks with 99 nominations, 19 of which were the highest for game of Thrones
"Netflix won 31 nominations in the highly acclaimed orange is the new black series and house of cards series, which left a deep impression on the Internet company at the Emmy Awards ceremony the next year."
"Netflix recently joined cable as a strong storytelling channel."
"In the past few years, nominations have gradually shifted from the Internet to cable TV, which allows rough dramas, avant-garde comedies and low number of season episodes, which means that the work of writers and production teams has generally decreased, and some Internet people are not satisfied with this."
"Actresses in comedy series..."
"Uzo aduba Suzanne crazy eyes Warren and Natasha Lyonne Nicky Nichols joined Cox's outstanding guest actress category, which is the only category with multiple people of color, while Taylor Schilling Piper Kerman and Kate mullina red reznikov were nominated for best actress and best supporting role..."
"The most popular Carnival watch received 12 nominations, including best comedy series."
"Orange is a new black, dominating the comedy category, adding some color to the very white vote."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“| Credit: Gwen Stefani/InstagramLove life aside, the show — the first of 25 — was all about the music and the experience, and Stefani left no doubt that she’s ready to headline a Vegas residency.”
“Image zoom Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton at the debut of her Las Vegas residency on June 27, 2018.”
“Gwen Stefani Kicks Off Vegas Residency Show with Blake Shelton on Hand: All the DetailsGwen Stefani is Las Vegas’ newest star… “holla” if you hear me.”
“On Wednesday night, Stefani kicked off her Las Vegas residency at Planet Hollywood’s Zappos Theater.”
“The show, titled Gwen Stefani — Just a Girl, is good.”
“In fact, it’s hella good.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is a crazy night, okay, because this is the first night.”
“I’ll remember this for the rest of my life, so you guys have a huge responsibility,” she told the sold-out crowd early into the show.”
““This is going to be an epic night tonight.”Over the course of 100 minutes, Stefani sang her biggest hits, touching on songs from her solo career and her career with No Doubt.”


Credit: Despite Gwen Stefani / instagram love's life, the first episode of this 25 episode is all about music and experience, and Stefani has no doubt that she is ready to make the headlines for residents in Las Vegas
"On June 27, 2018, Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton made their debut in Las Vegas."
"Gwen Stefani and Blake Sheldon started the Las Vegas lodging show together: all the details Gwen Stefani is the latest star in Las Vegas..." "Hello, if you hear me."
Stephanie started her internship in Las Vegas on Wednesday night at the Zappos theater in Hollywood
"It's a good play called Gwen Stephanie - just a girl."
"In fact, it's good."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a crazy night, well, because it's the first night."
"I'll remember that all my life, so you have a big responsibility," she told a packed audience at the beginning of the show
"Tonight will be an epic night." In 100 minutes, Stephanie sang her most popular songs, no doubt touching the songs of her solo career and career



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Rachel Murray/Getty Images for Glamour]”
“Stefani s return supposedly hasn t exactly been championed by The Voice crew...”
“After taking two seasons away from The Voice as a coach Gwen was back by her man s side when Season 12 of the NBC singing show kicked off but it turns out that not everyone was so happy to see Stefani and Shelton side by side as their romance...”
“...and PDA had some viewers reaching for the remote...”
“A number of viewers took to social media to voice their opinions during The Voice’s Season 12 premiere opener, with some even threatening to turn off the series to avoid Blake and Gwen’s flirting that played a big part in the first episode of the popular NBC series.”
““If the Blake and Gwen relationship is going to be this annoying every episode I [probably] won’t watch The Voice anymore,” Twitter user @claireecruz5 tweeted out of The Voice’s Season 12 premiere, while @j_alatoree added, “Blake and Gwen’s relationship has ruined The Voice for me.”
“They are already annoying me When u realize that it s going to be a long season of The Voice if Blake and Gwen keep flirting every 5 seconds TheVoice Twitter user makennaacypert wrote on the 140 character site during The Voice s Season 12 premiere alongside photos showing her...”
“...turning off the show after seeing Shelton and Stefani s gushing interactions...”
““@NBCTheVoice I wish the show was focused more on the talent than Gwen & Blake #annoying #TheVoice #ImOverIt #verydisappointing,” The Voice viewer @NicolFranz69 tweeted of Stefani’s flirty interactions with her boyfriend, while @riitaloretta wrote on the social media site during the premiere episode, “Gwen is so annoying on #thevoice.”
“She legit brings up her relationship with Blake every 5 seconds Gwen and Blake are nauseating The Voice fan alleb35 then added as Shelton and Stefani showed off their flirting and romance and I m gonna turn the show off Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton s romance which began after...”


"[Rachel Murray / Getty's best pictures]
"Stephanie's return should not be supported by voice group..."
"When NBC season 12 started, Gwen came back to her man after two seasons away, but it turns out that not everyone was so happy to see Stephanie and Sheldon side by side as their relationship..."
“… PDA lets some viewers reach for the remote control... "
"At the premiere of the 12th season of sound, many viewers expressed their opinions through social media, and some even threatened to turn off the show to avoid black and Gwen's flirtation, because it played an important role in the first episode of NBC's popular TV series."
"If every episode of Blake and Gwen's relationship is so annoying, I (probably) won't watch the voice anymore," tweeter @ claireecruz5 tweeted at the premiere of sound season 12, and @ j.alatoree added, "Blake and Gwen's relationship ruined my voice."
"When you realize that if Blake and Gwen flirt every five seconds, it's going to be a long voice season, they've got me pissed off," voice twitter user makenna acypert wrote on the 140 character website at the premiere of voice season 12, with her photo next to it
“… After seeing the endless interaction between Sheldon and Stefani, I turned off the show... "
"@ nbcthevoice I hope the show focuses more on genius than Gwen & Blake's annoying voice, imoverit's very dissatisfied, voice viewer @ nicolefranz69 tweets about Stefani's flirting with her boyfriend, while @ riitaloretta wrote on social media sites during the premiere," Gwen's annoying voice. "
"She mentions her relationship with Blake every five seconds. Gwen and Blake are disgusting. Fans alleb35 then add that Sheldon and Stephanie show their flirtation and romance. I'm going to turn off the romantic performances of Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon from..."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SO much to be grateful for every day, not just today. "”
“"Cherish them.”
“...to share pictures of their incredible Thanksgiving feasts...”
“The Kardashians led the way with photos of their tasty looking treats, with Khloe sharing a picture of a table heaving with flowers, candles and lots of expensive looking china as she took up hosting duties this year.”
““The key to contentment lies solely in being thankful for what one has been blessed with.”
“Stop looking at what you don’t have and pay attention to the blessings around you.”
“Manifest beauty in your life.”
“"Only then will one be blessed with more.”
“Happy Thanksgiving my loves,” the reality star wrote next to the picture.”
“Model Chrissy Teigen also took to Instagram to post a series of photos as she prepared a huge meal.”


"Thank you for every day, not just today."
"Cherish them."
“… Share photos of their incredible Thanksgiving meal... "
"The kardashians took the lead in taking pictures of their delicious food, Khloe shared a picture of a table full of flowers, candles and a lot of expensive looking porcelain, and she started working this year."
"The key to contentment is simply to be grateful for the blessings you receive."
"Don't look at what you don't have, pay attention to the blessings around you."
"Show beauty in your life."
"Only in this way can one get more blessings."
"Happy Thanksgiving, my love," the reality TV star wrote next to the photo
"Model Chris tegan also posted a series of photos on instagram while preparing a big meal."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...show.We'll be on romance watch!”
“They have to be a very special guy to be able to do that," she said on an episode of her E!”
“If I was in a relationship with a guy, I would enjoy being treated like that—opening doors for you, doing all what you think is the traditional stuff in a guy and a girl relationship.”
“I just don't see it.”
“I've got three very strong ex-wives.”
“I've been there done that.”
“"To be honest with you, I can't see myself dating women in the future.”
“Translation - she wants a boyfriend instead!”
“If these two are indeed dating, we're slightly surprised, as the I Am Cait star previously confessed that she didn't see herself being in a lesbian relationship.”
“Oh la la!The pair first met in November 2015 at the Glamour Women of the Year awards in NYC.”


"... performance. We're going to see a love movie
"They have to be a very special person to do that," she said in her e! "
"If I fall in love with a boy, I would like to be treated like this, open the door for you and do what you think is traditional in a relationship."
"I just can't see it."
"I have three very strong ex wives."
"I did it there."
"To tell you the truth, I don't see myself going out with women in the future."
"Translation - she wants a boyfriend!"
"We'd be a bit surprised if the two were really dating, because the" I'm Cain "star admitted before that she didn't think she was gay."
"Oh, la! The two met for the first time at the annual glamour women awards ceremony in New York in November 2015. "



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.”
“They even talked about flowers and a honeymoon."”
“Well, can you imagine her twirling in a white gown on her wedding day?”
“Hard, isn't it?”
“But fans of the stunning British actress have to prepare themselves for the sight as it is reported that Watson may be engaged and is preparing to tie the knot.”
“The shocking claim comes from Life & Style Magazine.”
“The tabloid claims that the actress has begun planning her "dream wedding" with her techie boyfriend.”
“The Harry Potter star has been rumoured to be dating William "Mack" Knight for nearly two years now and the couple are between wedding talks.”
“Also Read: Beauty and The Beast: Five Emma Watson outfits that eclipse the princess gownsThe news was broken by a diner who was sitting on another table close to Emma and Knight's at dinner in San Diego's Jupiter and Ivy.”
“The curious diner reportedly eves dropped their conversation and overheard the couple discussing their wedding plans.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below."
"They even talked about flowers and honeymoons."
"Well, can you imagine her spinning in her white robe on the wedding day?"
"It's hard, isn't it?"
"But fans of the amazing British actress have to be ready for the show, as it is reported that Watson may be engaged and ready to get married."
"The shocking story comes from life and fashion."
The tabloid claimed that the actress had started planning a "dream wedding" for her and her technical boyfriend
Harry Potter star is said to have been dating William McKnight for nearly two years and they are now in the middle of a wedding negotiation
"You can also read:" beauty and the beast: five Emma Watson dresses overshadow the princess dress. "The news was broken by a diner sitting at another table near Emma and knight's house while eating at Jupiter and ivy in San Diego
"It's reported that curious diner Eve interrupted their conversation and overheard the couple discussing their wedding plans."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Worked together: Jennifer and Justin are shown in a still from the 2012 comedy Wanderlust...”
“She rose to fame on the TV sitcom Friends and her film credits include Office Christmas Party, Cake and Marley & Me.”
“The Hollywood stars announced on Thursday they were separating after two and a half years of marriage.”
“In a statement released by their publicists they said the decision to split 'was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year'.”
“Mexican get away Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux are shown on January 1 during a vacation in Mexico that reportedly was a last ditch effort to save their marriage They were last photographed together on January 1 during a vacation in Cabo San Lucas with Jason 49 and his 49”
“...year old wife Amanda Anka...”
“'Jason Bateman’s wife convinced Justin to go to Cabo.”
“She has been the mediator in recent months, trying to get Jen and Justin to work through their problems and save their marriage,' a source told Us Weekly in an article on Thursday.”
“'The Cabo trip was a make or break vacation for Jen and Justin.”
“They went away with their friends hoping to have fun and work on it,' the insider said of the post-Christmas vacation.”


"Collaboration: Jennifer and Justin in the still life of the 2012 comedy vagabond..."
She became famous in the TV sitcom Friends. Her films include office Christmas party, cake and Marley and me
"Hollywood stars announced on Thursday that they were separated after two and a half years of marriage."
"In a statement issued by their public relations staff, they said that the decision to break up" was made amicably by both sides at the end of last year. "
"On January 1, Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux were on holiday in Mexico, the last effort to save their marriage, according to reports. The last time they took a group photo was on January 1, with Jason, 49, and his 49 year old son, while on holiday in Cabo San Lucas
“…… Amanda Anka, a 20-year-old wife... "
"Jason Bateman's wife convinced Justin to go to cabo."
"In recent months, she has been acting as a mediator trying to get Jane and Justin to solve their problems and save their marriage," a source said in an article in US weekly on Thursday
"The trip to cabo is a crucial holiday for Jan and Justin."
"They left with their friends, hoping to have a good time and work well," the person said of the post Christmas holiday



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the couple’s decision to put their baby plans on hold, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
““Not because of a change in her love for Blake,” explains the source, “but because she feels as if it might not be meant to be.” The country star is on board with her thoughts.”
““Gwen sat in the stands and was grooving along,” a concert-goer says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““Blake sang a lot in her direction.” At one point, he even shared a sweet detail of their home life, says the witness: “Their dog was having puppies and they couldn’t wait to get home!”For now, those furry family members are serving as surrogates of sorts.”
““Blake and Gwen have decided to put plans to have a baby on hold,” an insider shares in the new issue.”
““Their feeling is if it happens naturally, great.”
“But they’ve decided to not focus on it for the time being.”Stefani, 48, and Shelton, 41, have been trying to conceive for over a year, the source reveals.”
“But the one blessing of their struggle is that it’s made them stronger than ever.”
“The source says Shelton is “absolutely devoted” to Gwen’s sons, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9, and Apollo, 4: “Blake is extremely attentive, loving and doting towards Gwen and the boys.”Shelton’s devotion is part of what made the couple try for a child together.”
““Blake has always wanted children,” explains a friend.”


"For more information about the couple's decision to suspend their family planning, please read the new issue of American weekly and start now."
"It's not because her love for black has changed," the source explained, "but because she feels it may not be predestined." The country star was on the boat with her ideas
"Gwen is sitting in the stands and walking," one concert goer said in the new issue of American weekly
"Black sang a lot to her." On one occasion, he even shared the sweet details of their family life. The witness said: "their dog gave birth to a puppy, and they can't wait to go home! "At the moment, those furry family members are acting as surrogate mothers of all kinds."
"Black and Gwen decided to postpone their plans to have children," an insider said in the IPO
"Their feeling is that if it happens naturally, that's great."
Stefani, 48, and Sheldon, 41, have been trying to conceive for more than a year, sources said
"But one of the benefits of their struggle is that it makes them stronger than ever before."
The source said Sheldon was "absolutely loyal" to Gwen's sons Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4), "black was very concerned, loving and doting on Gwen and the children." Sheldon's loyalty is one of the reasons why the couple want to have children together
"Black always wanted to have children," a friend explained



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on Nicole and Keith, pick up the latest issue of In Touch magazine, on newsstands now!”
““They addressed a range of issues, including emotional intimacy, and focused on the root of their problems as they learned to break down walls and start working on their issues rather than plastering over the cracks,” the insider explains.”
““He gave her an ultimatum.”But in Vermont, the pair were side by side as they hashed out their problems.”
“The Lion actress resisted and only relented when Keith threatened to leave for good.”
““It was Keith’s idea to visit the boot camp,” says the insider.”
“The trip to Vermont marked their final attempt to patch things up.”
““It was an extremely emotional and testing few days.”The couple, who share daughters Sunday, 9, and Faith, 7, “have been fighting constantly over Nicole’s incessant jealousy and need to control Keith on every level,” adds the insider.”
“...insider tells In Touch exclusively of the pair...”
“In Touch has learned that Nicole Kidman and husband of nearly 12 years Keith Urban had a five day visit to Marriage Quest a private counseling retreat located in Cabot Vt Nicole and Keith went for an emergency stay an...”


"To learn more about Nicole and Keith, check out the latest issue of in touch magazine."
"They solved a series of problems, including emotional intimacy, and focused on the root cause of the problem, because they learned to tear down walls and start solving their own problems instead of painting cracks," the person explained
"He gave her an ultimatum." But in Vermont, the two discussed their problems side by side
"When Keith threatened to leave forever, the lion actress refused and just gave in."
"It was Keith's idea to visit the boot camp," the person familiar with the matter said
"The trip to Vermont marked their last attempt to fix the problem."
"It was a very emotional and testing day." The couple, who share their daughter's Sunday, 9th and 7th beliefs, "have been fighting for Nicole's constant jealousy and need to control Keith at all levels," the source added
“… Insiders have exclusive coverage of the two in contact... "
"In contact, we learned that Nicole Kidman and her husband Keith Urban had a five-day visit to their marriage for private consultation in the past 12 years. The retreat is located in Cabot vt. Nicole and Keith went to an emergency stop



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
“...an impressive estimated net worth of 15 million himself...”
“...putting up a fight...”
“An insider tells In Touch exclusively that the iconic singer, 68, is preparing a prenup to make sure his daughter is protected financially should the controversial duo tie the knot.”
““Lionel’s preparing a $200 million prenup,” the insider tells In Touch exclusively.”
“He hates Scott and has tried to tell Sofia to leave him but she won t With an estimated net worth of 200 million Lionel is seeing fit that his daughter s beau never sees any of it once she...”
“...inherits it...”
““Lionel is a multimillionaire and Sofia has a huge trust fund,” another source adds.”
“He doesn t want Scott getting a cent of it Of course Scott doesn t really have any reason to be a gold digger with 15 seasons of reality TV and countless hosting gigs under his belt he s earned...”
“In the past, Lionel has made his feelings about Scott and Sofia’s relationship known — while trying his best not to alienate his teenage daughter.”


"For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please register for our press release!"
“…… His own net assets are estimated to be as high as 15 million.... "
“… Fight... "
"An insider told contact exclusive that the 68 year old idol singer is preparing a prenuptial agreement to ensure that his daughter is financially protected if the controversial couple marries."
"Lionel is preparing a $200 million prenuptial agreement," the insider told touch exclusively
"He hates Scott and tries to tell Sophia to leave him, but she won't think with an estimated net worth of 200 million Lionel is suitable, and his daughter's boyfriend never sees anything once she..."
“… Inherit it... "
"Lionel is a multimillionaire and Sofia has a huge trust fund," another source added
"He doesn't want Scott to get a cent out of it. Of course, Scott has no reason to be a gold digger with 15 reality shows and countless concerts. He made..."
"In the past, Lionel has made public how he feels about Scott's relationship with Sophia - while trying not to alienate his teenage daughter."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Justin will be able to prove to Mandy that he’s changed?”
“When will they reunite!!?”
“After that, though, they went their separate ways — she spent time in Texas and New York, while he took a ski trip, spent a few days in Dubai, and then headed to the Maldives with Patti.”
“They were in Mexico for New Year’s Eve, then returned to California together and were spotted at a pilates class on Jan. 3.”
“Meanwhile, it’s been quite a bit of time since we’ve actually seen Justin and Selena together.”
“Justin truly hopes Selena and Mandy can form a great bond just like he now has with his own mom.”Selena hasn’t commented on the ongoing drama she’s having with her mom.”
“Justin wants to show Mandy that he has matured immensely, and that he can be to Selena what she is to him — his rock and support.”
““He feels terrible for Selena that her mother won’t accept him, and sympathizes with her and what she’s dealing with.”
““It serves as a display of what he’s hoping Selena can achieve with her mother someday,” our inside says.”
“Justin and Patti have drifted apart in their own right over the years, but are bonding in “paradise” on their trip.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Justin can prove to Mandy that he has changed?"
"When will they get together!!"
After that, though, they parted ways - she spent some time in Texas and New York, while he went skiing, spent a few days in Dubai, and then went to Maldives with Patty
"They spent new year's day in Mexico, then went back to California together, and were found in Pilates class on January 3."
"At the same time, we haven't really seen Justin and Selena together for a long time."
"Justin really wants Serena and Mandy to build a great bond like he and his mother do now." Selena didn't comment on the drama she and her mother were playing
"Justin wants to show Mandy that he's very mature and he can be what Selena is to him - his rock and roll and support."
"He felt sorry for Selena because her mother didn't accept him and he sympathized with her and everything she faced."
"It's a show that he hopes Serena and her mother can achieve one day," our insiders said
Over the years, Justin and Patty have been estranged from each other, but they are closely related in "heaven" on their journey



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Had Everyone Talking...”
“All Of Them Inside The Rise And Fall Of Glam Rockers Poison VIDEOS I Was Fighting To Take Total Control Of The Band Dee Snider Admits He Was At Fault For Twisted Sister s Split VIDEOS After Being Called Unrecognizable Demi Moore Finally Speaks About The Surprise Runway Experience That...”
“Ryan Reynolds Diddy David Beckham Are Leaving It To Mixologists On Super Bowl Sunday Watch The Hilarious Clip VIDEOS I Have A Butthole In My Chin Watch NFL Star Tom Brady Read Mean Tweets About Himself Ahead Of Super Bowl LV VIDEOS The Substance Abuse Was Taking A Toll On...”
“Video VIDEOS I Couldn t Even Get Out Of Bed Dog The Bounty Hunter Discusses Terrifying COVID 19 Scare With Dr Oz VIDEOS Spit Take...”
“VIDEOS The Weeknd Puts Full Face On Display At Halftime Show But Receives Abysmal Reviews Watch VIDEOS Watch Eric Church Jazmine Sullivan Sing The Super Bowl LV National Anthem VIDEOS It s The Highlight Of My Life Kylie Jenner Does Caitlyn Jenner s Makeup For The First Time See The...”


"Everyone is talking..."
"They're all in the rise and fall poison video of Glam rockers, and I'm fighting for complete control of the band Dee Snider, who admitted that he was at fault with the split video of twisted sister. After being called the unrecognized Demi Moore, he finally talked about the amazing experience of t-channel, which is..."
"Ryan Reynolds Dee David Beckham is going to show a funny video clip to a tuner at the Super Cup on Sunday. I have an asshole on my chin. Watch NFL star Tom Brady read a bad tweet about himself before the Super Cup LV video. Drug abuse is causing damage..."
"Video I can't even get out of bed dog bounty hunter to discuss the terrible video of cowid 19 and Dr. oz spitting with menace..."
"The video showed a full face at half-time this week, but received bad reviews. Watch the video watch Eric church jazmin Sullivan sing the Super Bowl LV national anthem. This is the highlight of my life. Kelly Jenner makes up katerin Jenner for the first time..."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us here!”
“HollywoodLifers, what are your opinions on The Weeknd dating Justin’s ex?”
“Find out if he’s upset here!”
“The Weeknd, 27, was recently seen getting cozy with Justin Bieber‘s ex, Yovanna Ventura, 21, and we have the real answer on whether or not it’s bothering Justin, who is now reportedly dating The Weeknd’s ex, Selena Gomez, 25.”
““Justin couldn’t care less about The Weeknd dating Yovanna,” a source EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““Justin’s got his eye on the prize, which of course, is Selena.”
“Justin is determined not to make the same mistakes that he’s made in the past, so he’s reigning in any insecurities and keeping his jealousy in check.”
“Justin is also allowing Selena to set the pace when it comes to their relationship, instead of strong arming her as he’s done previously.”
“Justin’s so grateful to be given another shot at dating Selena, and he’s doing everything in his power to not mess it up.”
“Justin thinks it’s serendipitous that Selena’s come back to him at the time he’s decided to take a career break, because it means he can totally focus on her and they can spend some real quality time together.”


"Tell us!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of dating Justin's ex on the weekend?"
"See if he's not happy here!"
"This 27 year old weekend, someone recently saw him with Justin Bieber's ex girlfriend, 21-year-old Jovanna Ventura. We know whether this problem bothers Justin. It is reported that Justin is now dating this weekend's ex girlfriend, 25-year-old Serena Gomez."
"Justin doesn't care at all about his date with uvana at the weekend," an exclusive told reporters Hollywood life. "
"Justin has his eye on the prize, Serena, of course."
"Justin is determined not to make the mistakes he made in the past, so he dominates any sense of insecurity and controls his jealousy."
"Justin also allowed Selena to adjust the rhythm of their relationship instead of arming her as strongly as he used to."
"Justin is very grateful for the opportunity to date Selena again. He's doing his best not to screw things up."
"Justin thinks it's a coincidence that Selena came back to him when he decided to take a career break, because it means that he can completely focus on her and they can spend some really quality time together."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think Eminem should reconsider and run for office, HollywoodLifers?”
“The nonsense and the baggage that comes with politics especially running for President would be outrageous While Eminem is no stranger to being outrageous and causing a controversy or two especially about Donald Trump seems politics are just not his...”
“After Eminem tore into Donald Trump with a savage freestyle rap, HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE scoop on whether or not he’ll ‘pull a Kanye’ and run for office!”
“In a world where a real estate mogul/former reality television star can be elected to the highest office in the land, the idea of Eminem, 44, launching a presidential bid isn’t that farfetched.”
“Some fans were hoping Em (born Marshall Mathers) would declare his candidacy after he lyrically demolished President Donald Trump, 71, at the start of the 2017 BET Hip-Hop Awards.”
““Eminem is very happy that his take down of Trump is getting so much attention,” a source close to the rapper EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““He feels that he has to use his gift for good and dropping the rap is his way to get his message out there.”“As for taking it to the political stage and to run for office in any way?”
“Not a chance in the world,” the insider tells HollywoodLife.com, crushing the hopes of anyone wanting an Eminem 2020 campaign sticker.”
““Marshall is not going to pull a Kanye [West] and announce his candidacy.”
“...jam...”


"Do you think Eminem should reconsider and run for office, Hollywood star?"
"The nonsense and burden brought about by politics, especially running for president, will be indignant, and Eminem is no stranger. It will cause one or two disputes, especially the dispute about Donald Trump. It seems that politics is not his..."
"After Eminem attacked Donald Trump with savage freestyle rap, Hollywood life reported exclusively whether he would" pull a Kanye "to run for office!"
"In a world where a real estate tycoon / former reality TV star can be elected to the highest office in the country, the idea of 44 year old Eminem running for president is not so far fetched."
"Some fans hope that EM (born in Marshall Mathers) will announce his candidacy at the start of the 2017 best hip-hop awards ceremony by slamming 71 year old president Donald Trump."
A source close to the rapper told reporters exclusively: "Eminem is very happy that he has attracted so much attention to trump's stepping down." Hollywood life. "
"He felt that he had to make good use of his talent, and giving up rap was his way of conveying information." "As for bringing it to the political arena and running for office in any way?"
"There's no chance in the world," the insider told Hollywood life. Com, shattering the hopes of anyone who wants the campaign sticker for Eminem 2020
"Marshall will not woo Kanye (West) to announce his candidacy."
“… Jam... "



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The more time that goes by, I guess, the closer you’d be getting to that.””
“I don’t think it’s anytime soon or anything,” Shelton said when asked about walking down the aisle.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani weren t always so sure their romance was built to stand the test of time Blake Shelton Says He and Gwen Stefani Thought Their Relationship Was a Rebound Deal at First Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani weren t always so sure their romance was built...”
“...to stand the test of time...”
“During a preview of the singer’s upcoming Sunday TODAY with Willie Geist interview, Shelton, 42, admitted that both he and Stefani, 48, initially thought their relationship was strictly a “rebound.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““When I was going through my divorce, I hit rock bottom, just like anybody does when they go through something that devastating,” Shelton told Geist.”
“It s a miracle that I met somebody that was going through the same exact thing that I was at the exact same moment in time Continuing he added If Gwen and I were being honest right now talking about this I think in the back of our minds we...”
“...both kind of thought This is a rebound deal Image zoom Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani Credit John Shearer ACMA2018 Getty Shelton went on to say that neither of them were sure things would become serious because they were both coming out of a pretty low spot in our lives...”
“...and were kind of clinging to each other to get through this But now here we are going on three years later and every day that goes by it just feels like a stronger bond between the two of us and it constantly feels like it s going to the...”


"I think the longer it takes, the closer you get to that goal."
"I don't think it's short-term or anything," Sheldon said when asked to walk down the aisle
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Black Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are not always so sure that their love will stand the test of time. Blake Sheldon said he and Gwen Stefani saw their relationship as a rebound deal in the first place. Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are not always so sure that their love is built together... "
"To stand the test of time"
Sheldon, 42, admitted in Sunday's preview of the interview with Willie geist that both he and Stefani, 48, initially thought their relationship was a "rebound.". Get news, feature, etc
"When I went through divorce, I fell to the bottom, just like anyone who went through something devastating," Shelton told gaster
"It's a miracle that I meet someone who experiences the same thing at the same time as me," he added, adding that if Gwen and I are honest about this now, I think deep down in our hearts, we... "
“… Both of them think it's a rebound trading picture zooming black Shelton and Gwen Stephanie credit John shearer ACMA 2018 Getty Shelton went on to say that they're not sure things will get serious because they're both out of a pretty low ebb in our lives... "
“…… We spent this time holding each other tightly, but now we are going to leave in three years. Every day feels like a stronger bond between us. It constantly makes people feel that it is going to... "



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stepping out in a gorgeous blue dress, fans went wild that Kate could be dropping a hint that she is expecting another baby boy.”
“(Image: Getty)Kate recently made her first public appearance since announcing her pregnancy, at a reception at Buckingham Palace.”
“She’s no longer the star of the show."”
“"And for Kate, that’s what is troubling her right now.”
“In other words, they are the royal family’s new A-list stars.”
“"They are young, their romance is fresh and most importantly, they’ve got a bright future ahead of them.”
“(Image: Getty)The source continued: "Kate Middleton can get pregnant with ten royal babies, yet the press will still focus on Harry and Meghan and how perfect they are for each other.”
“Kate Middleton knows that Meghan Markle will be a real royal threat the moment she officially becomes a member of the British royal family."”
“"Forget Queen Elizabeth and Camilla Parker-Bowles.”
“"She knows how to work a red carpet and she definitely knows how to pose for a camera in ways that Kate Middleton can only dream of doing herself.”


"Going out in a gorgeous blue dress, fans said frantically that Kate might hint that she was going to have another boy."
(photo: Getty) Kate recently made her first public appearance at a reception at Buckingham Palace, announcing her pregnancy
"She is no longer the star of the play."
"For Kate, that's what's bothering her now."
"In other words, they are the new A-level stars of the royal family."
"They are young, their love is fresh, and most importantly, they have a bright future ahead of them."
(photo: Getty) the source added: "Kate Middleton can have 10 Royal babies, but the media will still pay attention to Harry and Megan and how perfect they are to each other."
"Kate Middleton knows that Megan markel will be a real Royal threat at the moment she officially becomes a member of the British royal family."
"Forget Queen Elizabeth and Camilla Parker Bowles."
"She knows how to work on the red carpet, and she certainly knows how to put on the pose Kate Middleton has always wanted."



**Something goes wrong**
“William and Kate have already adopted a more modern attitude to parenting than their parents and grandparents, sending George to a local Montessori nursery in Norfolk and then onto Thomas’s in Battersea, where he recently had his first day of school.”
“In a clip from her 90th birthday celebrations last year the Queen was also seen telling William to ‘get up’ when the family appeared on the balcony to wave at crowds – he was crouching down to show George the planes doing a fly over.”
“When you purchase through links on our site, we may earn commission on some of the items you choose to buy.”
“Who do you think is in the right?”
“The Queen is reportedly ‘livid’ with Prince William and his wife the Duchess of Cambridge.”
“According to Life & Style magazine, a dispute has sprung up over a conversation about Kate’s royal duties.”
“Prince William had called the Queen to suggest that his wife – who is pregnant with their third child – scale back her royal duties permanently.”
“Kate wants her public appearances kept to a minimum and he s 100 behind her the source told the publication adding that the conversation was quite icy Kate is reportedly more comfortable in her role as a full time mother to George 4 and Charlotte 2 than as a working...”
“...royal...”
“The Duchess of Cambridge is currently patron to a number of charities, including The Art Room, National Portrait Gallery, East Anglia’s Children’s Hospice and Action on Addiction.”


William and Kate have adopted a more modern parenting attitude than their parents and grandparents, sending George to the local Montessori nursery in Norfolk and then to Thomas in Battersea, where he recently attended his first day of school
"In a clip of the celebration of the Queen's 90th birthday last year, people also saw that when the Williams family appeared on the balcony and waved to the crowd, the queen told William to" get up "- William was squatting down to show George how the plane was flying."
"When you buy through the links on our website, we may earn a commission on some of the items you choose to buy."
"Who do you think is right?"
"It is reported that the queen is" furious "with Prince William and his wife, the Duchess of Cambridge."
According to lifestyle magazine, a conversation about Kate's Royal duties has sparked a debate
"Prince William called the queen to advise his wife with a third child to permanently reduce Royal duties."
"Kate wants her public appearances to be kept to a minimum, and he is the 100 source behind her, told the publication, adding that the conversation is rather cold and that Kate is said to be more comfortable as a full-time mother than George 4 and Charlotte 2 as a job..."
“… "Royal..."
"The Duchess of Cambridge is currently a patron of many charities, including the art room, the National Portrait Gallery, the East Anglia children's shelter and the drug rehabilitation operation."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"While Meghan's hoping she won't have problems conceiving when they start trying for a family, she's also aware she'll be almost 37 by the time she does," says our insider.”
“...source tells Woman s Day exclusively...”
“Melanie was at Nottingham Cottage for around an hour checking Meghan s vitals looking into her health history and taking as much information as possible to devise a specialist diet for both her and Harry to stick to a palace...”
“And palace sources say they want to be in tiptop shape to fall pregnant as soon as possible after their wedding.”
“As Meghan Markle moved into Nottingham Cottage after her engagement to Prince Harry, she was deluged with deliveries, well-wishes and guests dropping by to welcome her to the fold.”
“But there was one particular visitor who raised eyebrows when she called in on 36-year-old Meghan at her new home - nutritionist Melanie Brown.”
“Based in a clinic just a stone's throw from Kensington Palace, Melanie specialises in fertility, pregnancy and preconception nutrition.”


"While Megan hopes that when they start working for a family, she won't have a problem with pregnancy, she also realizes that by then she will be almost 37," our insider said
“… The source specifically told women's Day
"Melanie stayed at Nottingham villa for about an hour to check Megan's vital signs, check her health history, collect as much information as possible, and design a special diet plan for her and Harry, so that they can stay in the palace..."
"There is also news from the palace that they hope to get pregnant as soon as possible in the best condition after the wedding."
After her engagement to Prince Harry, Megan markel moved into a hut in Nottingham filled with gift givers, benefactors and guests
"But one of her guests, when she visited 36 year old Megan's new home, caught her attention - nutritionist Melanie brown."
"Melanie's clinic is just a step away from Kensington Palace, specializing in fertility, pregnancy and pre pregnancy nutrition."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He thinks it’s “kind of flattering” that people care about his love life.”
““But now, Sofia spends a lot of time at Scott’s, so Kourtney allowed her to meet the kids.”RELATED VIDEO: Kendall Jenner Shades Scott Disick and Girlfriend Sofia Richie’s Age Gap on InstagramAs for Disick?”
““Kourtney didn’t think it would last and she never thought Sofia was going to meet her kids,” the insider said.”
“According to the insider, Kardashian, who is currently dating 25-year-old Younes Bendjima, initially assumed it was just a fling when she found out her ex had moved on with Richie.”
““Like most people, she thinks Sofia is way too young for him and doesn’t get it,” the insider said.”
“Image zoom From left: Kourtney Kardashian, Scott Disick, Sofia Richie | Credit: Paul Archuleta/FilmMagic; Mat Hayward/Getty Images; Matteo Prandoni/BFA/REX/ShutterstockEarlier this year, an insider told PEOPLE that Kardashian didn’t react positively to the romance at first.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Scott is a great dad when he has his life together.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““Kourtney feels confident that Scott and Sofia takes good care of the kids.”
““Sofia is helping Scott be a better, healthier person,” the source tells PEOPLE.”


"He thinks it's flattering that people care about his love life."
"But now, Sophia spends a lot of time at Scott's, so Courtney allows her to see the kids." Related video: Kendall Jenner casts a shadow over Scott disek's age gap with his girlfriend Sophia Ritchie on instagram as? "
"Courtney didn't know how long it would last, and she never thought Sophia would meet her children," the person said
"According to people familiar with the matter, Kardashian is currently dating 25-year-old yones bengima. When she found out that her ex girlfriend had moved with rich, she initially thought it was just an indulgence."
"Like most people, she thinks Sophia is too young for him to understand," the person said
"Left: Courtney Kardashian, Scott Disick, Sophia Ritchie; photo sources: Paul aculetta / film magic; matt Hayward / Getty pictures; and Matteo prandoni / BFA / Rex / shutterstock. Earlier this year, a person familiar with the matter told people that Kardashian didn't initially react positively to the relationship."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Scott is a great father when he has his life together," want to keep up with the latest people? "
"Courtney believes Scott and Sophia will take good care of the children."
"Sophia is helping Scott become a better, healthier person," the source told people



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“"I’m having the best birthday and so much of it is because of all of you.”
“Jennifer Garner stayed warm and cozy on Tuesday by wearing a multi-colored and oversized scarf (reminiscent of Lenny Kravitz's infamous outerwear he wore in 2012) while out with her gal pals in L.A. on her birthday.”
“The former Alias star, who turned 46 this week, outfitted the knitted scarf with sporty black leggings, a gray zip-up jacket, red-white-and-blue sneakers and tortoiseshell shades.”
“Her brunette tresses were up in a long ponytail and she carried a water bottle, coffee cup and her phone in one hand.”
“BG004/Bauer-Griffin/GC ImagesGarner later revealed on Instagram that that the massive scarf was a birthday gift from her daughter Seraphina.”
“"When your nine year old weaves a 12ft long scarf on a peg loom for your birthday present, you’d better #werk #fashionfriday #thecarpoollineismyrunway #proudmom," she captioned another pic of her colorful fashion statement.”
“The actress appeared to have been in good spirits during her birthday, turning herself into a meme and taking to Instagram to thank everyone for their well wishes.”
“Thank you for the birthday love!”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Garner Celebrated Her Birthday By Turning Herself Into a MemeJennifer Garner Gets a Sweet Birthday Shout-Out From Her Culinary Idol Ina GartenJennifer Garner and Ben Affleck Attend Church Together With Their Kids: Pics!”


Related libraries
"I had the best birthday because of all of you."
"On her birthday in Los Angeles on Tuesday, Jennifer Garner wore a multicolor scarf (reminiscent of Lenny Kravitz's infamous coat in 2012) to keep her warm and comfortable."
The former pseudonym, who turned 46 this week, outfitted the knitted scarf with sporty black tights, a grey zipper jacket, red, white and Blue Sneakers and hawksbill goggles
She has dark brown hair with a long ponytail and a water bottle, coffee cup and mobile phone in one hand
"Bg004 / Bauer Griffin / GC imagesgarner later revealed on instagram that the huge scarf was a birthday present from her daughter Serafina."
"When your nine-year-old weaves a 12 foot scarf on a pin loom as a birthday present, you'd better" werk fashion Friday, "carpoollines is myrunway" prodmom, "she wrote under the title of another colorful picture of her fashion manifesto
"The actress seems to be in a good mood during her birthday, turning herself into a meme and thanking everyone for their blessings on instagram."
"Thank you for your birthday present!"
"Embedded code restart" content: in order to celebrate her birthday, Jennifer Garner turned herself into a celebrity. Garner got a sweet birthday cheer from her cooking idols ina Garten, Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck attending church with their children: pictures



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We know that Camilla is a fan of the skirt suit, but she also knows how to elevate the look.”
“...style sensibilities...”
“Kate wore a long sleeve dress with a square neckline and an accentuated waist a very classic look that displayed the small design details she loves while Meghan wore a structural off the shoulder silhouette that featured her more modern...”
“While the duchesses followed the unofficial color theme, self-expression was clear.”
“Parker Bowles taking part...”
“At the 2018 Trooping the Colour Queen Elizabeth II s birthday parade celebration not to be confused with her actual birthday on April 21 pastels were a plenty among the royals with the queen Kate Middleton Meghan Markle and Camilla...”
“Three duchesses, three very distinct styles.”


"We know Camilla is a fan of dresses, but she also knows how to improve her look."
“… Style sensitivity... "
"Kate is wearing a long sleeve dress with a square neckline, highlighting the waist, which is a very classic shape, showing her favorite small design details, while Megan is wearing a structural off shoulder silhouette, reflecting her more modern characteristics..."
"Although the Duchess follow the unofficial color theme, their self-expression is clear."
"Park Bowles is in..."
"At the birthday parade of Queen Elizabeth II on April 21, 2018, there are a large number of pastel designs among members of the British royal family, including Queen Kate Middleton, Megan Markle and Camilla..."
"Three Duchess, three distinct styles."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Case closed on the Mystery of the Great Straight Lady Desire for Angelina Jolie.”
“Girl power!”
“And not in the Carrie Bradshaw sense (you know—sex, shoes, fashion, NYC, girls' night out!, cosmos); rather, admired for her sexuality as much as for being a good person and mom.”
“Examples please, Ms. Wolf:1.”
“It all started with her early roles like Girl, Interrupted and Tomb Raider, which established her as "sexy and daring, confrontational and independent."”
“That set the stage for everything else.”
“2.”
“Then she adopted Maddox.”
“"Suddenly, she seemed more mature, more beautiful, and more serious" and made single motherhood look awesome.”
“"She was reframing single motherhood from a state of lack or insufficiency to a glamorous, unfettered lifestyle choice," Wolf suggests.”


"This case ends the mystery of this great heterosexual woman's desire for Angelina Jolie."
"The power of girls!"
"Not Carrie Bradshaw (you know sex, shoes, fashion, New York, girls' night! To be more precise, she appreciates her sexuality and being a good person and mother
"Give me an example, ma'am. Wolf: 1
"It all started with her early roles, such as girl, interruption and Tomb Raider, which established her as" sexy and bold, confrontational and independent. "
"It lays the foundation for everything else."
“2.”
"And then she adopted Maddox."
"All of a sudden, she looks more mature, more beautiful and more serious," which makes single mothers look great
"She's transforming single mothers from a state of scarcity or inadequacy into a glamorous, unrestrained lifestyle," Wolff suggests



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Smith said she now loves wrapping her hair because it makes her feel “like a queen.””
“"When I looked at it from that perspective it did settle me," she added.”
“Smith, 46, opened up in Tuesday’s episode “Red Table Talk” on Facebook about undergoing several tests to determine why she’s been losing her hair.”
“She said some professionals told her it was stress while others said she has alopecia, an autoimmune skin disease that causes hair loss.”
““A lot of people have been asking why I’ve been wearing turbans,” Smith said.”
““Well, I haven’t talked about it.”
“It s not easy to talk about but I am going to talk about it JADA PINKETT SMITH S DAUGHTER WILLOW REVEALS HER STRUGGLE WITH SELF HARM I WAS CUTTING MYSELF The actress recalled the terrifying moment when she was in the shower and handfuls of hair fell into her...”
“...hands...”
“She added that she loved her “big, thick beautiful hair.”“Oh my God, am I going bald?” Smith recalled thinking.”
“She added, “It was one of those times in my life where I was literally shaking in fear.”


Smith said she now likes to wrap her hair up because it makes her feel "like a queen"
"When I look at it from this perspective, it really calms me down," she added
Smith, 46, revealed on Tuesday's Facebook show "red table talk" that she is undergoing a number of tests to determine why she lost her hair
"Some professionals told her it was stress, while others said she had hair loss, an autoimmune skin disease that causes hair loss," she said
"A lot of people are asking me why I wear a headscarf," Smith said
"Well, I haven't said that yet."
"It's not easy to say, but what I want to say is that jarda pinkert Smith's daughter willow has exposed her struggle against self harm. I cut myself, and the actress recalled the terrible moment when she took a bath and dropped her hair on her..."
“… Hands... "
She added that she liked her "big, thick and beautiful hair." "Oh, my God, am I going bald?"? "Smith recalled what he thought at that time."
She added: "it was the scariest time of my life."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““Jen is in revenge mode and Emma needs to recognize that she’s messing with somebody with a lot of loyal Hollywood friends.”We pay for juicy info!”
““This is a pattern for Jen, never directing the rage or gossip at the guy who left her but instead at the next woman he hooks up with.”And Stone should be warned, the source told Radar.”
““I don’t think she realizes who she messed with and how far Jen’s reach is.”But the fury at Stone is not unlike her fury at Angelina Jolie, who famously stole her husband Brad Pitt away from her.”
““Jen and her squad take issue with the fact that Emma never met a role she couldn’t steal from another actress [most famously ‘La La Land’ from Emma Watson],” the insider snitched and said Stone was in for a rude awakening.”
“Aniston took digs at Stone’s Hollywood reputation too.”
““She’s dragging Emma every chance she gets and warning pals like Jason Bateman and Jimmy Kimmel to avoid her.”As Radar previously reported, Aniston is “fuming” over their now public romance.”
““It bugs the hell out of Jen that Justin got close to Emma during their marriage and she isn’t taking this lying down,” a source close to the Friends star told Radar.”
“As Radar previously reported, Theroux and Stone have been jetting all over the world together, a relationship that is driving his ex-wife crazy.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Jane is in revenge mode, and Emma needs to realize that she's dating someone who has a lot of loyal Hollywood friends." We pay for interesting information! "
"It's Jane's model of never pointing anger or gossip at the man who left her, but at the next woman he's hooking up with." Sources told radar that stone should be warned
"I don't think she's aware of who she's pissed off or how far Jennifer's tentacles are." But stone's anger is no different from her anger at Angelina Jolie, who robbed her husband Brad Pitt from her
"Jennifer and her team are dissatisfied that Emma has never met a character she can't steal from another actress (the most famous is Emma Watson's laladi)," whispered people familiar with the situation, and stone will suddenly wake up
"Aniston is also making fun of stone's reputation in Hollywood."
"She pulls Emma as soon as she gets a chance and warns friends like Jason Bateman and Jimmy Kimmel not to come near her." As radar reported earlier, Aniston was "infuriated" by their now open relationship
"Justin got close to Emma in their marriage, which makes Jennifer very angry. She won't ignore it," a source close to friends told radar
"As radar reported earlier, serrux and stone have been flying around the world together, and this relationship drives his ex-wife crazy."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It deadass wasn't going to be called something boring like Brenda.”
“...asking what she s supposed to do with her stripper name pic twitter com BpTFnwpcSa TheBetterNathan I don t know why everyone is so surprised Kylie named her baby Stormi...”
“Kylie Jenner just name her baby Stormi pic twitter com dXkqs2ecjI marvelfantrash Kylie is most definitely going to name her child Mariposa Kylie Stormi Me pic twitter com nhH9KT2E7E itsviridianaaa Kylie s baby name is stormi that s so cute...”
“I said wait what They replied with it was a Dream pic twitter com QhOlrCZLkJ jorialajoy so in the Kardashian s family there s a reign and a stormi so Khloe better name her kid cloudie or lightning capri530 Did...”
“...with the chance of Reign in the North of Chicago...”
“...my little pony character ybnadam All I think of when I hear Stormi is Stormzy pic twitter com h9KbPGkmP5 aaishcreme Stormi judging North Chicago and Penelope in 2029 pic twitter com bHamtmHyHs JUSTlNW Somebody just said It will be Stormi...”
“LouisPeitzman we weathered the Stormi together kylie and travis talking to one another in a baby voice and accidentally naming their child mRiah what kind of a fuckin name is stormi i m so disappointed she sounds like a fuckin...”
“...pic.twitter.com/W4jAJegvlW @svershbowIt's so 2018 that we now have to deal with multiple spellings of the name Stormy/Stormi.”
“Please.”
“Right, guys?”


"It won't be called something as boring as Brenda."
“… Ask her what to do with her stripper name pic twitter com bptfnwpcsa the better nanthan I don't know why everyone is so surprised that Kelly named her baby stormi... "
"Kylie Jenner named her baby stormi pic twitter com dxkqs2ecji marvelfantrash. Kylie will definitely name her baby Mariposa Kylie stormi me pic twitter com nhh9kt2e7e itsviridianaaa. Kylie's baby's name is stormi, so cute..."
"I said wait, what they answered was a dream. On twitter, Kardashian's family had a rule and a storm, so Khloe had better name her child cloudie or lighting capri530..."
“… Have a chance to rule north of Chicago... "
“… My pony character ybnadam when I heard that stormi was stormzy pic twitter com h9kbpgkmp5 aaishcreme, and stormi judged North Chicago and Penelope pic twitter com bhammhyhs justlnw in 2029, someone just said it would be stormi, everything I thought about... "
"Louise bitzman, we went through the storm together. Kelly and Travis talked in a baby's voice and accidentally named their child mriah. What kind of a fuckin 'name is storm? I'm very disappointed. She sounds like a fuckin'..."
“... pic.twitter.com/W4jAJegvlW @Svershbowit is like this: in 2018, we now have to deal with multiple spellings of the name stormy / stormi. "
"Please."
"Really, guys?"



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on their alleged marital woes?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID"At this point, many of their friends think their marriage won't last."”
“"Not only does she get upset, but she gets very jealous," added the insider.”
“Source: BACKGRIDAnd Peta reportedly cannot stand his flirtation behavior.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDWhat makes this news that much worse is that the two just welcomed an adorable boy, Shai Aleksander, last January 4th.”
“It seemed like they loved the idea of stealing women away from other men."”
“"They have no shame.”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhile at dinner with his brother Val, 31, and friends in Beverly Hills, Maksim "was talking about hot women and sizing them up," a source told InTouch.”
“And he even was talking about other women just weeks after their wedding!”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
What do you think of their so-called marital misfortune? "
The article continues with the following ad source: backgrid "at this point, many of their friends think their marriage won't last."
"She is not only unhappy, but also very jealous," the person familiar with the matter added
"Source: backgridand and PETA are reported to be intolerant of his flirtation."
The article continues in the following ad source: background to make the news worse, the two just welcomed a lovely boy, Shay Aleksander, on January 4 last year
"They seem to like the idea of stealing women from other men."
"They have no sense of shame."
"Source: back grid's 31 year old brother Val was having dinner with friends at Beverly Hills," a source told into touch. "He was talking about Spice Girls and evaluating them."
"He's even talking about other women, just a few weeks after they get married!"



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementLive with Kelly and Ryan, starring Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest, airs weekday mornings in syndication around the country.”
“He said that we should afford people the opportunity for truth and find out the facts before hanging someone out to dry.”
“Now, her incredible chemistry with Strahan’s replacement, Ryan Seacrest, is undeniable, but in the midst of the sexual misconduct allegations against him, Ripa is feeling betrayed and torn about standing beside him.”
“Could these skeletons in Seacrest’s closet force Ripa to leave the popular morning show?”
“According to Life & Style, in the era of the #MeToo and #Time’sUp movements every business is playing it safe, and that means things could change at Live, especially if ratings start to drop and big names start to avoid the show.”
““[Kelly’s] waiting to see what happens with Ryan.”
“But [either way] this is a dark period for her,” reveals an insider.”
““She’s pissed…Kelly feels blindsided.”
“The last thing she needs is celebrities boycotting.”
“Everyone is on pins and needles.”At this point, Ripa and Seacrest are still interviewing A-listers on the show, but that wasn’t the case when he was on the Oscar red carpet earlier this month.”


"Kelly and Ryan live," starring Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest, was broadcast in syndicates across the country
"We should give people a chance to know the truth and find out before we dry them out," he said
"Now, her incredible chemical reaction with Strahan's successor, Ryan Seacrest, is undeniable, but Ripa feels betrayed and painful standing beside him in the sexual misconduct charges against him."
"Can these skeletons in Seacrest's wardrobe force Ripa out of this popular morning show?"
"According to life & style, in the super era of 'metoo' and 'time', every company is winning, which means that the situation of live broadcasting may change, especially if the ratings start to decline and the big brands start to avoid TV dramas."
"(Kelly) wait and see what happens to Ryan."
"But (in any case) it was a dark period for her," one insider said
"She was angry Kelly felt stupid
"The last thing she needs is a celebrity boycott."
"Everyone is on pins and needles." At this time, Ripa and Seacrest are still interviewing A-list stars on the show, but not when he made the red carpet debut at the Oscars earlier this month



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GAME OVER.””
“I now take a passionate stand against those who wish to even entertain the sick and twisted lies against me.”
“These radically groundless and unfounded allegations end now.”
“...truth Also Read Corey Haim s Mother Says Charlie Sheen Sexual Assault Accusations Were All Made Up Sheen continued Consistently admitting and owning a laundry list of shortcomings wrongdoings and indiscretions this traveler hath traveled however every man has a breaking point...”
“When Corey wanted to fool around again Charlie was not interested In a statement released by his attorney Shane Bernard after the complaint was filed Sheen said In my nearly 35 years as a celebrated entertainer I have been nothing shy of a forthright noble and valiant courier of the...”
“Haim said after it happened Sheen became very cold and rejected him.”
“He said they had anal sex.”
“The suit resulted from a Nov. 8 article that quoted former actor Dominick Brascia as saying Haim told him that Sheen and Haim “smoked pot and had sex.”
“Sheen filed the suit in December, accusing the publication of defamation.”
“Also Read: Charlie Sheen Sues the National Enquirer Over Corey Haim Rape Story (Report)According to TMZ, Sheen’s legal team filed papers late last week asking that the suit be dismissed with prejudice, which means that the suit can’t be filed again.”


"The game is over."
"I'm taking a passionate stand now for those who even want to entertain the sick and twisted lies that are directed at me."
"These groundless charges are now over."
“… The truth is also read by Corey Haim's mother that Charlotte Sheen's sexual assault charges are all fictional, and sheen continues to admit and possess a flawed, wrong and reckless laundry list for this traveller trip, but everyone has a breakthrough point... "
"When Corey wanted to loaf around again, Charlie wasn't interested in a statement made by his lawyer, Shane Bernard, after the complaint was filed. Sin said that in my nearly 35 years as a famous artist, I have been a straightforward, noble and brave messenger..."
"Haim said that after the incident, Xin became very indifferent and refused him."
"He said they had anal sex."
The lawsuit was triggered by an article on November 8 that quoted former actor Dominic brasia as saying Haim told him that sin and Haim "smoked marijuana and had sex."
Xin filed a lawsuit in December, accusing the publication of defamation
"Read also: Charlie Sheen sued the National Enquirer over the rape of Corey Haim. According to TMZ, Sheen's legal team filed a document late last week demanding that the lawsuit be dismissed with prejudice, which means that the lawsuit can't be brought again."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...musician Jack Antonoff made a donation to the ACLU to support those affected by Trump’s executive orders.”
“Fun.”
“Scandal star Kerry Washington encouraged her followers to remember American history.”
“Pop star Miley Cyrus pledged her support to immigrants in the country.”
“Even director Judd Apatow followed suit.”
“Actor Rosie O’Donnell pledged to match Sia’s donation to the ACLU in turn.”
“Musician Sia told her followers that she would match their donations to the ACLU up to $100k.”
“Gaycation star Ellen Page attended a protest at John F. Kennedy International Airport.”
“Grey’s Anatomy‘s Jesse Williams pointed out that many of the country’s accomplishments were due to immigrants and refugees.”
“Actor Mindy Kaling referenced her book, where she details her parents’ experience as immigrants.”


“…… Musician Jack Antonov donated to the ACLU to support those affected by Trump's executive order
"Interesting."
"Scandal star Kerry Washington encourages her followers to remember American history."
"Pop star Miley Cyrus is committed to supporting immigrants in the country."
"Even the director, Judd apato, followed suit."
"Actor Rosie O'Donnell has promised to match the donation to the new course American Civil Liberties Union."
"Musician thea told her followers that she would match their donations up to $100000 to ACLU."
"Gaycation star Alan page attended the protest at Kennedy International Airport."
"Jesse Williams of gray anatomy points out that many of the country's achievements are due to immigrants and refugees."
Actress Mindy Kaling cites her book, which details her parents' experiences as immigrants



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“And it sounds like he's already found a new love connection.”
“FKA hasn't been seen with her engagement ring on Instagram recently, and that is not the only tell-tale sign.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDThe two, who began dating in 2015, have kept their relationship extremely private, which is no surprise after he was openly humiliated by his last girlfriend, Kristen Stewart, when she cheated on him with her movie director.”
“Source: BACKGRIDBut it looks like Robert is the one entertaining other people now, as a source tells InTouch he flirted with a "pretty brunette" earlier this month in New York and "spent the night" hanging out with her!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDBut apparently he can do what he wants, as the insider adds, "Rob and FKA's engagement is off.”
“Rob really thought he and FKA would get married, but things have changed.”
“So he's back on the market."”
“Source: BACKGRIDSo why did they split?”
“Source: BACKGRIDAre you surprised by Rob's relationship struggles?”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"It sounds like he's found a new bond."
"FKA hasn't seen any pictures with engagement rings on instagram recently, which is not the only sign."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: the two backgrid started dating in 2015, and it's no surprise that their relationship has always been very private, because his last girlfriend, Kristen Stewart, publicly humiliated him because she and her film director were unfaithful to him."
"Source: backgridbut it looks like Robert is one to entering other people now, as a source tell touch that he was smacked with a" Pretty Brown "in New York earlier this month and spent a good night with her!"
The article continues with the following advertising source: backgrid, but it's clear that he can do what he wants, as the insider said, "rob and FKA's engagement is over."
"Rob really thought he and FKA would get married, but things changed."
"So he's back in the market."
"Source: backgridso why did they separate?"
"Source: background are you surprised at Rob's emotional struggle?"



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They had intense conversations and everyone seemed to have a great time."”
“Gomez was said to be "shocked" after coming to know about her former boyfriend's night out with Perry.”
“While the songstress has reignited her relationship with ex Justin Bieber, the Canadian singer is said to be working on rekindling his love life with Bella Hadid, with whom he split in September 2016 after a year of dating.”
“Gomez, 25, was recently was pictured kissing Bieber, 23, at a hockey game following their numerous dates, while The Weeknd, 27, was spotted leaving Hadid's (21) apartment on 14 November.”
“...â YOUR HOSTESS WITH THE MOSTESTâ VMAS ð shearerphoto A post shared by KATY PERRY katyperry on Aug 26 2017 at 9 42pm PDT Although The Weeknd real name Abel Tesfaye has been trying to reconnect romantically with the model he sparked dating rumours with a dinner date with Katy...”
“Perry 33 at Madeo in West Hollywood on 20 November...”
“Gomez reportedly knows about The Weeknd's dinner date with Perry.”
“So, was the songstress down with her former flame having dinner with the Roar hitmaker?”
“"Selena was shocked when she found out about The Weeknd meeting up with Katy Perry for dinner.”
“They dined on pasta, pizza and steak for three hours.”


"They had a heated conversation and everyone seemed to have a good time."
"Gomez is said to be" shocked "after learning about his ex boyfriend's one night stand with Perry
"Although the singer rekindled her relationship with former Justin Bieber, the Canadian singer is said to be working to rekindle his love life with Bella Hadid, who broke up in September 2016 after a year of dating."
"25-year-old Gomez was recently photographed kissing 23-year-old Bieber in a hockey game, while 27 year old Gomez was photographed leaving Hadid's (21-year-old) apartment on November 14."
“… Your hostess and most test-vmas ð shearphoto share a post about Katie Perry on August 26, 2017 at 9:42 p.m. Pacific time. Although a week's real name, Abel tesfaye, has been trying to re romanticize the mode, he has triggered a date rumor and has a dinner date with Katie... "
"On November 20, Perry was in Madio, West Hollywood on the 33rd..."
"Gomez is reported to know about the dinner date with Perry this week."
"So, did the singer have dinner with her ex lover with roar killer?"
"Serena was shocked when she learned about her dinner with Katie Perry at the weekend."
They ate spaghetti, pizza and steak for three hours



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People thought Kate had liposuction to help regain her slim body.”
“Then she shaped up yet again.”
“Having big breasts apparently limited her clothing choices.”
“The stunner never admitted to a boob job but she said in an interview with The Sun that she wished for smaller boobs every single day of her life.”
“Kate’s boobs are size 34D.”
“Let’s get started…Does Kate Upton Have Breast Implants?”
“Perhaps, there’s an answer that will satisfy people’s curiosity about her amazing physique.”
“Let’s examine a bunch of photos before and after she became famous.”
“Did she really get any cosmetic surgery?”
“Before & After PhotosSo what’s real or fake in Kate Upton?”


"People think Kate's liposuction is to get slim."
"And then she came back to health."
"The chest size obviously limits her choice of clothing."
"The stuntman never admitted that she had breast implants, but she told the sun that she wanted to have smaller breasts every day of her life."
"Kate's chest size is 34d."
"Let's start Does Kate Upton have breast augmentation? "
"Maybe there is an answer to satisfy people's curiosity about her amazing physique."
"Let's take a look at a bunch of photos before and after she became famous."
"Did she really have plastic surgery?"
"Before and after the photo, what is Kate Upton's true or false?"



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...was used in the simple future sense only in the second and third person, while was used in the first person.”
“Similarly, in the intent sense, will was historically used with the second and third person, while shall was reserved for the first person.”
“( auxiliary ) To habitually do (a given action).”
“"God will that all men be saved, and come to the knowledge of the truth."”
“4.”
“...ii.”
“1 Tim.”
“...men hear how generally his grace is proposed to him and him and them each man in particular and to all...”
“Matthew XXVI 1624 Democritus Junior pseudonym The Anatomy of Melancholy 2nd edition Oxford Oxfordshire Printed by John Lichfield and James Short for Henry Cripps OCLC 54573970 Democritus Junior pseudonym Robert Burton 2nd edition Oxford Oxfordshire Printed by John Lichfield and James Short for Henry Cripps see God s goodwill toward...”
“, William Tyndale, trans.”


“…… Only in the second and third person, but in the first person. "
Similarly, in the sense of intention, wills were historically used for the second and third person, but should be reserved for the first person
To do (an action) habitually
"God will save all and know the truth."
“4.”
“… 2、 "I don't know
"One minute."
“…… People hear how his grace is presented to him in general, to him and to each of them in particular to all of them... "
"Matthew 26 1624 junior pseudonym of democrit: abbreviation of John Lichfield and James Henrich Lipps, Oxford 2nd Edition OCLC 54573970 junior pseudonym of democrit: Robert Burton, Oxford 2nd Edition abbreviation of John Lichfield and James Henrich Lipps, Oxford 2nd Edition see God's good will..."
"William Tyndale, trans



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in the same room would be must-see TV.”For more on this and all your favorite celebrity news, pick up the new issue of Life & Style, on stands now!”
““Love them or hate them,” says a source, “putting Caitlyn and O.J.”
““If they doit right,” says the source, “it would be fascinating.”And while the public, might be hesitant to watch such a reunion, the producers are convinced plenty of people will tune in to view the show.”
“...to the new Caitlyn and asks him probing questions about his ups and downs.”
“Though they haven’t approached her yet, producers are hoping to convince Caitlyn to sign on by pitching it as “an informative, interview-type show,” the source says, in which she introducesO.J.”
“Ron Goldman...”
“...should be interested in the show a source says but there s a snag Caitlyn has wanted nothing to do with O J since the NFL star was charged with murdering his ex wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend...”
“O.J.”
“...was best buds with Kris’ first husband, Robert.”
“They also share the Kardashian connection: Long before Caitlyn married into the family, O.J.”


“… Be sure to watch TV in the same room. " To learn more about this and all your favorite celebrity news, pick up the new issue of life and fashion and stand in the stands now
"Love them or hate them," one source said, "take Caitlin and O.J
"If they do it right," the source said, "it will be very attractive." Although the public may be hesitant to watch such a reunion, the producers believe that many people will watch the show
“… Give new Caitlin some exploratory questions about his ups and downs. "
"Although they haven't found her yet, the producers hope to persuade Caitlin to sign up by publicizing it as an" informative talk show, "the source said, introducing so. J
"Ron Goldman..."
“…… Should be interested in the show, a source said, but there's a hurdle. Since the NFL star was charged with murdering his ex-wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friends, Caitlin has never wanted to have anything to do with O.J. "
“O.J.”
“… It's Chris's first husband, Robert's best partner. "
"They also have a Kardashian connection: O.J. long before Caitlin married into a big family."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : ‘Nice pics from your boys trip’: Kim and Khloe Kardashian put Kourtney’s ex Younes Bendjima on blastMORE : Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin pictured in tears weeks after confirming engagement...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“The mother-of-three yesterday was caught mid-chat with some guy, after it was alleged yesterday her boyfriend of two years Younes Bendjima might be her boyfriend no longer.”
“After a shopping trip with sister Kim Kardashian and daughter Penelope for a public appearance, Kourtney, 39, was seen walking along a busy street not really giving any mind to the fact she was flashing the face of her Facetiming buddy for all to see.”
“Wearing a blue tank and olive-green skirt, she headed along the footpath in a pair of towering Perspex heels while chatting with her buddy and holding Penelope’s hand.”
“She really didn’t mind who saw (Picture: Backgrid)She appeared to turn the phone ever so slightly so passersby got a great glimpse of the happenings, with her mate – who also seemed to be outside, wearing a cap – smiling in Kourt’s direction.”
“Kourt held the phone up as she walked along (Picture: Backgrid)Not going to lie, he sort of looks likes Younes…AdvertisementAdvertisementHowever, can we also please note the Mickey Mouse keyring on the reality star’s chain – this woman likes to keep things real.”
“Kourtney had earlier fronted up for an appearance alongside Kim, 37, at Westfield Century City as pictures emerged of Younes frolicking on the beach with mates.”
“Kourtney looked anything but glum as she held onto her daughter Picture X17online com The Balmain model appeared very close to model Jordan Ozuma on a beach in Mexico however TMZ claimed it was Kourtney who called time earlier so perhaps he was just blowing off steam with a group...”
“...of buddies abroad...”


"More: 'good photos of your boy's trip': Kim and koloka Daisy take pictures of coortney's former yons benjima in brasmore: Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin in tears a few weeks after confirming their engagement..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"The mother of three was caught chatting with a man yesterday after she was accused that her boyfriend of two years, yons benjima, may no longer be her boyfriend."
"Courtney, 39, went shopping with her sister Kim Kardashian and daughter Penelope. After her public appearance, she was seen walking in a busy street and didn't really realize that she was showing everyone the face of her joking partner."
Wearing a blue vest, an olive green skirt and a pair of high-rise plexiglass heels, she walked down the sidewalk, chatting with her partner and holding Penelope's hand
"She really doesn't mind who sees it (picture: backgrid) she seems to be turning her cell phone gently, so passers-by can see what's going on very well, and her partner - she seems to be out there, wearing a hat - smiles in Kurt's direction."
"Kurt holds up his cell phone as he walks (picture: background) and doesn't want to lie. He looks a bit like you However, can we also pay attention to the Mickey Mouse Keyring on the reality TV star chain - this woman likes to be real. "
"Courtney earlier appeared with 37 year old king in Century City, Westfield, when pictures showed younes and his friends playing on the beach."
"Courtney didn't look glum at all when she was holding her daughter's photo x17online com. Balman's model is very close to Jordan ozuma, a model on the Mexican beach, but TMZ claims that Courtney called earlier, so maybe he's just venting with a group of people... "
“…… Friends from abroad... "



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And for a breakdown of the top stories in the magazine, subscribe to our new podcast In Case You Missed Us below!”
“This may very well become a North American tour.”For more on Duchess Meghan and Prince Harry’s trip across the pond, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
“Adds the insider, “The Canadian Foreign Office has heard about the tour and would love to have them stop there.”
“Other potential stops include visits to Chicago’s Obama Foundation — “President and Mrs. Obama have been stalwart supporters,” says the insider — as well as Canada.”
““They want to highlight and foster these relationships.”They’re open to possibilities, too.”
““Meghan and Harry want to solidify ties between the U.K. and the U.S.,” continues the source.”
““They’re working to finalize locations and venues.” Their goal, however, is set.”
“Though there is no official itinerary yet, “they are thinking New York, Washington, D.C., and California,” says the insider.”
““Meghan is looking forward to introducing Harry to everything she loves about the U.S.”Her favorites range from coast to coast.”
““They are so excited to head to the U.S.,” reveals a palace insider, noting it will be their first trip to the States since their May vows.”


"If you miss the podcasts below, please subscribe to our new podcasts and learn about the hottest stories in the magazine!"
"It's likely to be a trip to North America." To learn more about Duchess Megan and Prince Harry's journey across the pond, read the new issue of American weekly and start now
"The Canadian Ministry of foreign affairs has heard about the trip and hopes they can stop there," the person added
"Other possible stops include a visit to the Obama foundation in Chicago," the source said. "President and Mrs. Obama have always been strong supporters - and Canada."
"They want to emphasize and nurture these relationships." They are also open to possibilities
"Meghan and Harry want to consolidate the relationship between the UK and the US," the source continued.
"They're trying to identify the location and the location." However, their goals have been set
"Although there is no formal itinerary," the person said, "they are considering New York, Washington and California."
"Megan is looking forward to introducing to Harry everything about America she loves." Her favorite things go from coast to coast
"They are very excited to go to the United States," a palace museum insider said. It will be their first trip to the United States after taking the oath in May



**Something goes wrong**
“Since her husband “ditched her to hobnob with models,” Aniston is “building a new family,” according to Star.”
“Jen is now “adopting.” But Jen doesn’t need Brad’s kids in her life to feel like a whole woman, because she’s adopting!”
“They’re soul mates and … the stars are aligning for them to get back together,” read the breathless copy.”
““They never stopped loving each other, and realized it’s pointless to fight it any longer.”
“...insists that Aniston ended her marriage to reunite with Pitt.”
“Even though People magazine has said that Jen and Brad straight up “haven’t seen each other for ages” and “for well over a decade now they have lived totally separate lives,” OK!”
“...magazine just went for it, claiming “Jen dumped Justin for Brad,” using italics and everything.”
“Jen dumped Justin for Brad because it was “pointless” to fight their attraction “any longer.” OK!”
“...like that in their relationship in which he was frequently out of his element 2”
“The mag described them as sweet little Post its that said things like You looked nice tonight or Miss you already Not exactly sonnets but While Jen assured Justin that the love notes really weren t a big deal Theroux wasn t thrilled The Leftovers actor had moments of insecurity...”


Aniston's husband "abandoned her and took her model to hobnob" and is now "building a new family," Star reported
Jen is now adopted. But Jen doesn't need Brad's children to make her feel like a complete woman, because she's adopted! "
"They are soul mates, and The stars are forming an alliance for their reunion, "the breathless book says
"They never stop loving each other and realize that it's meaningless to fight against love again."
“… Insisted Aniston ended her marriage and was reunited with Pete
Although people magazine says that Jennifer and Brad "haven't seen each other for a long time" and "have been living a totally different life for more than ten years," OK
“…… The magazine did so, claiming that "Jane dumped Justin for Brad," in italics or something. "
Jen abandoned Justin for Brad's sake because it was "meaningless" to fight their attraction again
"As in their relationship, he is often excluded from the second element."
"The magazine described them as cute little posts, which said that you look good tonight or you are no longer a sonnet, but Jan assured Justin that love notes are really no big deal, while Ruth was not excited by the unsafe moments of the remaining actresses..."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie should drive her new Ferrari?”
“After all, there’s nothing better than a pic of a new little Kardashian/Jenner!”
“We have to admit, we’re also hoping we get one soon!”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star has showed off Stormi’s little hands and feet so fans are itching to see a photo of her face!”
“Although the gifts prove everyone close to Kylie is so excited about baby Stormi, the brunette beauty has yet to show off a clear photo of her daughter.”
“The new mom has been getting a lot of gifts since welcoming her bundle of joy into the world, including large flower displays, balloons and more from her family members.”
““Can’t believe she’s mine…,” she captioned the photo.”
“Feb 24”
“She thinks it would be sexy to drive her baby around in style but of course safety first Kylie introduced her new black Ferrari to her followers when she posted a pic of the beauty to her Instagram story on...”


"Let us know!"
"Miss Hollywood, do you think Kelly should drive her new Ferrari?"
"After all, there's nothing better than a new picture of little Kardashian / Jenner!"
"We have to admit that we also hope to get one soon!"
"The star who keeps pace with Kardashian shows Tommy's little hands and feet, so fans are eager to see her picture!"
"Although the gifts prove that everyone around Kelly is so excited about baby Tommy, the brunette hasn't shown a clear picture of her daughter yet."
"Since the new mother welcomed her joy to the world, she has received many gifts, including large-scale flower exhibitions and balloons from her family."
"I can't believe she's mine..." She wrote under the title of the photo
"February 24"
"She thought it would be sexy to drive around with her kids in style, but of course safety is the first thing. After releasing a picture of a beautiful woman on instagram, Kelly introduced her new black Ferrari to her followers..."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They go to the same church, so it’s going to happen, and she is mentally prepared to smile, nod her head and move on.””
“He’s definitely not desperate to fall in love again.” Something tells us the crooner is in for a very fun summer regardless!”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Now that Justin Bieber, 24, and Selena Gomez‘s, 25, “break” has become something pretty permanent looking, we can’t help wondering if the “What Do You Mean?” singer is hoping to find someone new soon?”
“Well, thanks to our insiders, we’re learning how Justin is managing the single life again!”
““There are plenty of gorgeous girls that would love a chance to date Justin but he’s simply not ready to get serious with anyone,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He’s still reeling from the breakup with Selena, he needs more time to heal.”The insider added that Justin is just wanting to kick back and enjoy the summer months before taking another chance a romance.”
““Apparently he’s vowed to stay single for the summer,” the source added.”
““Who knows if he’ll be able to stick to it but right now that’s the plan.”
“As we previously reported, while Justin is trying to find a path forward, Selena is confident ending their romance was the right thing to do.”


"They went to the same church, so it happened, and she was mentally ready to smile, nod and move on."
"He will never fall in love again in despair." Something tells us that anyway, this singer will have a very interesting summer
"Here are all the exclusive details!"
Now the "break-up" between Justin Bieber, 24, and Serena Gomez, 25, has become a permanent thing, and we can't help asking, "what do you mean? "The singer hopes to find new people soon?"
"Well, thanks to our insiders, we've learned how Justin manages his single life!"
"There are a lot of beautiful girls who would love to have a date with Justin, but he's not ready to be serious with anyone," a source said Exclusive to Hollywood life
"His break-up with Serena is still scaring him. He needs more time to heal." Justin just wanted to relax, enjoy the summer and then take a chance to fall in love again, the person added
"Obviously he vowed to stay single in the summer," the source added
"Who knows if he can hold on, but now that's the plan."
"As we reported earlier, when Justin tried to find a way forward, Selena believed it was right to end their relationship."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Janet is shy and holds her emotions inside cause she has been hurt before but has a true love for Jermaine."”
“He is understanding and he truly cares and loves her.”
“Jermaine knows Janet better than most men.”
“Their friendship is deep and their connection is very powerful and real.”
“"They haven't discussed an actual title but are closer than before.”
“They started as just friends and it has been slowly developing," the source tells us.”
“"Janet and Jermaine are hooking up.”
“The former couple has been at the center of romance rumors for months but are now "closer than before," according to the insider.”
“News.”
“Janet Jackson and Jermaine Dupri are "hooking up," a source tells E!”


"Janet is very shy and keeps her feelings in her heart because she has been hurt before, but she has a real love for Jermaine."
"He understands. He really cares and loves her."
"Jermaine knows Janet better than most men."
"Their friendship is deep, their connection is very strong and real."
"They haven't talked about real titles yet, but they're closer than ever."
"They were just friends at the beginning and have been developing slowly," the source told us
"Janet and Jermaine are dating."
The former couple have been at the center of romantic rumors for months, but are now "closer than ever," according to people familiar with the matter
"News."
"Janet Jackson and Jermaine Dupree are" hooking up, "a source told e!"



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#AMAs pic.twitter.com/ljPobF544t @amyastridSelena Gomez looks so beautiful in blonde  #AMAs pic.twitter.com/FBVlzWDj7Q @FIirtationship...”
“...pic.twitter.com/6IXI9SEGTP @ohsoduaI feel personally offended by how amazing Selena Gomez looks with blonde hair.”
“The "Wolves" singer debuted a platinum blonde hairstyle on Sunday night, pairing the look with a rocking black leather mini dress, and fans on Twitter have a lot of opinions.”
“Gomez will perform for the first time in over a year during the award show, her first performance since her kidney transplant earlier this year.”
“While most fans agree that she looks hotter than ever, the look has also drawn comparisons to on-again boyfriend Justin Bieber.”
“Here's what they're saying so far:Blonde Selena Gomez is something I can't live without now @selenagomez #SELENAxAMAs #SelenaXCoach pic.twitter.com/ZJS8jv1OjC @anettx89omfg Selena Gomez is blonde!!!”
“ @kasiaiamWait, that blonde girl in leather dress was Selena Gomez?”
“AMAs bts_bewitched Selena Gomez is blonde and is wearing a leather jacket which reminds me AMAs pic twitter com 6ae5oa4v3Q MelanieSargsian selenagomez at the amas omg you look beautifull i am shooketh i am not okay wow pic twitter com...”
“...efjkBHOOCx lienni23 Selena Gomez in a blonde wig...”
“ @99DoubleBIt's a no blonde ages her!”


"AMAS pic.twitter.com/ljPobF544t @Amestrina Gomez looks beautiful in her golden Armas pic.twitter.com/FBVlzWDj7Q @"Spaceship..."
“... pic.twitter.com/6IXI9SEGTP @Ossodua was very angry with Serena Gomez for her amazing blonde look
"The wolf singer launched her first platinum blonde hairstyle on Sunday night, matching it with a swinging Black Leather miniskirt. Twitter fans have a lot of opinions."
"Gomez will perform for the first time in more than a year at the awards ceremony, her first performance after a kidney transplant earlier this year."
"Although most fans think she looks hotter than ever, the look also puts her on a par with" again "boyfriend Justin Bieber."
"That's what they say. Val: the blonde Serena Gomez is something I can't do without now @ selenagomez # selenaxamas# SelenaXCoachpic.twitter.com/ZJS8jv1OjC @Serena Gomez is blonde! "
"@ kasiaamwait, the blonde girl in leather is Selena Gomez?"
"The enchanted Serena Gomez is a blonde woman wearing a leather jacket, which reminds me of the website of AMAS pike tweet 6ae5oa4v3q melanissa Serena Gomez. On AMAS OMG's website, you look beautiful. I'm surprised that I'm not good. Pike pike tweet website..."
“… Serena Gomez in her golden wig... "
"@ 99doublebit is a woman without blonde hair!"



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2.”
“Soon after his decision was announced, reports claimed Underwood forced him to retire because she wanted to work on their marriage and try for baby No.”
“She’s unrecognizable since her fallSo how different will the star look next time we see her?”
“She was already cute, so I don’t know what she’s doing or what happened.”Next: She looks completely different.”
“She then backed off after the harsh comment saying, “No … We’re cynical!”
“I don’t know what that means … an excuse for a face lift,” Williams said during her Hot Topics segment.”
““She [Carrie] released on Twitter that we may not recognize her when it’s all said and done.”
“Underwood had a face lift, and her injury is a cover-upIn January 2018, after Underwood’s admission that she may not look the same since her fall, talk show host Wendy Williams suggested that the country star didn’t injure her face but instead had a face lift.”
“Next: Did a daytime talk show host start this rumor?”
“So there’s no reason to believe she was lying about it.”


“2.”
"Shortly after his decision was announced, there were reports that Underwood forced him to retire because she wanted to work for their marriage and not have children."
"She's never recognized her since she fell, so what's the difference in that star when we see her again?"
"She's already cute, so I don't know what she's doing or what's going on." Next: she looks totally different
She said a harsh word, then stepped back and said, "no We are cynical
"I don't know what that means An excuse for cosmetic surgery, "Williams said in her hot topic section
"She (Jia Li) announced on twitter that everything has the final say, and we may not recognize her."
"Underwood had plastic surgery and her injury was a cover up. In January 2018, Underwood admitted that he might look different after falling. Talk show host Wendy Williams suggested that the country star did not hurt her face, but had plastic surgery. "
"Next: did a daytime talk show host start the rumor?"
"So there's no reason to believe she's lying."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The allegation comes from Ok!, which blares in a headline, “Meghan’s Jealousy Fix.” In the […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop can expose the truth.”
“A new report alleges Meghan Markle hired a special yoga instructor to teach her how to deal with jealousy when Prince Harry is seen out with other women, but the entire story is bogus.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"The charges come from OK! In [ 】Megan's jealousy IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Gossip police can reveal the truth."
"A new report says Megan markel has hired a special yoga instructor to teach her how to deal with jealousy when Prince Harry dates other women, but the whole story is false."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Now: Famous Actors Who Turned Down Iconic Movie Roles...”
“It definitely seemed like he wanted to be incognito,” an insider told the outlet.”
“Following years of rumors which suggested that Munn had led the Green Bay Packers quarterback to be estranged from his family including brother Jordan Rodgers who won the heart of Jojo Fletcher on the 2016 season of The Bachelorette he is said to be enjoying a new romance with his...”
“...fellow athlete...”
“Earlier this month, a Page Six report told readers that Rodgers had been spotted on a date with the soccer player at the Martignetti brothers’ Upper East Side hotsplit East Pole.”
““They arrived at around 10 p.m. and seemed to be on a date.”
“He wore a baseball cap and asked for the quietest, most out-of-the-way table possible.”
“His hat was tilted down.”
“Meanwhile, Munn is reportedly upset about Rodgers' alleged new relationship because he reportedly gave her hope for a future reunion before stepping out with Margolius.”
“News report below.”


"Now look at the famous actors who refuse idol movie roles..."
"He does seem to want to remain anonymous," an insider told the media
"For years, it has been rumored that Munn led the Green Bay Packers quarterback away from his family, including his brother Jordan Rogers, who won Joe Fletcher's heart in the 2016 singles season, who is said to be enjoying a new relationship with him..."
“… "Athlete companion..."
"Earlier this month, a six page report told readers that Rogers was found dating the footballer at the upper east end of the martinetti brothers' hot springs."
"They arrived around 10 p.m. and they seemed to be on a date."
He wore a baseball cap and asked for the quietest and most remote table
"His hat is crooked."
"At the same time, Munn is reported to be upset about Rogers' so-called new love because he has given her hope of a future reunion before going out with Margolis," he said
"Here's the news report."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“This led to Gossip Cop to reach out to find out if there was any truth in the made claim.”
“While the family has not cleared the air about Kate's third pregnancy, a new report suggests that there could be possibilities that the couple might not have baby number 3 and Meghan Markle is to be blamed for it.”
“According to a claim made by Celeb Dirty Laundry, Kate is not planning to get pregnant with her third child because she fears there will be a competition for media attention between her and Meghan once she gets married to Prince Harry.”
“And Kate is not up for such kind of spirit.”
“Also Read Prince George turns 4 Adorable photos of the Royal that perfectly capture his priceless expressions The site wrote that since Harry and Markle are hoping to have kids some day the entire world will be on Meghan Markle bump watch to see how fast she ll end up...”
“...getting pregnant after the wedding...”
“And Middleton doesn't want to "compete" with Markle for "media attention".”
“Adding to the statement, the website shared there's "no doubt" Middleton "loves all the attention she gets whenever she's pregnant," but she is going to leave it to Markle to "get pregnant next."”
“While the story was published on their website recently, it was not accompanied by any particular quote from the royal family.”


"Please let us know in the comments below."
"This leads the gossip police to reach out and find out if this statement is true."
"Although the family has not clarified the news of Kate's third pregnancy, a new report shows that the couple may not have a third child and Meghan Markle is the culprit."
"According to celebrity" dirty clothes, "Kate is not going to have her third child because she is worried that once she marries Prince Harry, there will be a media competition between her and Megan."
"Kate is not fit for this spirit."
"At the same time, I read four lovely Royal photos of Prince George and captured his priceless expression perfectly. The website says that since Harry and markel hope to have children one day, the whole world will pay attention to Megan Marcel and see how fast she will finally be... "
“… After the wedding... "
Middleton doesn't want to compete with markel for "media attention"
"In addition to the statement, the website also said that" there's no doubt that 'Middleton' likes all the attention she gets when she's pregnant, "but she's going to leave it to Marcel for 'the next pregnancy.'
"Although this report was recently published on their website, it did not include any special quotation from the royal family."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you like seeing them together?”
“Kanye is protective of all of his family and wanted Travis to know that he better not let Kylie down in any way once the baby arrives.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kylie and Travis will last?”
“In fact, Kylie isn’t sure what they are!”
“Since Kylie Jenner‘s, 20, pregnancy, her relationship with baby daddy Travis Scott, 25, has only gotten more confusing.”
“Still a teenager at the time, Kylie got pregnant super early after she and the rapper got together, and while she hoped he’d step up during her pregnancy, that hasn’t exactly happened.”
“As a result, the youngest Kardashian/Jenner has been left feeling abandoned and “disappointed.” The worst part?”
“She apparently doesn’t even know what to call her relationship with Travis!”
“Click here to see photos of Kylie since her pregnancy news broke.”
““Kylie is alone, confused, and worried over her relationship status with Travis,” a source close to Kylie told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““They are currently talking almost daily, and while they are not entirely broken up, they are not exactly together either.”


"Do you like to see them together?"
"Kanye is protecting his family. He wants Travis to know that once the baby is born, he'd better not let Kelly lie down in any way." Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Kelly and Travis will survive? "
"In fact, Kelly doesn't know what they are!"
"Since Kelly Jenner, 20, became pregnant, her relationship with Travis Scott, 25, has become more chaotic."
"At that time, Kelly was a teenager. She became pregnant very early after she was with a rap singer. Although she hoped that he would step forward during her pregnancy, this is not the case."
As a result, the youngest Kardashian / Jenner felt abandoned and "disappointed.". What's the worst? "
"She doesn't even know what to call her relationship with Travis!"
"Click here to see a picture of Kelly after the news of her pregnancy came out."
"Kelly is lonely, confused and worried about her relationship with Travis," a source close to her told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"They're talking almost every day now, and although they're not completely separated, they're not completely together."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Gossip Cop, Jennifer’ rep stated that the article was “bogus.” So it looks Life & Style should not be trusted if you’re reading or thinking of sharing an article about Jennifer Aniston or any other celebrity.”
“Gossip Cop reports that they checked with Aniston’s rep, who said that Jennifer is not spending big bucks on beauty treatments so that she can get revenge on her former flame.”
“Jennifer Aniston has been a big spender when it comes to cosmetic procedures since her breakup with Justin Theroux.”
“At least that’s according to an article that appeared in Life & Style.”
“The online tabloid claims that an “inside source” spilled the beans, allegedly telling them that Aniston spent $200,000 on beauty since she’s become single.”
“But celebrity rumor watchdog Gossip Cop is on the case, and they say that the story is untrue.”
“As Gossip Cop notes, Life & Style claims that the $200,000 price tag includes the costs of personal trainers, Botox, fillers, and other products.”
“The tabloid s source says that Jen started investing heavily in these beauty treatments back in February and that her goal was to show Justin what he s missing According to Gossip Cop the article then quotes a plastic surgeon who said that Jennifer looks like she has had Botox...”
“...and microneedling done on her face...”
“But the doctor they cited has never treated Aniston, which is a red flag about the credibility of the source and the article.”


According to gossip police, Jennifer's agent said the article was "fake.". So if you're reading or want to share an article about Jennifer Aniston or other celebrities, then life and style don't seem credible
"Gossip police reported that they had checked with Aniston's representative and Aniston said that Jennifer would not spend a lot of money on beauty so that she could get back at her ex lover."
"Ever since Jennifer Aniston broke up with Justin Cyrus, she has been lavish in plastic surgery."
"At least that's according to an article in life and fashion."
The online tabloid claimed that an "inside source" leaked the secret and said that Aniston had spent 200000 dollars on beauty since she was single
"But gossip police, the celebrity rumor watchdog, are investigating the case and they say the story is untrue."
"As the gossip police put it, lifestyle companies claim that the $200000 price includes the cost of personal trainers, Botox, fillers and other products."
"According to tabloid sources, Jennifer started investing heavily in these cosmetic treatments as early as February, and her goal is to show Justin what he lacks. According to the gossip police report, the article then quoted a plastic surgeon as saying that Jennifer looks like she has been hit with Botox..."
“… Micro needle therapy was done on her face... "
"But the doctor they quoted never treated Aniston, which is a dangerous sign of the source and the credibility of the article."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Over the years Hart has made several cameos in Pink’s music videos.”
“The rumors were brushed off by husband Carey Hart.”
“In May of 2014 rumors surfaced that Pink was pregnant once again.”
“Pink announced her pregnancy on the Ellen DeGeneres show.”
“Pink and Hart have one daughter, Willow Sage Hart who was born in June 2011.”
“The couple has matching tattoos on their wrists that say “Tru Luv”.”
“The next year they ended up getting back together once again.”
“In 2008 the couple announced that they had been separated.”
“They took their four dogs on their honeymoon which consisted of going snowboarding.”
“The two got married in 2006 in Costa Rica.”


"Hart has been guest stars in Pinker's music videos several times over the years."
"The rumor was written off by her husband, Kelly Hart."
"In May 2014, rumors about pink getting pregnant again surfaced."
"Pinker announced that she was pregnant on Ellen DeGeneres."
"Pinker and Hart have a daughter, willow sage Hart, who was born in June 2011."
The couple have "tru luv" tattoos on their wrists
"The next year they got together again."
"In 2008, the couple announced their separation."
"They took four dogs on their honeymoon, including skiing."
"They married in Costa Rica in 2006."



**Something goes wrong**
“And yes, Kim will say whatever she wants to say because she’s completely done and that’s ALWAYS been her privilege: to say no to more SATC, to say no to ever working with SJP again.”
“The fight wasn’t “completely fabricated.” That version is bullsh-t. Kim burned it down with that IG.”
“I couldn’t believe that they sat there and did an entire interview with SJP and never once asked her anything about Cattrall and this incredible feud.”
“As it turns out, they did ask SJP and they just published the Cattrall part later.”
“Here s what SJP had to say In this week s cover story Sarah Jessica Parker opens up to PEOPLE s Editor in Chief Jess Cagle about a range of topics current projects including HBO s Divorce and her new kids line for The Gap as well as marriage motherhood...”
“...and four decades of fame...”
“She also addresses the controversy over Sex and the City Last year after the plug was pulled on a third film, Kim Cattrall told Piers Morgan that she felt she’d had a “toxic relationship” with Parker and her costars.”
“But Parker says there is no feud.”
““I never talked about it, except [to say] that some of us were disappointed [about the movie not happening],” Parker says in this week’s issue, on stands Friday.”
““But I never responded to the conversation Kim had with Piers Morgan, where she said things that were really hurtful about me.”


"Yes, Kim Jong Il will say anything she wants to say, because she has done it completely, which has always been her prerogative: say no to more satcs, say no to working with SJP again."
"This battle is not" completely fabricated. ". That version is bullsh-t. Kim burned it with that Ig. "
"I can't believe they sat there and did a full interview with SJP, never asking her anything about katlar and this incredible feud."
"It turns out that they did ask SJP, and then they published the katlar part."
"Here's what SJP said in this week's cover story. Sarah Jessica Parker introduced Jesse Cagle, editor in chief of people, to a series of topics, including the divorce of HBO, the gap between her new child line and the marriage of mother and father..."
“…… Forty years of fame... "
"She also talked about the controversy over sex and the city after the third film went off air last year, and Kim Cattrall told pierce Morgan that she felt she had a" toxic relationship "with Parker and her partner
"But Parker said there was no grudge."
"I've never talked about it, it's just that some of us are disappointed that it didn't happen," Parker said in this week's Friday stand magazine
"But I've never responded to Kim's conversation with pierce Morgan. What she said really hurt me."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See who had the biggest highs and lows of 2016 as VH1 staffers discuss in the video below.”
“...lot of humility from Trump s victory and stressed the importance of education and equality...”
“...over the United States Imjustinwilson Imjustinwilson January 14 2017 Floyd Mayweather Jennifer Holliday Steve Harvey Kanye West Don King Omarosa Manigault Ray Lewis Jim Brown Zoe Saldana pic twitter com z1hsmdDDHB Hennsuke Nakamura BlackIce392 January 14 2017 The Guardians of the Galaxy star concluded by saying she d learned a...”
“...https t co HSeMoqByQ5 Michael Arceneaux youngsinick January 14 2017 IKilledBecky zoesaldana calling out Trump for his lies and abhorrent behavior is not bullying it s defending those he has abused Luis Burgos Vorykua72 January 14 2017 Zoe Saldana said hollywood bullied trump but trump has been bullying people all...”
“Saldana is the same person who said she couldn t complain about racism in Hollywood because her president is Black...”
“...pic twitter com fXbPESACZu Ol QWERTY Bastard TheDiLLon1 January 14 2017 Zoe Saldana so ur defending Donald Trump now ur the exact opposite of what Nina Simone represented this is why no 1 wanted u 2 play her pic twitter com PcWJ3UOiXw Skin of Becky IKilledBecky January 14 2017 Zoe...”
“She stay disgracing that prestigious imaginary university.”
“— Kimberly N. Foster (@KimberlyNFoster) January 14, 2017Atlanta A&T gotta take away Zoe Saldana's fictional degree.”
“Oh well.”
“Zoe Saldana is only talking about us "bullying" Trump because she got dragged for years for starring in that awful "Nina" movie.”


"To see who was the biggest high and low in 2016, VH1 staff will discuss in the following video."
“… I got a lot of humility from Trump's victory and emphasized the importance of education and equality... "
“…… Over the United States January 14, 2017 Freud Mayweather Jennifer Holliday Steve Harvey Kanye West don Omarosa manigalt ray Lewis Jim Brown Zoe soldana picture tweet z1hsmddhb heinusek Nakamura black ice 392 January 14, 2017 the guardian of the star of the galaxy finally said she learned... "
“… HTTPS t Co hsemoqbyq5 Michael Arceneaux youngsinick January 14, 2017 ikilledbecky zoesaldana spoke out for Trump's lies and abominable behavior, not bullying, but defending his abusers of Louis Burgess Warwick. January 14, 2017 Zoe Sardana said that Hollywood bullied trump, but trump bullied everyone all the time... "
"Sardana is the one who says she can't complain about racial discrimination in Hollywood because her president is black..."
“… Pic twitter com fxbpesaczu ol QWERTY base the dillon1 January 14, 2017 Zoe Saldana so you defend Donald Trump now you're the opposite of Nina Simone, which is why no one wants you 2 to play her pic twitter com pcwj3uoixw skin of Becky ikilledbecky January 14, 2017 Zoe... "
"She's been playing down that famous imaginary University."
"- Kimberly n. foster (@ kimberlynfoster) Atlanta a & T will cancel Zoe Saldana's fictional degree on January 14, 2017."
"Oh, all right."
"Zoe Sardana only said that we were" bullying "trump because she was delayed for several years because she starred in that bad Nina movie."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott asked if he s really the father For more on this story pick up the latest issue of In Touch on newsstands now...”
“Kourtney said no which has only heightened his suspicions Another insider also says that Kourtney who is currently dating 24 year old model Younes Bendjima isn t interested in debating with Scott Kourtney didn t want to hear it when...”
“Scott Disick was the perfect image of a doting dad.”
“Over the long Thanksgiving weekend he spent some seriously adorable father son time with his and ex Kourtney Kardashian s eldest child Mason 7 taking him to NYC to visit the Intrepid Sea Air Space Museum before hopping a private...”
“...jet bound for Miami where they took a helicopter ride and hit the beach...”
“Scott’s also often been on daddy-daughter dates with Penelope, 5.”
“But he’s rarely seen out with his youngest child, son Reign.”
“This sounds horrible to say but Scott is closest to Mason and then Penelope an insider exclusively tells In Touch adding that though Scott 34 has a bond with Reign who turns three on Dec 14 it s not the...”
“...same as the one he had with Mason when he was that young Now a source has some bombshell insight into why that might be...”
““Reign was conceived when Kourtney and Scott were going through a rough patch.”


"Scott asked if he was really the father of the story, and now he's picking up the latest issue of contact at the newsstand..."
"Courtney said no, it would only exacerbate his suspicions. Another insider also said that Courtney who is currently dating 24-year-old model yones benjima is not interested in debating when Scott Courtney doesn't want to hear it..."
"Scott Disick is the perfect image of a doting father."
"Over the long Thanksgiving weekend, he spent some very lovely father son time with his ex Courtney Kardashian's eldest son, Mason 7, to take him to New York to visit the Intrepid Sea and air space museum, and then dance a private dance..."
“… Jet to Miami, where they go to the beach by helicopter... "
"Scott also often dates five-year-old Penelope."
"But he was rarely seen with the youngest son, Ruijin."
"It sounds terrible, but Scott is closest to Mason, and then Penelope's insiders exclusively told in touch, adding that although Scott, 34, has a rule who turns three on December 14, the bond is not..."
“…… Just like when he was young with Mason, now a source has some amazing ideas about why... "
"Rule was conceived when Courtney and Scott went through difficult times."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...insider added...”
“As Jelena fans know, the A-list couple decided to take a break last month after spending nearly every single day together since they rekindled their romance in October 2017.”
“The 25-year-old singer chopped off her hair and was Baskin Champion!”
“Click through to go inside Gomez’s downward spiral.”
“...has been acting extremely erratic since her most recent split with on-again, off-again boyfriend!”
“The 25-year-old singer chopped off her hair and was seen toting around with The Bible before jetting off to Australia with friends last week.”
“RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned that family and friends fear she’s gone “off the rails!” To make matters worse, Bieber has seemingly moved on with hot blonde model !”
“Following their most recent breakup, Bieber, 24, was spotted crying his eyes out in L.A. and was said to be “devastated” that the “love of his life” wasn’t ready to commit, an insider previously told Radar.”
“Mandy has literally tried everything she can and Selena just does not seem interested in working things out at all Selena s friends think that the only reason she got back with Justin in the first place was to break his heart for breaking her heart so many times the...”


“… Insiders added that
"As Jelena's fans know, they've been together almost every day since they rekindled their relationship in October 2017, and last month they decided to take a break."
"The 25-year-old singer cut her hair and won the Baskin championship!"
"Click to enter Gomez's downward spiral."
“…… She's been very unstable since she last broke up with her boyfriend on and off
"The 25-year-old singer had her hair cut and was seen wandering around with her Bible. Last week she flew to Australia with her friends."
“ RadarOnline.com Website she fully understands that her family and friends are worried about her "derailment"! "What's worse, Bieber seems to have gone with the sexy blonde model!"
"After their recent breakup, Bieber, 24, was found crying in Los Angeles and said to be" shocked "that" the love of his life "was not ready to make a commitment," a person familiar with the matter told radar
"Mandy has tried her best, and Selena doesn't seem to be interested in solving the problem at all. Selina's friends think that the only reason she came back to Justin was because he broke her heart many times and hurt his heart... "



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The theme, which will be controversial for many of faith, has been approved by the Catholic church, who are donating over 40 items from the Vatican.”
“'This year, the exhibit will be housed in the Anna Wintour Costume Center and the medieval galleries at the museum’s main location; some of the exhibit will also be housed in at the Met’s Cloisters location, uptown,' says Time.”
“And Madonna gave fans an inside look at her preparations on Sunday night just one day ahead of the annual fashion event.”
“The 59-year-old shared a video of herself behind the scenes as her glam squad teased her hair and did her makeup.”
“Scroll down for video...Getting Met Gala ready!”
“Madonna gave fans an inside look at her preparations on Sunday night just one day ahead of the annual fashion eventDuring the long process, which she showed as a time lapse video, she could be seen snacking and drinking.”
“The queen of pop captioned the Instagram post: 'Even Queens need to eat #metgala #magic #heavenly.'”
“The day before Madonna kept a low profile as she made her way through the NYC streets, clad in head-to-toe black.”
“Getting the look right!”
“The 59-year-old shared a video of herself behind the scenes as her glam squad teased her hair and did her makeupA girl's gotta eat!”


The topic is controversial for many believers, who have been approved by the Catholic Church, who donated more than 40 items from the Vatican
"This year, the exhibition will be in the Anna Wintour costume center and the medieval Gallery, the main location of the museum; some will also be in the residential area of the Met's cloisters in London," time said
"The day before the annual fashion event, Madonna introduced her preparations to fans on Sunday night."
"The 59 year old shared a video of herself behind the scenes, with her dazzling team teasing her hair and putting on makeup."
"Scroll down video Get ready for the party
"On Sunday night, Madonna introduced her preparations to fans the day before the annual fashion event. In this long process, Madonna showed her preparation in the form of delayed video, people can see her eating snacks and drinking
"Pop queen wrote in her instagram post:" even the queen needs to eat 'metgara', 'magic', 'paradise' "
"The day before, Madonna wore black from head to toe and kept a low profile as she walked through the streets of New York."
"The right shape!"
"The 59 year old shared a video of herself behind the scenes. Her dazzling team teased her hair and made her some cosmetics that a girl must eat!"



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“"North and Saint are especially thrilled to welcome their baby sister."”
“"We are incredibly grateful to our surrogate who made our dreams come true with the greatest gift one could give and to our wonderful doctors and nurses for their special care," Kardashian said.”
“She wants the family to get even bigger!”Kardashian wrote about her experience with her surrogate when she announced Chicago’s birth on her site.”
“"She is so happy being a family of five.”
““Kim definitely wants more kids," the source added.”
““She’s so happy with the whole process and thrilled with the surrogate."”
““Even before Chicago was born, Kim was talking about asking the surrogate to carry her next baby,” a source tells People.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"North and the saint are very happy to welcome their little sister."
"We are very grateful to our surrogate mother for giving us the best gift to make our dream come true and for the special care given to us by our excellent doctors and nurses," Kardashian said
"She wants to make her home bigger! "When Kardashian announced her birth in Chicago on her website, she wrote about her experience with a surrogate mother."
"She's so happy to be a family of five."
"Kim definitely wants more children," the source added
"She was happy with the whole process and excited about the surrogate mother."
"Even before she was born in Chicago, Kim was talking about getting a surrogate mother to have her next child," a source told people



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He better get them.”
“During a rally with Boy Scouts in July, Trump quipped that if Price couldn’t wrangle the votes, he’d dismiss him.”
“Instead of moving past the storm, Price’s offer to reimburse the government for only a fraction of the flights’ costs enraged Trump further.”
“Over the course of the week, Trump fumed to aides about Price’s flights, which he deemed “stupid,” according to multiple sources.”
“The scandal infuriated Trump, who viewed the controversy as a needless distraction from his agenda.”
“The cost for the trips ran into the hundreds of thousands of dollars.”
“Price’s departure came as he’s being investigated by the department’s inspector general for using private jets for multiple government business trips, even to fly distances often as short as from Washington to Philadelphia.”
“...bring accountability to Washington...”
“Story highlights The scandal infuriated Trump Price is the latest casualty in the administration CNN Tom Price the embattled health and human services secretary resigned Friday in the midst of a scandal over his use of private planes a storm that enraged President Donald Trump and undercut his promise to...”
“US Secretary of Health and Human Services Tom Price attends a press conference about influenza prevention for the upcoming flu season at the National Press Club in Washington, DC, September 28, 2017.”


"He'd better get it."
"At a rally with the boy scouts in July, trump joked that if price didn't win the vote, he would fire him."
"Price's proposal to repay only a small part of the cost of the flight to the government not only failed to cross the storm, but further angered trump."
"During the week, trump lost his temper with his assistant about price's flight, which, according to several sources, he thought was" stupid "
"The scandal angered trump, who saw the controversy as unnecessary interference with his agenda."
"Travel costs hundreds of thousands of dollars."
"Price's departure comes as the U.S. Department of Commerce's inspector general is investigating his use of private airplanes on many government official trips, including short flights from Washington to Philadelphia."
“… Let Washington take responsibility... "
"The news focus scandal infuriated trump rice, the latest victim of the government. CNN Tom Price's ailing health and Human Services Minister resigned Friday in the scandal over his use of a private jet. The storm infuriated president Donald Trump and weakened his understanding of..."
"On September 28, 2017, at the National News Club in Washington, D.C., Tom price, US Secretary of health and human services, attended a press conference on influenza prevention in the coming influenza season."



**Something goes wrong**
“Do you think she’s prepping for a wedding?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Angelina’s new house?”
“Either way, the house is insane — check it out in the gallery above.”
“Perhaps staying in Los Angeles is her way of making sure Pax, Maddox, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox continue to have a relationship with their father?”
“However, we also know that Brad and Angie’s divorce has been much more amicable recently, and she’s been letting him spend more and more time with the kids.”
“The actress is reportedly already serious with this mystery man, and a family friend told InTouch that she’s even planning on marrying him!”
“The possibility of that big move happening seemed even more likely after reports surfaced on April 12 that Angie had met and fallen in love with a British philanthropist and businessman, whose identity has not been revealed.”
“This huge purchase comes following rumors that Angie planned on moving her kids to London so she could work there after her September 2016 split from Brad Pitt, 53.”
“There’s tons of space for the six kids, too — the house boasts 6 bedrooms and 10 bathrooms, plus a spacious backyard.”
“Cecil’s home, which he lived in until his death in 1959, is considered one of the greatest properties in L.A., and Angie will have some famous neighbors, including Casey Affleck, Natalie Portman and Ellen Pompeo.”


"Do you think she's preparing for the wedding?"
"Miss Hollywood, what do you think of Angelina's new house?"
"Anyway, the house is crazy - go to the gallery above."
"Maybe staying in Los Angeles is her way of ensuring that parks, Maddox, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivian and Knox continue to have a relationship with her father?"
"However, we also know that Brad and Angie's divorce has been getting along much better recently, and she has let him spend more and more time with his children."
According to reports, the actress has taken the mysterious man seriously. A family friend told touch that she even planned to marry him
"After it was reported on April 12 that Angie met and fell in love with a British philanthropist and businessman, it seems that this major move is more likely to happen, but his identity has not been revealed."
"The huge acquisition comes after rumors that Angie plans to move her children to London so that she can work there after breaking up with Brad Pitt, 53, in September 2016."
"There's a lot of space for six kids - the house has six bedrooms and 10 bathrooms, and a spacious backyard."
Cecil's family lived until her death in 1959 and is considered one of the best properties in Los Angeles. Angie will have some famous neighbors, including Kathy Affleck, Natalie Portman and Ellen Pompeo



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Legend: The Jack & Diane hitmaker has been performing music for nearly 40 years and will embark on yet another tour early next year...”
“The source told Closer: 'At one point in her life, not too long ago, she told all her friends she could never see herself getting married again.'”
“And already Closer magazine is reporting that rocker John Mellencamp is close to popping the question to Meg Ryan.”
“According to source, the 63-year-old musician is also considering moving to New York City to be closer to the 53-year-old romantic comedy darling.”
“Scroll down for video'Megs getting married!”
“': Meg Ryan is on the cover of Closer magazine's latest issueThe weekly's insider said: 'John is willing to move to New York, even though he isn't crazy about the big city.”
“This means the world to her.'”
“The pair have been dating on and off for four years as their distance has been well publicised to be problematic in their relationship with Meg residing on the East Coast and John living hundreds of miles away in Bloomington, Indiana.”
“Meg and John have both been married before.”
“The Jack & Diane hitmaker has said 'I do' three times previously.”


"Legend: Jack and Diane's killer has been performing music for nearly 40 years and will start another tour early next year..."
"Not long ago, she told all her friends that she would never see herself married again," the source told closer
Closer magazine has reported that rock singer John merenkamp is about to raise the issue with Meg Ryan
"According to sources, the 63 year old musician is also considering moving to New York City to get closer to the 53 year old romantic comedian."
"Scroll down to watch Meg's wedding video!"
"': Meg Ryan is on the cover of the latest issue of closer magazine. "John is willing to move to New York, even though he's not crazy about the big city," said an insider with closer weekly
"It means the whole world to her."
"The couple dated off and on for four years because the distance between them was widely publicized as having problems with MEG, who lives on the east coast, and John, who lives hundreds of miles away in Bloomington, Indiana."
"MEG and John have been married before."
"Jack and Diane's killer said 'I do' three times before."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementWe are yet to be sure whether or not the romance rumors with the Nigerian billionaire hold any seed of truth or not.”
“But they were spotted out and about in July and August, either having dinner together in a Hollywood hotspot or on a tropical St. Tropez vacation.”
“In addition, Kris admitted on Ellen’s show that she never planned to walk down the aisle with her much younger man.”
“For the very socially active and open about their private lives Kardashian-Jenners that definitely means something!”
“As for the matriarch’s relationship with Gamble, it is safe to say it hasn’t been going well at all considering the two haven’t posted any pics together on social media for over a year.”
“As she copes with the pregnancy news, Kylie Jenner has been relying a lot on her mother’s support and help.”
“Other reports are claiming that Jenner is interested in selling in Calabasas and wants to move to Manhattan Beach.”
“Reportedly, Cunningham is a Nigerian billionaire – heir of his dad’s oil empire.”
“That being said, it looks like the Keeping Up with the Kardashians momager may have finally dumped 36-year-old Corey Gamble and is now seeing another beau named Christopher Cunningham in secret.”
“Rumors are going around that Kris Jenner is dating a Nigerian billionaire.”


"We are not sure if the romantic rumor with the Nigerian billionaire has any seeds of truth."
But they were found out in July and August, or having dinner together in hot spots in Hollywood, or going on holiday in tropical st Tropez
"In addition, Chris admitted on Ellen's show that she had never planned to walk down the aisle with a man much younger than her."
"For those who are socially active and open to their private lives, there's no doubt what that means," said Kardashian Jennas
"As for the relationship between the matriarch and gamble, it's certain that considering that they haven't posted any group photos on social media for more than a year, the relationship is not good at all."
"Kelly Jenner has been very dependent on her mother's support and help when dealing with pregnancy news."
"Other reports say Jenner is interested in selling in Calabasas and wants to move to Manhattan Beach."
Cunningham is reported to be a Nigerian billionaire, the heir to his father's oil empire
"Having said that, it seems that Kardashian's mothers have finally dumped Corey Gambo, 36, and now secretly meet another boyfriend, Christopher Cunningham."
"It's rumored that Chris Jenner is dating a Nigerian billionaire."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prince Harry lives in Kensington Palace as well; the couple moved there after they were wed.”
“For now, Kate Middleton and Prince William live between a country manor in Norfolk known as Anmer Hall and London’s Kensington Palace.”
“An additional image of Prince George accompanies the interview, in which the young royal is shown chasing his younger sister outside the grounds of Kensington Palace as his parents look on.”
“The media makes it harder, but I will fight for them to have a normal life."”
“...out there...”
“WPA Pool Speaking specifically about his son the future King of England Prince William explains I want George to grow up in a real living environment I don t want him growing up behind palace walls he has to be...”
“I want to bring up my children in a happy, stable, secure world and that is so important to both of us as parents.”Prince William's number one goal: a happy home.”
““Stability at home is so important to me.”
“"I could not do my job without the stability of the family,” he said of wife Kate Middleton, son George and 2-year-old daughter Charlotte.”
“Prince William chatted with reporter Alastair Campbell in his comfortable study, surrounded by neutral tones and pops of tomato red.”


"Prince Harry also lives in Kensington Palace; the couple moved there after they got married."
"At present, Kate Middleton and Prince William live between a country estate called silent hall in Norfolk and Kensington Palace in London."
The interview was accompanied by a photo of Prince George, in which the young royal chased his sister outside Kensington Palace while his parents watched him
"The media makes things harder, but I will fight for a normal life for them."
“… Outside... "
"WPA pool specially talked about his son, the future king of England, Prince William, explaining that I hope George grows up in a real living environment. I don't want him to grow up behind the palace wall. He must..."
"I want to raise my children in a happy, stable and safe world, which is so important for us as parents." Prince William's first goal: a happy home
"Stability at home is so important to me."
"I can't finish my work without the stability of my family," he said of his wife Kate Middleton, his son George and his two-year-old daughter Charlotte
"Prince William chatted with reporter Alastair Campbell in his comfortable study, surrounded by neutral colors and lycopene."



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think it’s time?”
“Do you want to see Taylor and Katy call off their feud, HollywoodLifers?”
“While fans expect Tay to throw some shade towards her rival with her new album, ‘Reputation’ will reportedly have no anti-Katy disses at all!”
“Is this it?”
“Could the longstanding war between Taylor Swift, 27, and Katy Perry, 32, finally be over?”
“It seems that Taylor is ready to move on, as her upcoming album, Reputation, has absolutely no anti-Katy tracks, according to TMZ.”
“Taylor’s new record is “devoid of hate or trash talking directed at [Katy],” a source tells the publication.”
“Huh.”
“It may be too soon to call Reputation a peace treaty, but if Taylor has refrained from dissing Katy, her sixth album could signal a cease-fire between these warring divas.”
“Wait, what about that Mean Girls reference on “Look What You Made Me Do?” Taylor’s brand new single seems to take a subtle dig at Katy, as Ms.”


"Do you think it's time?"
"Do you want to see Taylor and Katie end their feud, Hollywood actress?"
"Although fans want Tay to cast a shadow over her competitors with her new album, it's reported that reputation has no anti Katie element at all!"
"Is that so?"
"Will the long war between Taylor Swift, 27, and Katie Perry, 32, finally end?"
According to TMZ, Taylor seems ready to move on because her upcoming album reputation has absolutely no anti Katie songs
"Taylor's new record is" no hate or trash talk against [Katie], "one source told the publication
"Well."
"It may be too early to call fame a peace treaty, but if Taylor doesn't object to Katie, her sixth album may mark a cease-fire between the two warring heroines."
"Wait, what do you mean by" see what you've made me do "? Taylor's new single seems to make a subtle dig at Katie



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Magazine, on newsstands now.”
“For more on Blake and Gwen, Ben and Mischa, pick up that latest issue of OK!”
“Mischa Barton is in the midst of a sex tape nightmare, and is fighting back!”
“Source: FameFlynetIf it’s not one thing, it’s another.”
“But it turns out we have the REAL reason why he went to rehab.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: FameFlynetMeanwhile, not everyone in Hollywood is living the good life, as Ben Affleck showed when he announced on Facebook that he went to rehab for alcohol abuse.”
“Source: FameFlynetAnd the country singer certainly seems thrilled about the pregnancy, as the source said Blake “had a lot of fun trying” for their first baby.”
“However, there are still no plans in the horizon to get hitched.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: FameFlynetThe insider said they are having a girl and are dropping the bombshell news on their show, The Voice.”
“Magazine, the two are planning on expanding their family stat!”


"Magazine, now on the newsstand."
"For more information about Blake and Gwen, Ben and Misha, see the latest issue of OK
"Misha button is in the nightmare of sex video, fighting back!"
"Source: if it's not one thing, it's another."
"But it turns out that we have the real reason why he went to rehab."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: fame flynet. At the same time, not all Hollywood people have a good life, as Ben Affleck showed when he announced on Facebook that he went to rehab for drinking."
"Source: fame flynet and the country singer seem excited about the pregnancy because the source said black" tried a lot of fun "for their first child
"However, there are no plans to get married at the moment."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: fame flynett insider said they had a girl and gave up their show, the sound of explosive news."
"Magazine, they are planning to expand the family size!"



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But I’m just happy it’s physical and not mental.”
““Rest well Hef.”“Few did more for writers, inc myself, breaking boundaries and helping Lenny fight for his 1st Amend Rights,” said Richard Lewis.”
“...and brand that not only became a playground for Hollywood s biggest stars but also changed publishing and pop culture forever...”
“So it’s fitting that in the wake of the news of Hugh Hefner‘s death, everyone from celebrities to politicians to former Playboy cover models are taking to social media to pay tribute to Hefner and honor his legacy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“There were those who admired him and enjoyed time at his infamous Playboy mansion, like former BFFs Kim Kardashian West and Paris Hilton — who spent much of Wednesday night sharing memories of Hefner via text.”
““RIP to the legendary Hugh Hefner!”
“I’m so honored to have been a part of the Playboy team!”
“You will be greatly missed!”
“Love you Hef!”


"But I'm glad it's physical, not psychological."
"Rest well, huff." "Very few people do more for the writers company, break the line and help Lenny fight for his first amendment rights," Richard Lewis said
“…… This brand has not only become a playground for Hollywood stars, but also changed the publishing industry and popular culture forever. "
"So when the news of Hugh Hefner's death comes out, it's appropriate for everyone, from celebrities to politicians to former Playboy cover models, to pay homage to Hefner and his legacy on social media."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Some people admire him and enjoy spending time in his infamous Playboy mansion, such as ex boyfriends Kim Kardashian West and Paris Hilton, who spent most of Wednesday night texting about Hefner."
"To the legendary Hugh Hefner!"
"I'm honored to be part of the Playboy team!"
"I'll miss you so much!"
"Love you, ha ha!"



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Patty Jenkins is also returning as the film’s director.”
“Though, then again, since this is the Cold War she could suddenly become a Soviet.”
“Cheetah, who was originally depicted as the alter ego of a socialite, will probably fit right in with Reagan’s America.”
“This time the superhero has skipped ahead in time from World War II to fight crime in the 1980s.”
“Wiig, who is mostly known for her comedy chops, would be the adversary to Gal Gadot’s Diana Prince.”
“According to Deadline, the Bridesmaids star is being considered to play Cheetah, a classic comic-book villain, in the upcoming highly anticipated movie sequel.”
“Photo: Steve Granitz/WireImageKristen Wiig might be sticking her claws into Wonder Woman.”
“Kristen Wiig.”


"Patty Jenkins will also return as a film director."
But now that it's the cold war, she could suddenly become a Soviet
"Cheetah, another self originally portrayed as a socialite, is likely to fit in with Reagan's America."
"This time, the superhero leapt in time from World War II to the fight against crime in the 1980s."
Wig's most famous comedian is Gail gado as Prince Diana
"According to the deadline, the bridesmaid star is considering playing the villain cheetah in the classic cartoon in the upcoming much anticipated movie sequel."
"Photo: Steve granitz / wireimagekristen Wiig may be reaching for wonder woman."
"Christine wig."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Photo by Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty Images]”
““It can be really hard on him.”
“And now, amid a new report that Jolie and Pitt were arguing over whose career should take priority, comes the news that Brad has exited from Top Gear, according to Design & Trend‘s sources.”
“Pitt had initially been viewed as the ideal person for show’s return.”
“But when Brad abruptly changed his mind, Top Gear was left in shambles.”
“As to why the famous actor would leave a show in the lurch?”
“Brad, 52, and Angelina, 40, are battling over who should care for their children, with a source explaining that the two had agreed to take turns minding the kids and pursuing career ambitions.”
““They’re at war over who’s looking after the kids since that agreement got blown out the window with her desire to turn her directing career into a success after several failures.”
“This is tearing them apart, but Brad’s got no choice.”Pitt is pointing to his efforts to help Angelina in her ambitions to become a director, but he feels that he has gone above and beyond by participating in her “flop,” By the Sea.”
“In addition, Design & Trend cites a friend of Jolie’s who describes the problems she’s had in her life and how they affect her now.”


"[Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty pictures]"
"It's really hard for him."
Now, according to a design & trend source, in a new report, Julie and Pitt are arguing about whose career should be given priority, while Brad has quit top gear
"Peter was initially considered the ideal person for the return of the show."
"But when Brad suddenly changed his mind, top gear was in a mess."
"As for why the famous actor made a mess of a show?"
"Brad, 52, and Angelina, 40, are arguing over who should take care of their children. A source explained that they have agreed to take turns taking care of their children and pursue their career aspirations."
"They are arguing about who will take care of the children, because the agreement was blown out of the window because she wanted to turn her directing career into success after several failures."
"It took them apart, but Brad had no choice." Peter refers to his efforts to help Angelina realize her ambition as a director, but he feels that he has surpassed her by participating in her "failure" the seaside
"In addition, design & trend quoted a friend of Julie's who described the problems she encountered in her life and the impact of these problems on her present situation."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are all so lucky to have you in our lives…””
“Your kindness and generosity is never taken for granted.”
“HL learned she loves seeing A-Rod with his girls & her twins — but does she want kids NOW?”
“Although Alex Rodriguez, 42, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, each have two kids of their own, J.Lo has apparently been thinking about having one more baby as a couple.”
“This past Father’s Day especially got her thinking about the future, as Alex’s sweet relationship with his daughters made a major impact on her.”
“Jennifer herself has 10-year-old twins Emme and Max, while Alex is the proud father of daughters Ella, 10, and Natasha, 13.”
“And not only does Jennifer love Alex as a partner, she adores seeing him with the kids.”
““Jen and Alex are the real thing.”
“They have found a love for each other that is very strong and very amazing for them both,” a source close to Jennifer shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““During Father’s Day she saw a certain side of Alex that impressed her, and seeing all along the father that Alex is has her thinking about maybe trying for one more with Alex.” How sweet is that?”


"We are all lucky to have you in our lives..."
"Your kindness and generosity have never been taken for granted."
"HL knows she likes to see A-Rod with his daughters and her twins, but does she want to have children now?"
"Although Alex Rodriguez, 42, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, each have two children, J
"The father's day just passed made her think about the future, because Alex's sweet relationship with her daughters had a great impact on her."
Jennifer herself has 10-year-old twins Amy and Max, while Alex is the proud father of her daughters Ella and Natasha, who are 10 and 13 years old respectively
"Not only does Jennifer like Alex as a partner, she also likes to see him with the kids."
"Jane and Alex are real."
"They found a very strong love for each other, which is amazing for both of them," a source close to Jennifer told reporters
"On father's day, she saw the side of Alex that impressed her. Seeing that Alex had always been a father, she thought maybe she could try again with Alex." How sweet is that? "



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although there were rumors of reconciliation over the last year, the pair officially filed for divorce in April.”
“Garner and Affleck initially separated in June 2015 after 10 years of marriage.”
““While we are here, for what it’s worth: I have three wonderful kids and my family is complete,” she joked of those frequent pregnancy reports.”
“I did not participate in or authorize this article.”PeopleThe 45-year-old adds that although this “isn’t a tragedy by any measure” it does affect herself and her young children with Affleck ― Violet, Seraphina and Samuel.”
““She still says Ben was the love of her life.”Garner was quick to respond to the story, writing in a statement, “I did not pose for this cover.”
““She’s certainly not jumping up and down and screaming, ‘I’m single!’ and planning dates,” the source says.”
“The article, titled “Life After Heartbreak,” seemingly presents itself as an interview with Garner, but instead references insiders and sources who claim her split with Ben Affleck has “been the most difficult decision for her.”Another insists Garner will “eventually” start dating again.”
“The typically private actress took to her Facebook page Wednesday afternoon to “set the record straight” on a cover story People magazine ran in its new issue.”
“Jennifer Garner can let those pesky pregnancy rumors go, but when it comes to misleading news stories about her divorce, she’s not here for it.”


"Although there were rumors of reconciliation last year, they formally filed for divorce in April."
"Ghana and Affleck separated in June 2015 after 10 years of marriage."
"When we're here, for its value: I have three great children and my family is complete," she joked, those frequent pregnancy reports
"I didn't participate in or authorize this article." The 45 year old added that while it was "not a tragedy in any way," it did affect her and her children's relationship with Affleck - violet, Serafina and Samuel
"She still said Ben was the love of her life." Ghana quickly responded to the story, writing in a statement, "I didn't pose for the cover."
"Of course she won't jump up and down and scream," I'm single! "There are also planned dates," the source said
The article, entitled "life after heartbreak", seems to be an interview with Ghana, but it mentions some insiders and sources who claim that her breakup with Ben Affleck is "the hardest decision for her". Another article insisted that Ghana would "eventually" start dating again "
On Wednesday afternoon, the typical private actress "clarified the truth" for the cover story of the new issue of People magazine on her Facebook Page
"Jennifer Garner can let go of the nasty pregnancy rumors, but when it comes to the misleading news about her divorce, she's not here."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of the report that Josh and Jen are dating?”
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Jen and Josh’s reps for comment.”
“A new report claims they found love with each other after their divorces with Ben Affleck and Fergie.”
“Jennifer Garner, 45, and Josh Duhamel, 45, may have found love again — with each other!”
“A new report claims the Love, Simon co-stars have apparently been in a secret relationship “for months” and built their rumored romance during breaks from filming, a source told OK!”
““That’s the best time for those intimate conversations, the ones you have at the beginning of a relationship to happen,” the insider said.”
““Away from home and looking for companionship, it’s easy to see what happened.”If these two are together, it’d be pretty interesting timing considering their divorces from Ben Affleck, 45, and Fergie, 42.”
“Jen and Ben announced they were separating in 2015, after a decade of marriage.”
“They officially filed for divorce in April 2017.”
““Anyone in Jen’s shoes, after all she went through with Ben, would doubt whether they could ever trust a man again,” the source said.”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of the story about Josh's date with Jane?"
"Hollywood life has contacted representatives of Jen and Josh for advice."
"A new report says they found love after their divorce from Ben Affleck and Fergie."
"45 year old Jennifer Garner and 45 year old Josh Duhamel may have found love again - love each other!"
A source told "OK! 》Simon's partner has apparently been in a secret relationship for "several months" and established a legendary romantic relationship between them during the break of filming, according to a new report
"This is the best time for those intimate conversations that you have at the beginning of a relationship," the person said
"Running away from home, looking for a partner, it's easy to see what's going on." If the two were together, it would be a very interesting time considering their divorce from Ben Affleck, 45, and Fergie, 42
"Jane and Ben announced their separation in 2015 after 10 years of marriage."
"They formally filed for divorce in April 2017."
"After all that Jennie and Ben have gone through, anyone in Jennie's shoes will wonder if they can trust another man," the source said



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“It’s how you live your life.”6 Angelina wants full custody of their six children Credit: Rex FeaturesFrench actress Marion has previously starred in Inception, and won an Oscar in 2007 for her role as Edith Piaf in La Vie en Rose.”
“The New York Post reports that the 41-year-old hired a private investigator to spy on him on the set of his latest film — where they claim she learned he was cheating.”
“The "well placed source" told the paper's Page Six section that there is no turning back for the couple - worth £310 million.”
“6 Brad Pitt and Marion Cotillard on set of their new film Credit: Fame FlynetThey said: “She hired a private eye because she felt that he was fooling around with her on the set, and it turns out, he was.”
“"And that was the final straw."”
“Pitt had been rumored to have been cozying up to his Allied co-star, 40-year-old Marion Cotillard, in London for months.”
“If the rumours are true it means history has repeated itself - Brad and Angelina famously fell in love while filming Mr and Mrs Smith in 2004.”
“At the time he was married to Friends actress Jennifer Aniston.”
“He and Jolie also had been sparring over their lifestyle, another source said.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"That's your way of life." Angelina wants full custody of their six children. It's her credit: Rex's close-up French actress Marion starred in inception and won an Oscar in 2007 for her role as Edith Piaf in life in the rose
"According to the New York Post, the 41 year old girl hired a private detective to watch him on the set of his latest movie - they claimed she learned he was cheating on the set."
"The 'privileged source' told the page 6 page of the newspaper that the couple had no way back - worth 310 million pounds."
Brad Pitt and Marion godia, speaking on the set of their new film "success," said: "she hired a private detective because she thought he was fooling around with her on the set, and as a result, he was."
"This is the last straw."
Pitt is said to have been courting his partner, 40 year old Marion godia, in London for months
"If it's true, it's a repeat of history - Brad and Angelina were famously in love when they filmed the Smiths in 2004."
"He was married to friends actress Jennifer Aniston."
"He and Julie have also been arguing about their lifestyle," another source said



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Evan Agostini/Getty Images]”
“He feels a deep connection with her.”
“As all of Brad’s fans and followers know, before starting his high-profile affair with Angelina after working with her on Mr. & Mrs. Smith, the War Machine actor was happily married to Friends TV star Jennifer Aniston.”
“There are now alleged reports that as Angelina is no more in Brad’s life, he is trying to give romance with former wife Jennifer Aniston a second chance.”
“It was earlier reported by the Inquisitr that it’s been more than 500 days since Brad Pitt was seen out in the public with his six children he has with Angelina Jolie.”
“However, these alleged reports were later debunked by Gossip Cop.”
“Most recently In Touch magazine s cover story allegedly claims that after parting ways with Angelina Jolie for good Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are taking a second chance at love The tabloid s issue teases how Jennifer is helping her ex husband Brad in moving on from his ugly...”
“...divorce from Angelina...”
““Brad’s conversations with Jen have helped him negotiate his new life as he’s getting divorced.”
“Brad would take a second chance at love in a heartbeat.”Jennifer Aniston met Brad Pitt in 1998 and the couple got married after two years of dating on July 29, 2000, in Malibu.”


"[close up of Evan Agostini / Getty pictures]"
"He felt a deep connection with her."
"All of Brad's fans and followers know that after working with Angelina on Mr. and Mrs. Smith, Brad started a high-profile relationship with Angelina. Before that, the war machine actor happily married friends TV star Jennifer Aniston."
"Now it's reported that as Angelina is no longer in Brad's life, he's trying to give his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston, a second chance of romance."
"Brad Pitt has been in public for more than 500 days with his and Angelina Jolie's six children," the prosecutor reported earlier
"However, these so-called reports were later exposed by the gossip police."
"A recent cover story in touch magazine claimed that Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston had a second chance to fall in love after breaking up with Angelina Jolie. The tabloid teased how Jennifer helped her ex husband Brad out of ugliness..."
“… Divorce Angelina... "
"Brad and Jan's conversation helped him negotiate a new life when he was about to divorce."
"Brad will soon have a second chance to fall in love." Jennifer Aniston met Brad Pitt in 1998. On July 29, 2000, they got married after dating for two years in Malibu



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fox has invested millions into pro-Satanic programming like TV show 'Lucifer'© pressTV network Fox has also being accused of trying to "take the Devil mainstream" after investing millions into pro-Satanic programming.”
“If what Carrey is saying is correct, then maybe these revelations aren't accidental slip-ups at all but are meant to be an intentional push at taking their Satanic teachings into the mainstream.”
“"Once Satan is the dominant force on Earth, there will be no more Christmas.”
“"You keep seeing these celebrities opening up about their devotion to Lucifer, and that's not a slip of the tongue: They are preparing for the final push.”
“"It's only now that the trigger is being engaged and the final stages of the agenda are being fulfilled.”
“"They are not trying to manifest themselves into the zeitgeist: Satan is already fully embedded in the public psyche.”
“"It's everywhere and has been for years.”
“"You must of all seen that, right?”
“"Satanism is being pushed through movies, TV, and pop music to brainwash young minds into following Satan.”
“Following a smattering of nervous laughter from the group, Carrey was prompted to elaborate:"Those dark forces who control everything - the Illuminati - the Illumi-nutty - they are working hard to eradicate tradition values.”


"Fox has invested millions of dollars in programs that support Satan, such as the TV show Lucifer." After investing millions of dollars in support of Satan's programs, fox, the presstv network, has also been accused of trying to "occupy the devil's mainstream."
"If Kerry is right, then these revelations may not be accidental mistakes at all, but intentionally bring their Satanism into the mainstream."
"Once Satan becomes the dominant force on earth, there will be no more Christmas."
"You've always seen these celebrities publicly express their love for Lucifer, and it's not a slip of the tongue: they're preparing for the final push."
"It's only now that there's a fuse, that the final stage of the agenda can be completed."
"They're not trying to show their Zeitgeist: Satan is completely embedded in the public mind."
"It's been everywhere for years."
"You must have seen it?"
"Satanism is brainwashing young people to follow Satan through movies, TV and pop music."
After a nervous laugh from the group, Kerry was asked to elaborate: "the dark forces that control everything - the Illuminati - the light maniacs - are trying to eradicate traditional values."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Magazine cover, Kim Kardashian never said that it could have happened to her marriage this year.”
“Love you.”Happy Birthday babe @kanyewest !!!!!”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have been plagued by divorce rumors for years, but they’ve defied the naysayers and held on to their marriage so far.”
“But now a tabloid has claimed that the Wests “barely made it this year” and that Kim Kardashian said that herself.”
“While the story could sound credible to some because of the drama that Kim and Kanye have been involved in this year, celebrity rumor watchdog, Gossip Cop, says that the story is untrue.”
“As Gossip Cop reports, OK!”
“Magazine recently reported that Kim confessed that her and her husband’s relationship almost didn’t survive this year.”
“They based their reporting on a tweet that Kim posted to celebrate Kanye’s Birthday.”
““Kim Kardashian Wishes Kanye A Happy Birthday — Says They Barely Made It This Year,” one headline for the article declared.”
“Another headline read, “Marital Problems?”


"On the cover of the magazine, Kim Kardashian never said that this year's marriage would happen."
"I love you." Happy birthday, baby @ kanyewest!! "
"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have been plagued by divorce rumors for many years, but they have not been afraid of public criticism, and they insist on their marriage to this day."
"But now a tabloid claims that the wests" have had little success this year, "and Kim Kardashian herself says so
"Although the story may sound credible, because Kim Jong Un and Kanye participated in the drama this year, celebrity rumor monitoring agency, gossip police, said the story is not true."
"As the gossip police said, all right!"
"The magazine recently reported that Kim admitted that her relationship with her husband has barely been able to last this year."
"Their report is based on a micro blog posted by Kim Jong Il to celebrate Kanye's birthday."
"Kim kardashan wishes Kanye a happy birthday - saying they have had little success this year," read a headline
Another title is "marriage problem?"



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News reported.”
“The brunette is spending time with her mother Doria Ragland before the wedding, E!”
“According to a source Meghan Markle flew back to her hometown of Los Angeles.”
“But royal fans needn’t worry - the royal-to-be is not getting cold feet.”
“The 36-year-old Suits actress, who has been dating Prince Harry for two years, left the UK last week.”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TVMeghan Markle is set to have her wedding next month, but sources claim the actress has left the country in recent news.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"News coverage."
"The brunette was with her mother, Doria Raglan, before the wedding, e!"
"According to the source, Megan markel flew back to her hometown of Los Angeles."
"But royal fans don't have to worry - the future royal family won't be left out."
"The 36 year old actress, who has been dating Prince Harry for two years, left the UK last week."
"Sign up now for the most important moment of the morning, tvmeghan Markle will be married next month, but it is reported that the actress has left the country in recent news."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“West then tells Cait that she’s “changing society in the most meaningful way,” adding that what the former Olympian did was “one of the strongest things that have happened” in her entire lifetime.”
““What’s up,” the rapper says to Caitlyn as he gives her a hug.”
“When the family arrives, Cait says to her mom, “It’s okay, it’s okay.” Esther replied, “I knew it would be,” as the entire clan hugs in the entryway.”
“(Spoiler alert: She ends up signing it as Caitlyn).”
“She wonders how she should sign her mother’s birthday card — as Bruce or as Caitlyn?”
“This is the first time the family has been all together in a whopping four years, and Caitlyn is fretting because Esther has yet to meet Cait.”
“...am a woman In the first few scenes of I Am Cait s premiere Caitlyn is seen nervously pacing at home because her sisters and her mother are on their way over...”
“Esther Jenner Meets Caitlyn for the First Time Ever Esther Jenner Kylie Kendall Brandon and Brody s maternal grandmother has continually voiced her public support for Caitlyn even prior to the star s sit down interview with Diane Sawyer during which the athlete confirmed For all intents and purposes I”
“Ronda even helped her pick the name “Caitlyn.”2.”
“Caitlyn says in her docuseries that she began confiding in Ronda about transitioning close to two years ago.”


West then told Kate that she was "changing society in the most meaningful way," adding that what the former Olympian did was "one of the strongest things that happened in her life."
"What's the matter," the rapper told Caitlin as she hugged her
"When the family arrived, Cain said to her mother," it's OK, it's OK. " Esther replied, "I know it will," and the whole family hugged at the entrance
"(spoiler Alert: she finally signed in Caitlin's name."
"She wanted to know how she would sign her mother's birthday card - Bruce or Caitlin?"
"This is the first time the family has been together in four years, and Caitlin is upset that Esther hasn't seen Kate yet."
“…… In the first few scenes of the premiere of I'm Cain, I was a woman. Caitlin was pacing nervously at home because her sister and mother were on their way... "
"Esther Jenner met Caitlin for the first time. Esther Jenner Kelly Kendall Brandon and Brody's grandmother have been publicly supporting Caitlin, even before the star's interview with Diane Sawyer, in which the athlete confirmed all my intentions and purposes."
Ronda even named her "Caitlin"
"Caitlin said in her document that she began to disclose the transformation to Ronda nearly two years ago."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Paris Jackson Goes Topless During Nature Retreat, Reunites With Godfather Macaulay CulkinTroubled ‘Home Alone’ Star Macaulay Culkin Is Looking Better Than Ever[Featured Image by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images]”
“Tattoos now cover the scars and track marks from the drug abuse.”
“That’s the claim being made by the National Enquirer.”
“They say that the “wild child” daughter of Michael Jackson has gone completely off the rails and that her family is concerned that she might be doing drugs to cope with the stress of her new modelling and acting career.”
“But Gossip Cop has looked into the rumors that Paris is currently doing drugs now, and it looks like they are false.”
““The family worries the stress of Paris’s booming modeling and acting career has catapulted her into substance abuse,” one ‘source’ said to the National Enquirer, as reported by Gossip Cop.”
“The Enquirer also claims that The Jacksons are concerned about health of the matriarch and patriarch of the family, Katherine and Joe.”
““The Jackson parents, both in their 80s, are fading fast,” the source claims.”
“Paris had a very difficult adolescence after her father died.”
“In an interview with Rolling Stone, she revealed that she was sexually assaulted at age 14.”


"Paris Jackson was topless during his natural recuperation, reunited with his godfather, Macaulay kurkin, and the" alone at home "star, Macaulay kurkin, looks better than ever (close-up of Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures)"
"Now the tattoo covers the scars and traces of drug abuse."
"That's what the National Enquirer said."
They said Michael Jackson's "wild child" daughter had completely derailed, and her family worried that she might be taking drugs to cope with the pressure of her new modeling and acting career
"But rumours that the police have investigated the rumors that Paris is now taking drugs seem to be false."
"Paris' family is worried that the pressure from Paris' booming modeling and acting career will make her suddenly abuse drugs," a "source" told the national inquirer, according to gossip police
"The inquirer also claimed that the Jacksons were concerned about the health of the matriarch and the matriarch Catherine and Joe."
"Jackson's parents are both in their 80s and their age is rapidly declining," the source said
"After her father died, Paris had a very difficult adolescence."
"In an interview with Rolling Stone magazine, she revealed that she was sexually assaulted when she was 14."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He started to “suspect she is resorting to substance use as the means to cope with these traumatic events.”One of Sweetin's representatives told multiple outlets that the relapse claims are "completely baseless" and "ridiculous."”
“Coyle says that Sweetin was not stable after her recent break-up with ex-fiance Justin Hodak.”
“While on the phone with Sweetin, he says he became worried due to the way she sounded.”
“The two were married from 2012-2015.”
“The Blast reported earlier this week her ex-husband, Morty Coyle, had “serious concerns” about the 35-year-old actress' sobriety.”
“Sweetin made the appearance on the DWTS set amid the reports that she has reportedly relapsed.”
“#friendsarefamily #pineapple #teammosweet."”
“Love you, Keo!!”
“...again next season.”
“"I'm so proud of how hard he works and even though his journey this season was short, I know he'll be ready to come back for more (and hopefully longer!)”


He began to "suspect that she was using drugs to deal with these traumatic events." A representative of sweetIn told a number of media that the claim of recurrence was "totally groundless" and "ridiculous."
"Coyle said that after the recent breakup with former fiance Justin hodak, the situation is not stable."
"On the phone with sweeting, he said he was worried about the way she spoke."
"The two married in 2012-2015."
Bomb reports earlier this week said her ex husband, Morty Coyle, expressed "serious concern" about the 35 year old actress's soberness
"SweetIn appeared on the stage of DWT when it was reported that she had relapsed."
"Friends, family, pineapple and team are the sweetest."
"Love you, GIO!"
“… Come back next season. "
"I'm proud of his efforts and I know he'll be ready to come back more (hopefully longer!) even though he has a short journey this season."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We also apologize for putting Kendall Jenner in this position.” The commercial has been pulled off the air.”
“Reps for Metallica, Pink Floyd, Kiss and Led Zeppelin and the Shakur estate did not immediately respond to requests for comment.”
“...model reality star siblings they retailed for 125 and had the words Repurposed in the USA printed on each...”
“...pic twitter com BhmuUVrDBn Sharon Osbourne MrsSOsbourne June 29 2017 The T shirts in question were unveiled on the sisters Kendall Kylie online shop Wednesday and featured images of Tupac Shakur Biggie Smalls Black Sabbath Metallica Pink Floyd the Doors Kiss and Led Zeppelin overlaid with Instagram shots of the...”
“Stick to what you know…lip gloss.”
““Stick to what you know … lip gloss.”Girls, you haven’t earned the right to put your face with musical icons.”
““Girls, you haven’t earned the right to put your face with musical icons,” she tweeted Thursday.”
“Sharon Osbourne, whose husband, Ozzy Osbourne, also had his likeness featured on one of the T-shirts, took aim at the Jenner sisters as well with a scathing tweet.”
“A post shared by Voletta Wallace (@volettawallace) on Jun 29, 2017 at 9:31am PDTAccording to TMZ, Wallace’s lawyer, Julian Petty, also sent a cease-and-desist letter to the Jenners.”
“This is disrespectful , disgusting, and exploitation at its worst!!!”


"We're sorry to have Kendall Jenner in this position, too. The ads have stopped playing. "
"Representatives of Metallica, Pink Floyd, kiss and led zeppelin and Shakur manor did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
“… Models, reality TV stars, brothers and sisters, retail for $125, each with the words "reuse in the United States..."
“… Pic twitter com bhmuuvrdbn Sharon Osbourne mrssosbourne on Wednesday, June 29, 2017, the T-shirt appeared in sister Kendall Kelly's online store, and displayed pictures of Tupac Shakur biggie small black sabbath metal powder Floyd the doors kiss and led zeppelin airship, covered with instagram photos.... "
"Stick to what you know Lip gloss. "
"Stick to what you know Lip Gloss "girls, you haven't won the right to decorate your face with music icons.
"Girls, you don't have the right to connect your faces with music icons," she tweeted on Thursday
"Sharon Osbourne's husband, Ozzy Osbourne, also had his portrait on a T-shirt, and she used a sharp tweet to point the finger at the Jenner sisters."
"Walletta Wallace (@ voletta Wallace) shared a post at 9:31 a.m. on June 29, 2017, and according to TMZ, Wallace's lawyer Julian petty also sent a truce letter to the Jenners."
"It's disrespect, disgust, the worst exploitation!"



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“But then she has to contend with new photos of him schmoozing all over Selena Gomez and it’s really tipped her over the edge,” spilled an informant.”
““Jen was angry enough to see him at dinner with Emma Stone, whom she considers a friend.”
“After the messy divorce, the two couldn’t find common ground among their shared friends, especially those Theroux may be interested in having more than a friendship with.”
“According to various sources, the two had been leading separate lives for months, and often disagreed on basic things such as where to live and whether or not to start a family.”
“As Radar readers know, Aniston, and Theroux, 46, called it quits this February 15, 2018, after just two years of marriage.”
“As far as Jen’s concerned it’s her or Justin and she doesn’t want to be a part of Justin’s social chain,” the source claimed.”
“...to service and style Theroux...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"But then she had to face a new picture of him chatting about Selena Gomez, which really drove her crazy," one source revealed
"Jane was very angry. Seeing him having dinner with Emma stone, she thought she was her friend."
After a messy divorce, the two find no common ground among their common friends, especially those who may be interested in more than just friendship
"According to various sources, the two have lived apart for several months and often disagree on basic issues such as where to live and whether to start a family."
"As radar readers know, Aniston and Cyrus, 46, broke up on February 15, 2018, after two years of marriage."
"As far as Jane is concerned, it's her or Justin, and she doesn't want to be part of Justin's social chain," the source said
“… Luke of service and style... "



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“...created and maintained by a third party and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses...”
“Which is why it might be surprising to some onlookers that, according to the Daily Mail, Prince Harry has declined to seek a prenuptial agreement before he marries Meghan Markle today in Windsor.”
“But we spoke to two royal experts who said nobody should be shocked at this news.”
“When it comes to the royals, prenups are simply not done.”
“This is not a celebrity marriage, it’s a royal marriage.”
““I don’t think members of the royal family sign prenuptial agreements,” says Katie Nicholl, author of .”
““It’s commonplace with celebrity marriage, but this is not a celebrity marriage, it’s a royal marriage.” Nicholl says that Prince William and Kate Middleton also did not sign a prenuptial agreement, despite the very public divorce between William and Harry’s parents, Prince Charles and Princess Diana.”
“And even though three of the Queen’s four children have divorced, none apparently had a prenuptial agreement.”
“Yes, there is a large sum of money in the balance for this marriage, but the true, staggering wealth belongs to the Queen, so it wouldn’t be divided up if Meghan and Harry did end up divorcing.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
“… Created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address... "
Prince Harry refused to seek a prenuptial agreement before Windsor and Megan markel got married today, which is why some onlookers were surprised, the Daily Mail reported
"But we interviewed two royal experts and they said no one would be shocked by the news."
"When it comes to the royal family, the prenuptial agreement is not complete at all."
"It's not a celebrity marriage, it's a royal marriage."
"I don't think members of the royal family sign prenuptial agreements," says Katie Nicoll, the author of the book
"Celebrity marriage is common, but it's not celebrity marriage, it's royal marriage." Nicole said Prince William and Kate Middleton also did not sign a prenuptial agreement, although Prince William and Harry's parents, Prince Charles and Princess Diana, publicly divorced
"Although three of the Queen's four children have divorced, it is clear that none of them have a prenuptial agreement."
"Yes, there's a lot of money in the balance of the marriage, but the real amazing wealth belongs to the queen, so if Megan and Harry do eventually divorce, the wealth won't be divided up."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While the above makes sense, we'd be lying if we said we weren't now praying for Charlotte to step out in an adorable mini pantsuit, like her new aunt Meghan Markle.”
“Woman and Home also notes that Kate puts Charlotte in traditional 'old-fashioned' outfits for official royal occasions because it marks the formality of the event.”
“Telegraph...”
“If they wear very simple things it s timeless in that you can t really date a specific photo or put them in something that seems out of date designer Rachel Riley who has dressed Prince George before told The...”
“...classic looks so the photos don t date...”
“Though Meghan Markle has been told not to wear a tuxedo because the Queen prefers women in skirts and dresses the reason Princess Charlotte is always in a frock is less extreme Kate Middleton wants to keep her daughter in...”
“While Prince George is barely ever seen out of his little blue shorts, three-year-old Charlotte is always sporting a feminine dress.”


"While that makes sense, we're lying if we say we're not praying for Charlotte to come out in cute mini pants, just like her new aunt Megan markel."
"Women and home" also points out that Kate asked Charlotte to wear traditional "old-fashioned" clothes on formal royal occasions, because it marks the formality of the event
"Telegram..."
"If they're wearing very simple clothes, it's timeless, because you can't really date a particular photo or put them on some seemingly outdated designer Rachel Riley who wears Prince George before telling..."
“… It looks classic, so the photos won't be out of date... "
"Although Megan markel is told not to wear tuxedos because the queen prefers women who wear skirts and dresses, the reason why Princess Charlotte always wears dresses is not so extreme. Kate Middleton wants her daughter to stay at home..."
"Although Prince George's little blue shorts are almost gone, three-year-old Charlotte is always wearing a feminine dress."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gossip Cop will continue to have updates.”
“Last month, Tran’s manager slammed Geragos for accusing her of making up the domestic violence allegations for self-promotion.”
“Rather, a female lawyer was sent in his place.”
“It’s also worth noting that Brown’s lead attorney, Mark Geragos, wasn’t even the one who represented him on Tuesday.”
“And in an indication of how seriously the judge is taking these matters, the next hearing will be an evidentiary one, in which both sides must present evidence regarding the allegations.”
“He granted their request for a continuance but demanded Brown appear at the next hearing, which is slated for June 15.”
“Furthermore, the judge accused his side of making a “mockery” of the court.”
“Upon seeing that, “his lawyers began to struggle because they had no clue” about the second case, we’re told, and were not prepared to argue it.”
“...not been served in the cases but evidence was presented to show he was properly served the restraining orders for both Tran and LaCour...”
“We re told Brown s attorneys came swooping into court expecting to get off easy on the technicality with Trans absence but the judge pointed out that Brown didn t show up either despite another petitioner ready to go Gossip Cop hears Brown s attorney tried to argue he had...”


"Gossip police will continue to update."
"Last month, tran's manager attacked Geragos, accusing her of fabricating domestic violence charges in order to sell herself."
"Instead, a woman lawyer was sent to replace him."
"It's also worth noting that Brown's lead lawyer, mark jeragos, wasn't even his attorney on Tuesday."
"In order to show the importance of the judge on these issues, the next hearing will be an evidence hearing, and both parties must present evidence on the charges."
He agreed to their request, but asked brown to attend the next hearing scheduled for June 15
In addition, the judge accused his side of "mocking" the court
"Seeing this," his lawyers began to struggle because they had no clue about the "second case," and we were told that they were not prepared to argue. "
“…… It was not served in these cases, but there is evidence that he was properly served with the restraining order against Tran and lacour... "
"We were told that Brown's lawyer rushed into the court, hoping to easily deal with the technical problem of inter departmental absenteeism, but the judge pointed out that Brown did not appear either, even though another petitioner was going to gossip. The police heard that Brown's lawyer tried to argue that he had..."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve noticed that he really likes that.'”
“He thinks that’s sexy.”
“Fergie and her baby son Axl wear matching bandanas as singer shows off her slender legs in LAShe just can't get enough of her beloved 10-month-old son.”
“And Fergie is even making sure she coordinates with little Axl, as they had matching bandanas when she was spotted carrying him around Los Angeles on Saturday.”
“The 39-year-old Black Eyed Peas frontwoman showed off her long slender pins and wore quirky sunglasses for the day out with her baby boy.”
“Scroll down for videoCool baby, cool!”
“Fergie wore a quirky pair of goggle shaped sunglasses when she stepped out in Sherman Oaks California on Saturday with her 10 month old baby boy Axl on her hip Fergie had picked out black and white patterned bandanas one...”
“...for her and one for Axl...”
“His was tied delicately around his neck as a cute bib, whilst hers was slung around her waist over the top of her shorts.”
“The tiny denim cut-offs featured a frayed edge and put as much skin on show as possible, and she teamed them with a black and white snakeskin print tank.”


"I noticed that he really liked it."
"He thought it was sexy."
"Fergie and her little son, aks, are wearing matching handkerchiefs, and the singer shows her slender legs with eyelashes, but not enough for her beloved 10 month old son."
"Fergie is even making sure she and little Akers cooperate, because they found out on Saturday that she was carrying little Akers around Los Angeles and they had matching headscarves."
"The 39 year old Black Eyed Pea singer showed off her slender pin, wore weird sunglasses and went out with her baby boy for a day."
"Scroll down video cool baby, cool!"
"Last Saturday, when Fergie took her 10 month old baby boy Akers to Sherman Oak Park in California, she wore a pair of sunglasses in the shape of strange glasses. Fergie chose a black-and-white scarf... "
“… Give it to her, one to Akers... "
He wore a lovely Bib around his neck, while she wore a pair of shorts around her neck
"The little denim cut features worn edges and as much skin as possible, which she paired with a black and white snakeskin print vest."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...not stop him...”
“She married the sexiest bachelor alive and she intends to protect him from any potential honey trap Advertisement If the Oscar winning actor wants to cheat he will find a way to do it Amal and her unattractive nannies can...”
“...insider went on to explain She trusts George but she s seen way too many A list men get sucked in by starstruck caregivers...”
“A source close to the respected attorney had the following to say Amal refuses to end up like Jennifer Garner or Gwen Stefani and so she ll hire dowdy helpers so her spouse won t be tempted to stray The...”
“...make sure he is never tempted...”
“The international human rights lawyer 39 is aware that her spouse is considered as one the most handsome men in the world and has dated half of the stunners in Hollywood so she will go out of her way to...”
“The actor’s wife does not want a beautiful woman to help her raise her twins because she has watched so many marriages destroyed by young, hot and fit help.”
“Anxious to play the biggest role in his life, the father-to-be was eager to start interviewing candidates who were qualified for the job when he learned that Amal’s primary concern is the nanny’s looks.”
“The pair also shares three mansions in California, Italy, and England, so it is not surprising that the parents-to-be have begun looking for an extra pair of hands to help them with their bundle of joys.”
“Mr. and Mrs. Clooney are very busy people, their respective careers take them all over the world and sometimes they are even forced to travel to dangerous and war-torn countries.”


“… Can't stop him... "
"She's married to the sexiest Bachelor in the world. She's going to protect him from any potential honey trap ads. if the Oscar winning actor wants to cheat him, he'll find a way. Amar and her unattractive nanny can..."
“… Insiders continue to explain that she trusts George, but she sees too many men attracted by star like caregivers... "
"A source close to the respected lawyer said that Amar refused to end up like Jennifer Garner or Gwen Stephanie, so she would hire sloppy helpers so that her spouse would not be tempted to deviate
“… Make sure he'll never be seduced... "
"The 39 year old international human rights lawyer knows that her spouse is considered to be one of the most handsome men in the world. She has dated half of the stuntmen in Hollywood, so she will go to..."
The actor's wife didn't want a beautiful woman to help her raise twins because she saw so many marriages ruined by the help of youth, sexuality and health
"The father to be is eager to play the biggest role in his life. When he learns that what Amar is most concerned about is the appearance of the nanny, he is eager to start interviewing candidates who are qualified for the job."
"They have three luxury homes in California, Italy and the UK, so it's not surprising that parents to be are looking for an extra pair of hands to help them have a good time."
"Mr. and Mrs. Clooney are very busy people, their respective careers take them all over the world, sometimes even forced to go to dangerous and war-torn countries."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just an amazing job by her of setting the boundary."”
“I always tell her, like, she saved my life because she was the first person to really tell me that, like, the party's over.”
“"I didn't know what my plan was," he said.”
“After some thinking, Zac decided to try to convince a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get prescription pills.”
“ABC via Getty ImagesHis partying, though, got more intense, and he desperately wanted more pills.”
“So, I had a lot of the outsides going on."”
“And, you know, I started dating a girl my sophomore year that I would eventually marry.”
“I mean, I was playing baseball, and I was trying to get out of there in four years, which I was able to do.”
“"I would not tell you that my drug use was so rampant during college.”
“And the Adderall eventually turned into some cocaine use here and there," he said.”


"She's great at setting boundaries."
"I always told her that she saved my life because she was the first to really tell me that the party was over."
"I don't know what my plan is," he said
After careful consideration, Zach decided to persuade a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get the prescription medicine
"ABC via Getty Images although his party is getting more and more intense, he is eager for more pills."
"So, I have a lot to do."
"And, you know, I started dating a girl in my sophomore year, and I'll eventually marry her."
"I mean, I was playing baseball and I wanted to get out of it in four years, but I did it."
"I'm not going to tell you how rampant I was when I was in college."
"Snakes eventually turned into cocaine abuse," he said



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Join our Facebook group for the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Prince William, and all things royal!”
““When Pippa found out she was pregnant, she was obviously thrilled and utterly overjoyed,” a source revealed to The Sun.”
“Now that Pippa Middleton is pregnant with her first child and friends think Kate Middleton is pregnant with her fourth, the sisters are turning to each other for expert mom advice.”
““They confide in each other about everything,” a source told Life & Style.”
““When they were younger they’d always share stories about boys and school life.”
“Now they’re sharing pregnancy stories!”Kate, who is already a mom to sons Prince George, 4, and Prince Louis, 2 months, and daughter Princess Charlotte, 3, is also helping her younger sister out with decorating her baby’s room.”
““She’s been giving Pippa lots of tips on what’s to come and helping her with the nursery,” the source added.”
“She s also given Pippa some of George and Charlotte s hand me downs but is obviously keeping some for Louis and her next baby The insider continued Kate and Pippa have had so much fun shopping online for baby clothes and accessories When Kate gave birth to her third...”
“...royal baby with husband Prince William on April 23 Pippa was one of the first people to meet the family s new addition at Kensington Palace...”
“So, now that Pippa, 34, is expecting her first little one with hubby James Matthews, the Middleton sisters are sure to be over the moon with baby joy!”


"Join our Facebook group and learn about the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Prince William and all royal items!"
"When Pippa found out she was pregnant, she was obviously very excited and ecstatic," a source told the sun
"Now Pippa Middleton is pregnant with her first child, friends think Kate Middleton is pregnant with her fourth child, and the sisters start to ask each other for their mother's professional advice."
"They talk to each other about everything," a source told life & style
"When they were young, they always shared stories about boys and school life."
"Now they're sharing the story of pregnancy! Kate, the mother of four month old Prince George, two month old prince Louis and three-year-old daughter Princess Charlotte, is also helping her sister decorate the baby's room
"She gave Pipa a a lot of advice about the future and helped her with the nursery," the source added
"She also gave Pippa some George and Charlotte's old clothes, but apparently left some for Louis and her next child to keep inside. Kate and Pippa have so much fun shopping online for baby clothes and accessories when Kate gave birth to her third..."
“…… Pippa, the Royal baby with her husband Prince William on April 23, was one of the first people to meet the new members of the family at Kensington Palace. "
"So now, Pippa, 34, is pregnant with the first child of her and her husband James Matthews, and the Middleton sisters are bound to have a full moon of baby joy!"



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“During the BBC interview, Harry revealed that both he and Markle were taken aback by the media scrutiny.”
“This is not a game - it is her life and his.”
“At the photo call in the Kensington Palace gardens following their engagement announcement, Harry was asked when he knew Markle was the one.”
“We should meet again.'"”
“"We met for a drink," said Markle, "and then I think very quickly into that we said, 'Well what are we doing tomorrow?”
“YouTubeThe two hit it off immediately.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle during the televised interview following the announcement of their engagement.”
“Cause if he wasn't kind, it just didn’t seem like it would make sense."”
“"I didn’t know much about him, so the only thing that I had asked [our mutual friend] when she said that she wanted to set us up, was, 'Well is he nice?'”
“"Because I’m from the States, you don’t grow up with the same understanding of the royal family," she explained during the BBC interview.”


"In an interview with the BBC, Harry revealed that he and markel were startled by the supervision of the media."
"It's not a game, it's her life and his life."
At the engagement ceremony in Kensington Palace garden, Harry was asked when he knew that markel was the man
"We should meet again."
"We met for a drink," markel said, "and then I quickly remembered, and we said," well, what are we going to do tomorrow? "
"You two will soon get along."
"Prince Harry and Megan markel were interviewed on television after they announced their engagement."
"Because if he's not friendly, it doesn't seem to make sense."
"I don't know much about him, so when [our mutual friend] said that he was going to frame us, the only question I ever asked was," how is he? "
"Because I'm from the United States, you have a different understanding of the royal family when you grow up," she explained to the BBC



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just keep Ben away from those mai-tais at the wedding!”
“If so, our sincere congrats go out to a couple that most folks didn't give much of a chance to.”
“And in fairness, they really did seem to move rather quickly from the very beginning.”
“Of course, there's still the minor obstacle of the fact that Ben is technically still married to Jennifer Garner, but it seems Affleck and Shookus won't allow that pesky little detail to stand in their way.”
“According to Radar Online, Ben and Lindsay are currently in the process of planning a Hawaiian wedding.”
““They want to do it before the end of summer when Lindsay goes back to work on SNL,” an insider tells the site.”
““They love Hawaii and had a great time there in April when Ben was filming Triple Frontier.”Is it just us, or does a Ben Affleck movie set in Hawaii with the title of Triple Frontier sound like something from an SNL sketch?”
“But we digress.”
““Ben’s talking luau, leis and Hawaiian shirts,” the source adds.”
““He’s already asked Jen to watch the kids while he’s away," says the insider.”


"Don't let Ben run into those Macs at the wedding!"
"If so, we sincerely congratulate a couple who most people don't give much opportunity."
"To be fair, they did act quite quickly from the beginning."
"Of course, technically there's still a small hurdle to Ben and Jennifer Garner's marriage, but Affleck and shokus don't seem to allow this nasty little detail to get in their way."
"According to radar online, Ben and Lindsay are currently planning a Hawaiian Wedding."
"They want to finish by the end of the summer, when Lindsay will return to SNL," an insider told the site
"They loved Hawaii, and Ben had a great time there in April when he was shooting triple frontier." Is it just us, or does a Ben Affleck movie with Hawaii as its background, called triple frontier, sound like something in a SNL sketch
"But we're off the subject."
"Ben was talking about Roo, leice and Hawaiian shirts," the source added
"He has asked Jane to look after the children while he is away," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Floryday.com offre les dernières collections de robe blanche pour toutes les occasions...”
“Great prices on nike and adidas football boots with free shipping.”
“Fashion Bomb Daily ShopSponsors2020 Events Email bookclairesulmers@gmail.com to bring Claire to your town!”
“Categories Categories Select Category Accessories Advertisement Africa Alicia Keys Amber Rose Amerie Andre Leon Talley Angela Simmons Anna Wintour Anniversary Art As Seen On TV Ashanti Atlanta Atlanta Shopping Awards Bags Beauty Best of 2007 Best of 2008 Best of 2009 Best of 2010 Best of 2012 Best of 2013”
“Best of 2014 Best of 2015 Best of 2016 Best of 2017 Best of 2018 Best of 2019 Best of 2020 Bethann Hardison Beyonce Billy Porter Black Designers Black History Month Blacks in Fashion Bomb Blogger Bomb Product of the Day Bombshell Makeover Boutique Spotlight Brandy Breaking into Fashion Brought...”
“...to You By Cardi B Cassie Celebrity Style Chicago Christian Louboutin Ciara Claire Cares Claire s Life Claire s Obsession Coats Cocktails with Claire Color Clash Concert Contest Conversations with Claire Cool Online Find Couture Current Events Date Night Diane Von Furstenberg Diversity Dresses Ethnic Models Fabulosity Fabulous Looks of...”
“...the Day FAQS Fashion Fashion Bomb 101 Fashion Bomb Africa Fashion Bomb Africa Fashion Bomb Baby Fashion Bomb Couple Fashion Bomb Daily Shop Fashion Bomb Exclusive Fashion Bomb Kids Fashion Bomb Man of the Week Fashion Bomb Men Fashion Bomb TV Fashion Bomber of the Day Fashion Bomber of the...”
“Month Fashion Bomber of the Week Fashion Bombshell of the Day Fashion Bombshell of the Week Fashion Discussion Fashion Etiquette Fashion Events Fashion for a Cause Fashion Fun Fashion News Fashion Nova Fashion Show Fashion Video Fashion Week Featured Finance Food Gift Guide Graduation Hair Halle Berry Hats Health HM”
“Designer Sale Holidays Home Decor Homecoming Hot or Hmm How Do You Wear It How to Get Into Fashion Week Iggy Azalea Indie Designer Insecure Instagram Intern Post Intimates Jay Z Jennifer Hudson Jennifer Lopez Job Opportunities Just Because Kanye West Kelis Kelly Rowland Kerry Washington Khloe Kardashian Kim Kardashian...”
“Kimora Lee Simmons Kylie Jenner Lala Anthony Lil Kim London Look for Less Look of the Week Lookbook Los Angeles Louis Vuitton Magazine Review Magazine RIP Mail Bombs Mary J Blige Maternity Wear Men s Fashion Men s style Miami Michael Jackson Milan Monday Motivation Monica Movie Night Music Music...”


“ Floryday.com "Wearing robes on various occasions..."
"Nike and Adidas football boots are cheap and free to ship."
Fashion bomb daily sponsor 2020 event email bookclairesulmers@gmail.com Take Claire to your town
"Categories categories select category accessories advertising Africa Alicia Keys amber rose America Andre Leon Talley Angela Simmons Anna Wintour anniversary art as seen on TV Ashanti Atlanta shopping bag best 2007 Best 2008 best 2009 Best 2010 Best 2012 best 2013 best"
"Best in 2014, best in 2015, best in 2016, best in 2017, best in 2018, best in 2019, best in 2020, Bethan Hardison Beyonce Billy Porter Black Designer Black History Month black fashion bomb blog main bomb product Day bomb transformation boutique spotlight brandy break into fashion..."
“… Give you caddy B Cassie celebrity style Chicago Christian lourden Chirac Lyle care about Claire's life Claire's obsessive coat cocktail and Claire's color conflict concert dialogue Claire cool net looking for fashion current affairs date night Diane von Furstenberg diversified dress national model fabulous charming appearance... "
“… The day FAQs fashion bomb 101 fashion bomb Africa fashion bomb Africa fashion bomb Africa fashion bomb baby fashion bomb lovers fashion bomb daily shop fashion bomb exclusive fashion bomb children's fashion this week fashion Bob men's fashion Bob TV fashion bomb that day fashion Bob
"Fashion bomb of this week fashion bomb of this month fashion bomb of this week fashion discussion fashion etiquette fashion activities fashion for career fashion interesting fashion news fashion star fashion show fashion video fashion week featured financial food gift guide graduation hairstyle Halle Berry hat healthy HM"
"Designer selling holiday home decor going home hot or, um, how do you wear it how do you get into fashion week? Edgie Rhododendron independent designer unsafe instagram intern posting intimate jay z Jennifer Hudson Jennie Lopez job opportunity because of Kanye West Kelly Kelly Franklin Washington Khloe Kardashian Kim Kardashian..."
"Kimora Lee Simmons Kylie Jenner Lala Anthony lil Kim London look for low angels Louis Vuitton magazine Review Magazine rip mail BOMBLES Mary J Blige men's fashion men's fashion Miami Michael Jackson Milan Monday motive Monica Movie Night Music..."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brangelina Exposed is due for release on December 1.”
“'Damaged relationship': Angelina with her mother Marcheline Bertrand in 2001She has since reinvented herself as a UN Goodwill Ambassador and a mother to three adopted children Maddox, 7, Pax, 5, Zahara, 4, and biological daughter, Shiloh, 3, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 15 months.”
“The 34-year-old actress allegedly confessed the illicit affair to Marcheline Bertrand, causing irreparable damage to their relationship.”
“'Marcheline had a live-in boyfriend whom she was very much in love with, but Angie slept with him when she was 16 and barely out of school,' a source told Now magazine.”
“'Her mother found out and ended her relationship with the man.'”
“Shock claims Angelina Jolie pictured in Hollywood last night with partner Brad Pitt allegedly slept with her mother s boyfriend as a teenager Brushing off the scandal Angelina made a sharp exit after dinner with her partner Angelina was said to be devastated when her mother died of cancer in...”
“2007 at the age of 56”
“The star is no stranger to scandal - she famously French-kissed her brother James Haven at the Oscars in 2000 and once sealed her love for former husband Billy Bob Thornton with a vial of blood.”
“Morton, who has also written controversial unauthorised biographies on Tom Cruise and the late Princess Diana, is expected to release the book later this year.”
“Author Ian Halperin claims to reveal 'new details of her volatile relationship with and estrangement from her father Jon Voight, her struggles with suicidal impulses, her heroin use, her sexual exploits and her remarkable rise to become an Oscar-winning actress.'”


"Brangelina will be on December 1."
"Relationship damage": Angelina and her mother, marcheline, in 2001 Bertrand reshaped himself as a United Nations Goodwill Ambassador and mother of three adopted children: 7-year-old Maddox, 5-year-old Pax, 4-year-old Zahara, 3-year-old Shiloh, 15-month-old twins Vivienne and Knox. "
"The 34 year old actress is said to have confessed to Marceline Bertrand about the affair, causing irreparable damage to their relationship."
"Marcheline has a cohabitant boyfriend who loves him very much, but Angie had sex with him when she was 16, before she graduated," a source told now magazine
"Her mother discovered and ended her relationship with the man."
"Shock" said that Angelina Jolie took a picture with her partner Brad Pitt in Hollywood last night. It is said that she had slept with her mother's boyfriend when she was a teenager. At that time, she was dismissive of the scandal. Angelina left suddenly after having dinner with her partner Angelina. It is said that Angelina was very sad when her mother died of cancer... "
"56 years old in 2007"
"The star is no stranger to scandals - at the 2000 Oscars, she kissed her brother James Harvey in French and sealed her love for her ex husband Billy Bob Thornton with a bottle of blood."
Morton also wrote a controversial unauthorized biography of Tom Cruise and the late Princess Diana, which is expected to be published later this year
"Author Ian Halperin claims that she reveals" new details of her unstable relationship and estrangement with her father Jon Voith, her fight against suicidal impulses, her heroin use, her sexual achievements, and her extraordinary rise as an Oscar winning actress. "



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But with all these new babies on the scene, who has time to date?”
“Adding, however, that she wouldn’t mind taking it out if her partner wanted children in the near term.”
“In recent weeks, both Kim Kardashian and her younger sister, Kylie Jenner have welcomed new baby girls after super secret pregnancies.”
“Add in the fact that middle-sister Khloe is also pregnant and expecting her first child in early April, according to her Twitter, and the Kardashian clan couldn’t be happier.”
“Still you ve heard the saying when it rains it pours Sure enough ENews sneak peeks of the newest episode airing this Sunday February 25 show Kourtney dishing to her sisters about a potential little cousin for brand new babies...”
“Chicago and Stormi...”
“So, straight up: Is Kourtney Kardashian pregnant?”
“Is she really going to freeze her eggs?”
“While there are no confirmations at this point that Kourtney Kardashian is pregnant, Kourtney’s own words suggest she’s got baby number four on her mind.”
“And we know KUWTK crews film episodes several weeks to months before they air.”


"But with so many new babies at the scene, who has time to date?"
"However, she added that if her partner wants a child in the near future, she doesn't mind taking it out."
"In recent weeks, Kim Kardashian and her sister, Kelly Jenner, have had their new baby girl after a super secret pregnancy."
"In addition, Khloe is pregnant and will have her first child in early April. According to her twitter, the Kardashian family can't be happier."
"Even so, you've heard the saying that when it rains, it's sure to bring enough benefits. The latest episode on Sunday, February 25, shows Courtney telling her sisters the story of a possible little cousin who is going to have a new baby.... "
"Chicago and Tommy..."
"So, to put it bluntly: is Courtney Kardashian pregnant?"
"Does she really want frozen eggs?"
"Although it has not been confirmed that Courtney Kardashian is pregnant, Courtney's own words indicate that she is thinking about baby number four."
"We also know that in the weeks to months before the film is shown, kuwtk's crew will shoot some episodes."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Jamie looked bloated like he d been partying a long time and he later took two women back to a more private pool and continued flirting Although Holmes rep has denied the couple split the actress 39 appeared downcast after landing in Paris for Fashion Week hiding her eyes behind...”
“‘Party Boy’ Jamie Foxx Blows It With Katie Holmes!”
“Actor spent a wild weekend flirting with bikini-clad women in Miami.”
“Jamie Foxx’s recent wild weekend of flirting with bikini-clad babes may cost him any chance to kiss and make up with a furious Katie Holmes!”
“RadarOnline.com has learned Holmes was fuming over her on-off lover’s recent blatant womanizing in Miami while she was in Paris with her daughter Suri.”
““Jamie’s going to have a lot of groveling to do if he wants to get back together with Katie,” claimed a friend.”
““Katie was warming to the idea of seeing Jamie again, but then he humiliated her with his shameless flirting.”“Jamie’s been caught with his hand in the cookie jar once again,” continued the pal.”
“There s only so much a gal like Katie can take The Batman Begins beauty appeared to be the last thing on Foxx s mind as he dirty danced with a group of scantily clad hotties at DJ Irie s 14th annual weekend bash at the ritzy Fontainebleau Hotel on...”
“June 30”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Jamie looks bloated, as if he had been to a party for a long time. Later, he took the two women back to a more private swimming pool and continued to flirt. Although representatives of Sherlock Holmes denied that the couple had separated, the 39 year old actress was very depressed after landing at Paris fashion week and hid her eyes behind her..."
"Party boys Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes screwed up!"
"The actor had a crazy weekend in Miami with a woman in a bikini."
Jamie fox has been flirting with bikini girls on a crazy weekend recently, which may make him lose the chance to kiss and make up with angry Katie Holmes! "
“ RadarOnline.com When she learned that Sherlock Holmes was in Paris with her daughter Suri, she was angry that her lover recently played with women in Miami
"If Jamie wants to get back together with Katie, he will have a lot of servile things to do," a friend claimed
"Katie was sensitive to the idea of seeing Jamie again, but then he humiliated her with his shameless flirtation." "Jamie's in the cookie jar again," the friend continued
"The only thing that girls like Katie can accept is that Batman starts to be beautiful, which seems to be the last thing in fox's mind, because he dances dirty in the luxurious Fontainebleau hotel with a group of naked hot girls at DJ Irie's 14th annual weekend party..."
"30 June"



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Reps for the Cavaliers have not commented on behalf of Thompson, whose cheating sparked a massive backlash on social media.”
“Thompson is now back in Cleveland — and was believed to have been at home Tuesday when pictures emerged of him and the Instagram model — where the Cavaliers will face the Knicks again Wednesday night in the final game of the season.”
“A source close to the Kardashian family said pregnant Khloé, who is due to give birth to their daughter any day now, “was devastated when she saw the pictures of Tristan with that girl, she went absolutely ballistic at him.”
“She is not only hurt, she is humiliated and worried for their child.”
“How could he do this and so publicly when their baby daughter could arrive within a week Nine months pregnant Khloé had remained at home in Cleveland while Thompson whom she has been dating since 2016 traveled to New York last weekend ahead of the Cavs game against the Knicks...”
“...at Madison Square Garden on Monday...”
“But, in photos obtained by Page Six on Tuesday, the baller was seen at his five-star hotel with Bronx Instagram model Lani Blair on Saturday.”
“Blair, who is also said to be a strip club bartender and bottle service waitress, spent four hours at Thompson’s hotel, The Four Seasons — according to witnesses — before they headed out together to private members club Soho House in the Meatpacking District on Saturday night.”
“Thompson and Blair were photographed returning together to his hotel at 5 a.m. Sunday.”
“Blair was seen emerging hours later, at 8 p.m. Sunday, wearing the same clothes she’d had on the night before and clutching an overnight bag.”


"Cavaliers representatives did not comment on behalf of Thompson, whose cheating sparked a massive rebound on social media."
"Thompson is back in Cleveland now - when photos of him and instagram models appeared on Tuesday, it was believed that he was already at home - the Cavaliers will face the Knicks again on Wednesday night in the final game of the season."
"A source close to the Kardashian family said that the pregnant Heroe is going to give birth to a daughter now." when she saw the picture of Tristan and the girl, she was shocked, and she was furious with him. "
"She was not only hurt, but also humiliated and worried about her children."
"When their baby daughter arrives in a week, how can he do it so openly? Khlo é, who is nine months pregnant, has been staying at home in Cleveland, while Thompson, whom she has been dating since 2016, went to New York last weekend before the Knights Knicks game... "
“… Monday at Madison Square Garden... "
"But in the photo taken on Tuesday on page 6, the ballerina was seen posing with Bronx instagram model Lanny Blair at a five-star hotel on Saturday."
"Blair is also said to be a bartender and bottle waiter at the strip club. According to witnesses, he stayed at Thompson's hotel for four hours before they went to SOHO house, a private membership club in the meat processing zone, on Saturday night."
"Thompson and Blair were photographed coming back to his hotel together at 5 a.m. on Sunday."
A few hours later, at 8 p.m. on Sunday, Blair was seen wearing the same clothes as the night before, with an overnight bag in her hand



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nobody can be prepared for anything.”Bullock has two adopted children — a son, Louis, now 8, and daughter, Laila, now 6.”
“I’m grateful that I’m here, blessed to have what I have.”
“I’m not going backward.”
“You can’t go backward.”
““I am exactly where I want to be now.”
“The Proposal star opened up to Vogue in October 2013 about her divorce: “We’re all where we’re supposed to be,” she told the mag at the time.”
“The two divorced in 2010 after James admitted to cheating on her with multiple women throughout their five-year union.”
“Sandy feels incredibly fortunate and blessed that she is sharing the parenting journey with Bryan.”The couple’s relationship comes after Bullock’s turbulent marriage to West Coast Choppers owner Jesse James.”
“He is 100 percent there for Louis and Laila and wonderful with them in every way.”
“Back in November, a pal of Bullock’s talked to Us about her relationship with the Los Angeles-based photog and described him as “one of the nicest guys ever.” The friend added: “Bryan has fully stepped up and embraced the dad role.”


"No one can be prepared for anything." Bullock has two adopted children, a son Louis, now 8 years old, and a daughter Lyra, now 6 years old
"I appreciate being here and being lucky to have what I have."
"I'm not going back."
"You can't step back."
"I'm where I want to be right now."
In October 2013, the proposal star announced her divorce to fashion magazine: "we're all where we should be," she told the magazine at the time
"The two divorced in 2010 because James admitted to cheating on a number of women during their five-year marriage."
"Sandy feels very lucky and lucky because she can share the parenting journey with Brian." The relationship between Braddock and Jesse James, the owner of the West Coast helicopter company, began after a tumultuous marriage
"He's 100 percent for Louis and Lyra, and it's great to be with them in every way."
"Back in November, a friend of Bullock's talked to us about her relationship with photog in Los Angeles and described him as" one of the best men ever. " The friend added: "Brian has come out completely and accepted the role of dad."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Fans Found Gigi Hadid’s Secret Twin and They’re FREAKING OUTCheck this out:”
“Perhaps we can put this particular rumor to rest now; after all, there's sure to be another one tomorrow.”
“Ultimately, we need to listen to the stars themselves, and in this case, it seems like Yolanda made herself pretty clear.”
“Images can be altered, and sometimes Photoshop is very convincing.”
“But this situation is a good reminder that we shouldn't believe everything we see on the Internet, even if it seems like a legit screenshot from social media.”
“Nevertheless, this hasn't stopped fans from speculating on Twitter and discussing the rumor at length.”
“We want to give her a high five for that explanation because she's 100% right — in a hypothetical scenario where Gigi is pregnant, it would be her news to share, not anyone else's.”
“"If my daughter was pregnant, she would be the one to announce it not me," she added.”
“"No of course not," Yolanda wrote in response to a fan who asked if the rumor was true.”
“As it turns out, it seems like that comment might have been the work of Photoshop, since the real Yolanda Hadid took to Twitter last night to clear everything up — and she made a pretty good point in the process.”


"Related report: fans found Gigi Hadid's Secret twins. They were scared. Look at this:
"Maybe we can quell this rumor now. After all, there will be another rumor tomorrow."
"At the end of the day, we need to listen to the stars themselves, and in this case, Yolanda seems to be speaking very clearly."
"Images can be modified, and sometimes Photoshop is very persuasive."
"But it's a good reminder that we shouldn't believe everything we see on the Internet, even if it looks like a legal screenshot from social media."
"Nevertheless, it doesn't stop fans from guessing and discussing rumors in detail on twitter."
"For this explanation, we want to give her a high evaluation, because she is 100% right - in a hypothetical scenario, Gigi is pregnant, which will be her news, not other people's news."
"If my daughter is pregnant, she will be the one who announced it, not me," she added
"No, of course not," Yolanda wrote in response to a fan's question about whether the rumor was real-time
"It turns out that this comment may be Photoshop, because the real Yolanda Hadid clarified everything on twitter last night - she made a very good point in the process."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story is developing.”
“The Daily Mail, TMZ and other outlets on Tuesday published photos and videos of Thompson, 27, making out with a curvy brunette at a club in New York City on Saturday night and then later entering a hotel room with the woman.”
“Kardashian gave birth to her daughter around 4 a.m at a hospital outside Cleveland.”
“Her mother Kris Jenner and sisters Kim Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian also were there.”
“The baby’s name and other details were not reported.”
“The Cleveland Cavaliers player had also been invited into the delivery room, despite the fact that he reportedly left Kardashian devastated and “ballistic” after news broke this week that he had been unfaithful to her with multiple women.”
“TMZ reported that the 33-year-old reality TV star, in her ninth month of pregnancy, began having contractions Wednesday amid all the turmoil of the cheating allegations.”
“Kardashian had relocated to Thompson’s hometown of Cleveland to enjoy the final stretch of her pregnancy and to give birth to her baby at an area hospital.”
“When news surfaced about Thompson and his alleged trysts with other women, it was too late in her pregnancy for her to fly back to Los Angeles.”
“Kris Jenner and Kim and Kourtney Kardashian rushed to Cleveland to be by her side.”


"The story is developing."
The daily mail, TMZ and other media on Tuesday released photos and videos of 27 year old Thompson making out with a curvy brunette at a New York City Club on Saturday night before entering a hotel room with the woman
"Kardashian gave birth to her daughter around 4 a.m. in a hospital outside Cleveland."
"Her mother, Chris Jenner, and her sisters, Kim Kardashian and kurtany Kardashian, were also there."
"The child's name and other details were not reported."
"Cleveland Cavaliers players have also been invited into the delivery room, despite the fact that he left Kardashian for sabotage and" ballistics "after news this week that he has been unfaithful to Kardashian with multiple women
The 33 year old reality TV star began to have contractions on Wednesday when she was nine months pregnant, all due to charges of cheating, TMZ reported
"Kardashian has moved to Thompson's hometown of Cleveland to enjoy the final stages of her pregnancy and give birth to her baby at a district hospital."
"When Thompson and his so-called tryst with other women came to the surface, she was too late to fly back to Los Angeles."
"Chris Jenner, Kim and Courtney Kardashian came to Cleveland to be with her."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This is not the first time that the magazine presents false reports surrounding Kendall and Blake’s apparent relationship.”
“Advertisement Gossip Cop also checked in with a source close to the whole situation who assures everyone that the outlet s article is completely bogus...”
“LIMITED EDITION DropThree available exclusively saks KK SAKS A post shared by Kendall kendalljenner on Sep 12 2017 at 9 41am PDT As for Griffin s inner circle the seemingly phony source further alleges His friends don t think much of Kendall who they see as stuck up and annoying...”
“...s worried he s being rude but ultimately he trusts Kendall s judgment because the last thing he wants is to be cursed like Caitlyn Jenner Lamar Odom and so many others it s here...”
“A so called source tells the magazine He s been invited over to Kris s for dinner numerous times but Kendall s told him to ignore the invites and keep away The outlet s dubious insider goes on to say Griffin isn t totally comfortable shunning the Kardashians because he...”
“On Ok!’s website there was an article posted where she says that she is worried about her family interfering in her love life and as a result, she advised Blake to stay away from her sisters and mom.”
“Marni to the rescue A post shared by Kendall (@kendalljenner) on Sep 15, 2017 at 10:59am PDTKendall and Blake haven’t even confirmed yet that they are dating, but the pair was indeed spotted together on various outings in the past few weeks.”
“Gossip Cop was the one that found out where things really stand between the two.”
“The false rumors say that the model is worried about the Kardashian-Jenner clan driving the NBA star away, but there is no truth to any of this.”
“This is completely fake news.”


"This is not the first time the magazine has published a false report on Kendall's apparent relationship with Blake."
"The advertising gossip police also contacted a source close to the whole situation, who assured everyone that the articles in the media were completely fake..."
"Limited edition dropthree exclusively provides a post shared by Saks KK Saks Kendall Kendall Jenner at 9:41 a.m. on September 12, 2017. Regarding Griffin's core circle, seemingly false sources further claim that his friends are not optimistic about Kendall whom they think is arrogant and annoying..."
“…… He worried about his rudeness, but in the end he believed Kendall's judgment, because the last thing he wanted was to be cursed like Caitlin Jenner Lamar Odom and many others... "
"A so-called source told the magazine that he had been invited to Chris's house for dinner many times, but Kendall told him to ignore the invitation and stay away from the suspicious inside of the media. He continued to say whether Griffin was completely comfortable avoiding Kardashian because he..."
"All right! In an article on her website, she said she was worried that her family would interfere with her love life, so she advised black to stay away from her sister and mother
"Marni to the rescue Kendall (@ kendalljenner) shared a post at 10:59 a.m. on September 15, 2017. Kendall and Blake have not even confirmed that they are dating, but in the past few weeks, they have indeed been found traveling together."
"The gossip cop is the one who discovers the real difference between the two."
"There are false rumors that models are worried that the Kardashian Jenner family will drive the NBA star away, but these are not true."
"It's all false news."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“U.K. cosmetic surgery group Transform reports that they have seen a 73 percent increase in inquiries from patients citing Kardashian family members as inspiration.”
“In August, Kardashian West documented a procedure with Dr. Ourian called “skin-tightening,” a way to get your stomach in shape without surgery, on Snapchat.”
“...it could look back normal she added...”
“You guys I never thought I could love someone and hate someone so much at the same time If anyone that s had babies understand what it s done to your belly button then you really understand how much you need Dr Ourian to tighten around your belly button so...”
““We are lasering.”
““So I’m spending my Saturday with Dr. Ourian and it f—— kills but it will be worth it,” she explained at the time.”
“Just last week, she revealed that she had visited Dr. Ourian to get work done on her belly button.”
“I love you Dr. Ourian!”RELATED VIDEO: Exclusive: How Kim Kardashian Is Affecting Plastic Surgery TrendsThis isn’t the first time the mother of two has taken her cosmetic surgeries to social media.”
“So I’m so grateful, and I’m so excited.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star continued, “I’ve been so scared to do it thinking it hurts so badly, and it didn’t hurt that badly.”


"Transform, the British cosmetic surgery organization, reported that they found a 73% increase in consultation with patients inspired by members of the Kardashian family."
In August, Kardashian West recorded a skin tightening operation on snapchat, a way to get your stomach back to health without surgery
“… It can go back to normal, she added
"You guys, I never thought that I could love and hate a person so much. At the same time, if anyone has children and understands what it does to your navel, then you really understand how much you need doctor Orion to tighten your navel, so..."
"We're using lasers."
"So I spent my Saturday with Dr. Orion, which was great, but it was worth it," she explained at the time
"Just last week, she revealed that she had visited Dr. Orion to complete her navel surgery."
"I love you, doctor Urian! "Related video: exclusive report: how Kim Kardashian influenced the trend of plastic surgery. This is not the first time a mother of two has had plastic surgery on social media."
"So I'm grateful and excited."
"Keep up with Kardashian," he continued. "I've always been afraid of doing this. I thought it was badly hurt, but it wasn't that bad."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So if he is thinking of getting back with Kourtney she wants none of it.”HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Younes Bendjima’s and Scott Disick’s reps for a comment.”
“...in 2015 haven t publicly taken a family vacay with the kids in Mexico since 2016”
“Is it her ex, Younes Bendjima?”
“Here’s another plot twist in Kourtney Kardashian’s love life.”
“The KUWTK star is allegedly pregnant after publicly being seen with “what appeared to be a bump” in L.A. on July 30, a new report by OK!”
“...magazine claims!”
““It was strange to see because she’s usually so perfectly svelte,” a source told the outlet, and a friend to Kourt added, “Everyone is whispering that she’s pregnant with her fourth child.” If Kourtney is supposedly pregnant, then who on Earth is the father to baby number four?”
“And by that, we mean, is it once again baby daddy Scott Disick, 35, or ex-boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 25?”
“Naturally, one would assume it’s the younger model, who to the world was Kourtney’s boyfriend up until recently.”
“But Kourtney’s anonymous friend makes a shocking claim — it’s more than likely Scott!”


"So if he wants to go back with Courtney, she doesn't want it at all." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of younes bendjima and Scott disc for comments. "
“…… In 2015, since 2016, I have never had a family holiday with my children in Mexico in public. "
"Is it her ex boyfriend yones benjima?"
"This is another turning point in Courtney Kardashian's love life."
According to the latest report of OK, the Kuyt star is said to be pregnant after taking a photo with look like a lump in Los Angeles on July 30
“… The magazine claims
"It's strange, because she's usually very slim," a source told the media, adding that a friend of curt's "everyone is whispering that she's pregnant with a fourth child." If Courtney is thought to be pregnant, who is the father of baby number four? "
"We mean, another 35 year old father, Scott Disick, or 25-year-old ex boyfriend, yones bengima?"
"Naturally, people think it's a young model, and until recently, she was Courtney's boyfriend."
But Courtney's anonymous friend came up with a shocking statement - probably Scott! "



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hugh was all in in that scene, we just laughed for four days.”
“That was enormous fun and we laughed a lot.”
“Even though we were seeing some really great actresses, I was just waiting for Lily to come back.”
“So she had met, but right after that, she went straight into doing publicity for “Baby Driver” and because it was doing so well they kept extending the publicity tour.”
“What was it about Lily James early on that made you think she could play a character that Meryl Streep had already played?”
“It is not often that they are mentioned in the same sentence — it’s not a comparison, it’s just a structural theft.”
“...also a writer and happened to be with Richard driving in a car said Well you should do Godfather 2 and I just went Brilliant I ll take it I would never think to put Godfather 2 and Mamma Mia together...”
“Then he wrote me again and asked How do you feel about writing the sequel to Mamma Mia So when I was trying to figure out the story I reached out to Richard about how to tell the story after so many years and his brilliant daughter Scarlet who is...”
“...that s how he rolls...”
“Prior to coming on Richard Curtis wrote me an email and asked Random question do you like Abba and I went Well who doesn t and that was like two years ago and I thought he was going to invite me to dinner with them because he knows everybody and...”


"Hugh, in that scene, we only laughed for four days."
"That was very interesting. We laughed a lot."
"We've seen some great actresses, but I'm just waiting for Lily to come back."
"So she met, but after that, she started to promote baby driver directly, because it was so good, so they kept expanding the publicity."
"What made you think Lily James could play the role that Meryl Streep had played in her early days?"
"Not many of them are mentioned in the same sentence - it's not a comparison, it's just a structural theft."
“… I'm also a writer. I happened to drive with Richard. He said you should play Godfather 2. I'm very smart. I don't think I'll ever think of putting Godfather 2 and Mamma Mia together... "
"Then he wrote to me to ask you how you feel about writing the sequel of Mamma Mia, so when I wanted to find out the story, I contacted Richard and told him how to tell the story. After all, his brilliant daughter Scarlett is..."
“… That's how he rolls... "
"Before the show, Richard Curtis wrote me an email and asked me a random question: do you like Abba? I like who doesn't like me. That was two years ago. I thought he would invite me to have dinner with them because he knew everyone and... "



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And the whole table just busted up laughing."”
“But since Jolie filed for divorce in September, 2016, the former friends reportedly become close again and bonded over fatherhood.”
“A report in Life and Style Magazine had claimed that Jolie destroyed the friendship between her ex- husband and Clooney as she was jealous of Amal.”
“However, debunking website Gossip Cop has dismissed the fabricated report and revealed that "it's not true."”
“An alleged source previously claimed to the Magazine that the Hollywood actors stopped talking because Jolie was envious of Amal.”
“An insider allegedly said, "Angie couldn't stand being around Amal, not because Amal was unkind or rude, but solely because Angie was filled with envy."”
“The dubious report continued, "Amal is educated, accomplished and well-respected in the political world, while Angelina knows people still think of her as an actress above everything else."”
“The human Rights lawyer is currently epecting twins with the 55-year-old Oceans Eleven actor.”
“The Magazine also alleged that Angelina also didn't allow Brad to attend George's 2014 wedding in Venice, despite filming their movie By the Sea just four hours away.”
“The insider claimed, "It took some time for George to forgive and accept Brad because he was really hurt.”


"The whole table is laughing."
"But since Julie filed for divorce in September 2016, it has been reported that the two former friends have become close again and become inseparable as fathers."
According to a report in life and fashion magazine, Julie was jealous of Amar and ruined the friendship between her ex husband and Clooney
However, the police who debunk the website gossip refuted the fabricated report and revealed that "this is not true."
"An alleged source had previously told the magazine that Hollywood actors stopped talking because Julie was jealous of Amar."
"Angie can't stand being with Amar, not because Amar is unfriendly or rude, but because Angie is full of jealousy," an insider said
Suspicious reports continued, "Amar is educated, accomplished and respected in politics, and Angelina knows that people still think she's an actress above all else."
"The human rights lawyer is currently re selecting twins with the 55 year old actor."
"The magazine also alleged that Angelina would not allow Brad to attend George's wedding in Venice in 2014, even though they filmed their film on the beach just four hours away from the wedding."
"It took George a while to forgive and accept Brad because he was really hurt," people familiar with the matter said



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


“… With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I wanted actual artists to be able to share their work.””
“I really wanted to bridge the gap a little and just introduce more artists into this kind of vortex in between and really support them because most of the art that you see that’s available at retail is made by graphic designers or computer generated.”
“But some negativity ensued, too.”
““The divorce rumors came and then we really knew the perceptions had changed,” the Arrested Development star, 45, told Us Weekly exclusively at the General Public x RH Celebration in West Hollywood on Wednesday, June 27.”
““I’m not kidding.”
“I know it sounds ridiculous, but when that started happening I thought, ‘Oh, now we’re finally accepted.’ We get the same s–t as every celebrity couple.”Split rumors aren’t the only ones that de Rossi has faced.”
““I thought, ‘Wow, this is great that I’m pregnant, not pregnant, divorced, not divorced, whatever,” she added.”
““That means there is an acceptance for this.”The actress said she and DeGeneres, 60, don’t necessarily laugh off the speculation.”
“In fact, they try to ignore it completely.”
““I was at a newsstand … and there was a cover of Brad [Pitt] and Jen [Aniston],” she recalled.”


"I want real artists to share their work."
"I really want to narrow the gap, bring more artists into this vortex and really support them, because most of the retail art you see is made by graphic designers or computers."
"But then there were some negative emotions."
"The divorce rumors come, and then we really know that ideas have changed," the arrested 45 year old development star told us weekly exclusively on Wednesday, June 27, at the mass x RH celebration in West Hollywood
"I'm not kidding."
"I know it sounds ridiculous, but when it all started to happen, I thought," Oh, now we're finally accepted. " We get the same S-T as every celebrity couple. "The rumor of a break-up is not the only thing that drossi faces."
"I thought," Wow, I'm pregnant, I'm not pregnant, I'm divorced, I'm not divorced, that's great, "she added
"It means it's acceptable." The actress said she and 60 year old DeGeneres would not necessarily laugh at the speculation
"In fact, they try to ignore it completely."
"I was at the newsstand There was a cover for Brad and Jen, "she recalls



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...also tweeted We got you Harvey Weinstein we got you...”
“Most were threatened to shut up Former actress Rose McGowan one of the first women to publicly accuse Weinstein of assault gave an interview to Megyn Kelly upon news of Weinstein s arrest saying I can say this the man who pinned me down had handcuffs on him today She...”
“Weinstein has in the past denied all allegations of “non-consensual sex” and continues to do so.”
“More than 80 women have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or assault in alleged incidents that span several decades.”
“More charges are expected as a grand jury continues to hear testimony in the state’s case with at least four women expected to testify, a source familiar with the investigation told CNN.”
“The Manhattan District Attorney’s office says Friday’s charges relate to incidents with two separate women in 2013 and 2004.”
“...act in the first degree...”
“Photo by TIMOTHY A CLARY AFP Photo credit should read TIMOTHY A CLARY AFP Getty Images CNN Seven months after women began coming forward with stories alleging sexual misconduct by Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein the former movie mogul has been arraigned on charges of rape and committing a criminal sexual...”
“(Photo by Billy Farrell/Patrick McMullan via Getty Images)TOPSHOT - Harvey Weinstein (C) arrives at Manhattan Criminal Court for a hearing on October 11, 2018 in New York City.”
“(AP Photo/Seth Wenig)LOS ANGELES, CA - JANUARY 14: (L-R) Chris Backus, Mira Sorvino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's Annual Pre-Golden Globes Party hosted by Colin Callender, Chris Albrecht and Carolyn Strauss at Chateau Marmont on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, CA.”


“… And tweeted, "we got you, Harvey Weinstein, we got you..."
"Most people are threatened to silence former actress rose McGovern. She is one of the first women to publicly accuse Weinstein of assaulting others. After the news of Weinstein's arrest came out, she gave an interview to Megan Kelly. She said, I can say that the person who knocked me down today had handcuffs on her body. She..."
Weinstein has denied all charges of "involuntary sex" in the past and continues to do so
"More than 80 women have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or assault, which has spanned decades."
A source familiar with the investigation told CNN that more charges are expected as the grand jury continues to hear testimony in the state case
"The Manhattan district attorney's office said Friday's charges involved incidents involving two different women in 2013 and 2004."
“… First level operations... "
"The credit for Timothy a berry AFP photography should be read as timothy a berry AFP Getty Images CNN. Seven months ago, women began to accuse Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein of sexual misconduct. The former film tycoon was arraigned for rape and sexual crimes..."
(Billy Farrell / Patrick McMullen photographed by Getty pictures) topshort Harvey Weinstein (c) arrived at the Manhattan Criminal Court in New York on October 11, 2018 for a hearing
(AP Photo / Seth WEINIG) Los Angeles, California - January 14: (left right) Chris barks, mirasovino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's annual Golden Globe pre award party, hosted by Colin cullend, Chris Albrecht and Caroline straw, at Marmont castle on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, California



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more news and updates on politics, world, sports, entertainment and lifestyle, log on to our website latestly.com).”
“(The above story first appeared on LatestLY on May 11, 2018 01:48 PM IST.”
“The ex-couple recent went through divorce with their respective spouses.”
“Post that, the fans started joking about Jen-Brad reconciliation.”
“However, this joke turned to reality real soon and the reports are rife that the two are dating.”
“The latest piece of news around their relationship is that they might have a baby soon!”
“A source told In Touch Weekly, "His marriage [to Angelina Jolie] fell apart, then her marriage to Justin [Theroux] ended.”
“During that difficult time, Brad and Jen reconnected.”
“It's like destiny brought them together, and I can definitely see them having a child together.”The source also added that the couple might try the IVF method.”
“While Brad Pitt has six children with Angeline Jolie, this will be Jennifer’s first child.”


"For more news and updates on politics, the world, sports, entertainment and lifestyle, please visit our website (the latest website)"
"(the report first appeared on May 11, 2018 at 1:48 PM ist."
"The former couple recently divorced their spouses."
"After that, fans started making fun of Jan Brad."
"However, the joke soon became a reality, and there were a lot of reports that the two were dating."
"The latest news about their relationship is that they may have a baby soon!"
A source told in touch weekly that "his marriage (with Angelina Jolie) broke down, and then her marriage with Justin (serrux) ended."
"During that difficult period, Brad and Jan reestablished the connection."
"It's like fate has brought them together, and I can definitely see them having children together." The source added that the couple may try IVF
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie have six children, and this will be Jennifer's first."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cliché or not, she’s lost count of the times she’s said she loves having more of Eric to love.”The happy couple got married in July 2014 and they have two kids together – daughter Maxwell, 5, and son Ace, 4, and it appears they have never been happier.”
“...is that their sex life has never been better either The source adds Their sex life has never been hotter and she s convinced it s because of their extra curves...”
“...problem if he keeps gaining some extra pounds They love living the high life and never want to go back to being diet and fitness bores ever again She believes that her husband is staying in great shape by playing golf and doing outdoor activities while the other huge plus...”
“The 36 year old former fitness fanatic and reality star is happy that she and her husband are no longer slaves to the gym An insider told RadarOnline com She hates scrawny guys and has instructed Eric 37 to stay just the way he is and she s got no...”
“RadarOnline.com has all the details – click through the images.”
“Jessica Simpson loves her husband loves her husband Eric Johnson’ s fuller figure these days!”


"Whether it's platitudes or not, she can't remember how many times she said she loved Eric." The happy couple, who married in July 2014, have two children together - their five-year-old daughter Maxwell and their four-year-old son ace. It seems that they have never been so happy
“… It's that their sex life has never been better, or the source added that their sex life has never been hotter, and she believes it's because of their extra curves... "
“… The problem is that if he continues to gain some extra weight, they like to live a luxurious life and never want to go back to the boring life of diet and fitness. She believes that her husband keeps in good shape by playing golf and doing outdoor activities, and another great advantage is that... "
"The 36 year old former fitness enthusiast and reality star is happy that she and her husband are no longer slaves to the gym. A person familiar with the matter told radaronline that she hates skinny guys and instructed Eric, 37, to stay the same. She didn't..."
“ RadarOnline.com The site has all the details - click on the picture. "
Jessica Simpson loves her husband, the plump figure of Eric Johnson



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Ben WalshJennifer WeinerSteven RichThis content is imported from Twitter.”
“Of disrespect.”
“He reeks of ignorance.”
“— yvette nicole brown (@YNB) February 16, 2017Ava DuVernayThis content is imported from Twitter.”
“Because we ALL know each other (& look alike) amirite?”
“Did he just ask #AprilRyan if the Congressional Black Caucus are friends of hers?”
“Trump just shut down a Jewish man asking abt the rise in anti-Semitic attacks in the U.S. saying "I am the least racist/anti-Semitic person" — Kendrick Sampson (@kendrick38) February 16, 2017Yvette Nicole BrownThis content is imported from Twitter.”


You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Ben Walsh, Jennifer Weiner, Steven rich, this content was imported from twitter."
"No respect."
"He smells of ignorance."
"- Yvette Nicole Brown (@ YNB) 2017ava Duvernay this content is imported from twitter."
"Because we all know amirit?"
"He just asked if the Black Caucus in Congress on April 1 was her friend?"
"Trump just shut down a Jewish man, asked about the rise of anti Semitic attacks in the United States, and said," I'm the least racist / anti Semitic person "- Kendrick Sampson (@ kendrick38) 2017yvette Nicole brown, which was imported from twitter."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"Then she divorced Pete and dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer."
"The couple announced that they broke up at the end of last year. However, they celebrated the new year together, went on holiday in San Lucas, Cabo, Mexico, and had several close friends, including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was found standing outside the Hollywood meeting and chatting with Farrell."
"Last Saturday, Aniston showed up at Ellen DeGeneres' birthday party without seru."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."
"Theroux is often found in New York City, far from Los Angeles."
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time and raised some questions."
"Zoom in on Farrell and Jennifer Aniston's birthday at Ellen DeGeneres."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
On Sunday, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California, with friends including Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementDr. Kerby Alvy, the author of Parenting Errors, says that it’s a mistake for Angelina Jolie not to include Pitt (the non-custodial parent) in family events because it sends a negative message to the kids that Brad Pitt is no longer part of the family.”
“Some have claimed that the former couple had constant fights about how to raise their kids and where to send them to school, but those rumors have not been confirmed.”
“Has this lengthy breakup process resulted in Pitt’s own children locking him out of their lives?”
““This was a request to extend the temporary judge,” an insider explains.”
““They both have both have kept the focus on their family.”
“It hasn’t been easy, but they are both committed to resolving it privately.”It all began when Jolie filed for divorce after an alleged incident on a plane between Pitt and their oldest son Maddox.”
“The FBI and Children’s Protective Services investigated claims of child abuse against the 53-year-old actor, but both later cleared him.”
“Shiloh Jolie-Pitt’s Family Vacation Didn’t End Well https://t.co/T9SDegLYiS — THE NEWS JUNKIE DAIL (@marciaalane1) January 30, 2018Despite recent reports, Jolie’s decision to leave Pitt had nothing to do with their six kids’ education.”
“Jolie recently reflected on working with Pitt during her directorial debut in 2015’s By the Sea, and she said that because they met while working together – referring to 2005’s Mr. & Mrs. Smith – she knew they would work together well.”
“...her dad says a source close to the family...”


"Dr. advertising. "It's a mistake for Angelina Jolie not to include Pitt (a non custodial parent) in family activities because it sends a negative message to children that Brad Pitt is no longer a part of the family," said Kerby alvy, author of parenting mistakes
"It is claimed that the former couple often quarrel over how to raise their children and where to send their children to school, but these rumors have not been confirmed."
"Does this long breakup lead to Pete's own children locking him out of their lives?"
"This is a request to extend the term of the interim judge," an insider explained
"They're all focused on the family."
"It's not easy, but they're all committed to solving it in private." It all started when Julie filed for divorce after a so-called accident happened on Pete's plane with her eldest son, Maddox
"The FBI and the child protection agency investigated the 53 year old actor's alleged child abuse, but both later cleared him of the charges."
"Shiloh Julie Pitt's family holiday didn't end well https://t.co/T9SDegLYiS- News addict Dale (@ marciaalane1) January 30, 2018 despite recent reports, Julie's decision to leave Pitt has nothing to do with the education of their six children. "
"Julie recently reflected on her collaboration with Pitt in her 2015 directorial debut on the beach, saying that because they met when they were working together - referring to the Smiths in 2005 - she knew they would work well together."
“… Her father said there was a source close to the family... "



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[10]References [ edit ]”
“...high school...”
“Monica also tells a crestfallen Joey that she will not be cooking a turkey because of Will's, Chandler's, Rachel's and Phoebe's aversion to the poultry.”
“Will is completely dumbfounded by this revelation, but takes pleasure in the fact that Ross got Rachel pregnant but is not going to marry her.”
“They agree to be civil and reveal to Will that they are now having a baby together.”
“...that they have too much of an important history to fixate on the past...”
“Rachel demands that Ross recant the rumor by calling everyone from school but Monica puts them both in their place by reminding them that Rachel s rumor put Ross on the social radar that Ross and Will s rumor had no effect whatsoever on Rachel s queen bee status and...”
“Rachel feels betrayed by Ross, until Monica reminds her that she started a rumor of her own that Ross made out with the school's 50-year-old librarian, though a horrified Ross confirms it as true.”
“Rachel is immediately attracted to Will unable to recognise him but Will is openly hostile and this culminates in his proud announcement that he and Ross founded the I Hate Rachel club in high school and initiated a rumor that she was a hermaphrodite which was spread throughout their entire...”
“Throughout the episode, Joey battles the enormous turkey, eventually changing into Phoebe's maternity clothing to ease the strain on his stomach.”


"[10] reference [Edit]"
“… High school
"Monica also told dejected Joey that she couldn't make Turkey because will, Chandler, Rachel and Phoebe hated poultry."
Will is stunned by the news, but he's glad rose got Rachel pregnant and doesn't want to marry her
"They agreed to be polite and revealed to will that they are having a baby together now."
“… They have too much important history to focus on the past... "
"Rachel asks Ross to call everyone in the school to turn down the rumors, but Monica reminds them that Rachel's rumors make Ross get the attention of the society. Ross and will's rumors have no influence on Rachel's status as queen bee, and...."
"Rachel felt betrayed by rose until Monica reminded her that she started spreading rumors that rose was making out with the 50 year old librarian at the school, even though a frightened rose confirmed that it was true."
"Rachel was quickly attracted by will, because will could not recognize him, but will openly expressed his hostility to him, which made him proud to announce that he and rose set up" I hate Rachel club "in high school, and launched a rumor that she was androgynous, which spread all over their family..."
In this episode, Joey fights with the huge turkey and finally changes into Phoebe's maternity dress to relieve the pressure on her abdomen



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’ve never felt love and happiness like this I could burst!”A post shared by Kylie (@kyliejenner) on May 1, 2018 at 12:30pm PDT”
““Pregnancy has been the most beautiful, empowering, and life-changing experience I’ve had in my entire life and I’m actually going to miss it,” Jenner said in an statement a few days after giving birth.”
“Kim Kardashian conducted the interview with her younger sister for the Evening Standard, bringing up everything from Jenner’s career to her views on plastic surgery.”
“But the 20-year-old beauty mogul had the most to say about little Stormi.”
“She told Kardashian all about what surprised her most about motherhood and even admitted that she likes changing her daughter’s diapers.”
““I think more about the future because of her.”
“Every time I leave and I’m stressed about leaving her, I’m like, ‘I’m doing it for you,’” Jenner said.”
““Everyone says you change completely when you become a mom, but I really feel the same, just better.”
“So I don’t know what really has completely changed my world, besides her, of course.”She added, “But I feel like it’s only gotten better.”
“You’re less selfish — and I actually enjoy changing diapers.”


"I've never felt love and happiness like this. I'll burst out! "Kylie (@ kyliejenner) shared a post at 12:30 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time on May 1, 2018"
"Pregnancy is the most beautiful, powerful and life changing experience of my life, and I will really miss it," Jenner said in a statement a few days after birth
"Kim Kardashian hosts an interview with her sister for the evening news, from Jenna's career to her views on plastic surgery."
"But the 20-year-old beauty tycoon thinks the most about little stommie."
"She told Kardashian about her most amazing mother's experience and even admitted that she loved changing diapers for her daughter."
"Because of her, I think more about the future."
"Every time I leave, I feel pressure to leave her, and I say, 'I did it for you,'" Jenner said
"Everyone says that when you become a mother, you will change completely, but I really have the same feeling, just feel better."
"So I don't know what really changed my world except her," she added, "but I think it's just going to get better."
"You're not so selfish - I really like changing diapers."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“May we empower each other to carry out such vision — because it isn't enough to simply talk about equality.”
“"It is said that girls with dreams become women with vision.”
“She said: "We’re a couple... We’re in love.”
“On her relationship with HarryIn an interview with Vanity Fair in 2016, Meghan spoke about her blossoming relationship with Prince Harry.”
“"So for my birthday, here’s what I would like as a gift: I want you to be kind to yourself."”
“(Image: Getty Images Europe)" You need to know that you’re enough [is a] mantra that has now engrained itself so deeply within me that not a day goes by without hearing it chime in my head.”
“My teens were even worse – grappling with how to fit in, and what that even meant.”
“"My 20s were brutal – a constant battle with myself, judging my weight, my style, my desire to be as cool/as hip/as smart/as "whatever" as everyone else.”
“To not just choose that happiness, but to feel it.”
“To figure out how to be kind to yourself.”


"May we empower each other to achieve this vision - because it's not enough just to talk about equality."
"It is said that a girl with a dream will become a woman with a vision."
She said: "we are a couple... We're in love. "
"In an interview with Vanity Fair in 2016, Megan talked about her thriving relationship with Prince Harry."
"So on my birthday, the present I want is: I hope you can treat yourself well."
"(picture: Getty Images Europe)" you need to know that you have enough (this is a sentence) incantation, it has been deeply rooted in my heart, so that I can not hear it reverberate in my mind one day. "
"It was even worse when I was a teenager - I was trying to adapt and what it meant."
"My 20s are brutal - a constant fight with myself, judging my weight, my style, my desire to be cool / as hip / as smart / as" what "as other people
"Not only to choose happiness, but also to feel it."
"Try to be nice to yourself."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“IT IS SO UNNECESSARY.”
“The best of luck to Chris and his family.”In March 2016, when Chris had called Tran ‘vulnerable’, ‘barely famous’ and ‘emotionally distraught’, Tran had hit back:“CAN ALL THIS PETTY S*** STOP.”
“Before that, the same tabloid in September 2016 had falsely claimed that Tran was pregnant with Chris Brown’s baby.”
“It has been learned that the same outlet had stated in December 2016 that Christina Milian was pregnant.”
“The rep said:“It’s B.S.’.”
“Gossip Cop spoke to Tran’s representative.”
“Even if they had decided to hit the beach alone, it by no means implies that they are ‘more than friends’.”
“The tabloid deliberately cropped the pictures in such a way that it appeared that the two were alone on the beach.”
“Gossip Cop got the information that actress Karrueche Tran and singer-songwriter Christina Milian were in Miami for a friend’s birthday.”
“Facts have been twisted.”


"It's not necessary."
"Good luck to Chris and his family." In March 2016, when Chris called tran "fragile", "obscure" and "insane", tran hit back: "can all these trivial things stop?"
"Before that, in September 2016, the same tabloid lied that tran was pregnant with Chris Brown's baby."
"It is understood that the same media announced in December 2016 that Christina Milian was pregnant."
"This is B.S.," the representative said
"The gossip police talked to the representative of Chen."
"Even if they decide to go to the beach alone, it doesn't mean they're 'more than just friends'
"The tabloid deliberately cut the photo like this, as if they were alone on the beach."
"Gossip police got word that actress karrueche Tran and singer songwriter Christina Milian were in Miami celebrating a friend's birthday."
"The facts have been distorted."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Unless there is a miraculous turnaround on both of their parts and they can actually live together in the same home in the same city, Jen and Justin could be history.”For more on Jen and Justin’s drama, pick up the new issue of Life & Style, on stands now!”
““Her divorce from Brad was the ultimate heartbreak for her, and she couldn’t take all that pain again,” says the friend.”
“At the GoldenGlobe Awards on Jan. 7, the former Friends star spent much of the night trying to hide from archnemesis Angelina Jolie in the ballroom of LA’s Beverly Hilton hotel.”
““Jen was frazzled,” says an insider.”
““She was overheard saying, ‘This is so awkward.’”The one person who could’ve comforted her, husband Justin Theroux, decided to skip the festivities, so Jen clung to pal and frequent co-star Jason Bateman instead.”
“But when he left her alone at an afterparty at Sunset Tower, Jen took off and headed home.”
““Jen was absolutely lost without Justin,” says a friend, “and just when she needed him the most.”
“He knew Angie would be there, and he picked the worst time to not support his wife.”Justin’s unexplained absence is the latest in a series of signs that his two-and-a-half-year marriage to Jen is hanging by a thread.”
“But even though the pair have a laundry list of issues between them as Life Style previously reported they spend long stretches apart have different lifestyles and can t agree on where to live or whether to start a family Jen just can t let go of Justin says the...”
“...friend...”


"Unless both of them make miraculous changes and they can really live in the same home in the same city, Jen and Justin may become history." For more information about Jen and Justin's plays, please read the new issue of life and style at the booth now! "
"Her divorce from Brad is the saddest thing for her. She can't stand it any more," the friend said
"The former friends star spent most of the evening in the ballroom of the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles trying to avoid her old enemy, Angelina Jolie, at the Gordon glober awards ceremony on January 7."
"Jane is tired," said one person familiar with the matter
"She was overheard saying, 'this is embarrassing.'" She could have comforted her husband, Justin Cyrus, by deciding not to take part in the celebration, so she chose Jason Bateman, her friend and frequent co star
"But when he left her alone at a party in the sunset building, Zhan left for home."
"Without Justin, Jane was completely lost," a friend said, "just when she needed him most."
"He knew Angie would be there, he chose the worst time not to support his wife." Justin's inexplicable absence is the latest in a series of signs that his two-and-a-half-year marriage with Jan is in jeopardy
"However, although there are a lot of problems between the two people, just like the lifestyle reported before, they have different lifestyles when they have been separated for a long time, and they can't agree on where to live or whether to start a family. Jane just can't let go, Justin said..."
“… Friends... "



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not touching her.”
“I’m closed.”
“Next: We can’t get over this look on their faces.”
“Plus, both of their big smiles are completely genuine, which is revealed by their raised cheeks and looks of love on their faces.”
“According to Cobb, his right shoulder is leaning into Kardashian to show he likes the feeling of her touch.”
“...feel extra affectionate toward a person West is showing his love for Kardashian too but in a different way...”
“With not one but two hands around West s arm Cobb explains that it s a way of maintaining their connection She added It s a silent way of saying I like you I want to be with you you mean something to me You use two hands when you...”
“Can’t keep her hands to herselfKardashian just couldn’t keep her hands to herself while courtside at a Los Angeles Lakers game.”
“2.”
““She could have stood up, but Kanye finds her instead, showing he was really feeling love for her in that moment.”Next: It’s crazy how connected they appear in this photo.”


"I didn't touch her."
"I'm closed."
"Next: we can't overcome the expression on their faces."
"In addition, the smiles of both of them are completely sincere, which can be seen from their raised cheeks and the expression of love on their faces."
"According to Cobb, his right shoulder leans toward Kardashian to show that he likes the touch she feels."
“…… I feel very kind to a person who West is also expressing his love for Kardashian in another way... "
"It's not one hand, but two hands around West's arm, Cobb explained. It's a way to keep them in touch, she added. It's a silent way to say I like you, I want to be with you, you're important to me, you use two hands as you..."
"If you can't put her hand on herself, Kardashian can't put her hand on herself, but on the sidelines of the Los Angeles Lakers."
“2.”
"She could have stood up, but Kanye found her and showed that he really loved her at that moment." Next step: the connection between them in this picture is crazy



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Most recently, the couple stepped out for a dinner date at Nobu in Malibu, and even rocked matching looks by wearing similar cargo pants and muted tones from Kanye’s Yeezy clothing line.”
“If anything, they are often the subject of divorce rumors due to comments made by West or the amount of time they go without being seen together in public.”
“However, Kim Kardashian did not show off Kanye West on her social media account, only further debunking that she and the rapper have a pact to put on a fake marriage for the cameras.”
“Kim even took to her Instagram account to reveal that she and her friends were on a boat and gearing up to try wakeboarding for the first time, an activity that Kardashian later called harder than it looks.”
“The couple rented a $1.85 million cabin with four bedrooms, 4.5 bathrooms, and an amazing view of the water for their holiday getaway.”
“The couple were reportedly looking to get some peace and quiet in the town of Coeur d’Alene, which has been a frequent celebrity hot spot, boasting recent guests such as Harry Styles, Wayne Gretzky, and Adam Levine.”
“As previously reported by the Inquisitr, Kim Kardashian and Kanye West recently spent the Fourth of July together with their family in Idaho.”
“...the state of the country...”
“However Gossip Cop claims that rumors simply are not true and that more credible sources at People Magazine claim that Kim is a very loyal wife to Kanye and recently very publicly defended him when many were questioning his mental heath due to a series of tweets he posted about...”
““Kim knows she needs Kanye and says they very much have a business relationship, which she’s hell-bent on continuing,” the magazine reports a Kardashian insider as saying.”


"Recently, the couple had dinner in Nobu, Malibu, and even wore similar pants and soft colors from Kanye's yeezy collection, which shocked their looks."
"If there's any difference, it's that they are often the subject of divorce rumors because of West's comments or because they haven't been together in public for a long time."
"However, Kim Kardashian didn't show off Kanye West on her social media account. She only further exposed that she had an agreement with a rapper to stage a fake marriage for the camera."
"Kim even revealed on her instagram account that she was on a boat with her friends and was preparing to try water surfing for the first time, which Kardashian later said was more difficult than it looked."
"The couple rented a $1.85 million cottage with four bedrooms, 4.5 bathrooms and amazing water views on holiday."
"The couple are reported to want some peace and quiet in Coeur d'Alene, a place that is often a celebrity hot spot, boasting of recent guests such as Harry styles, Wayne Gretzky and Adam Levine."
According to prosecutors' previous reports, Kim Kardashian and Kanye West recently spent July 4 in Idaho with their families
“… The state of the country... "
"However, the gossip police claim that the rumors are not true at all, and more reliable sources in people magazine claim that Kim Jong Un is kenno's very loyal wife. Recently, when many people questioned Kim Jong Un's mental health, Kim Jong Un openly defended him because he published a series of tweets about him..."
"Kim knows she needs Kanye and says they have a very business relationship and she's determined to continue," said Kardashian insiders, the magazine reported



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Numb / Encore" in honor of the late Chester Bennington?”
“It's a cheesy closer.”
“FYI, he still loves Kanye to death and if I were a betting man, "Otis" and "Runaway" are Jay-Z's two favorite Kanye West videos.”
“All of the doom and gloom, breaking up with Kanye, loving Blue and Beyonce plays out on these boards.”
“One, because four revolving boards are showing old Jay-Z videos and each of the still frames are getting set on fire.”
“THOUGHT TWO: "Kill Jay-Z" is a perfect tone-setter for this show.”
“Or a Highlander.”
“Somebody trusted Jay-Z with 92 bricks, and he lost them, but somehow he didn't die of it which makes him close to immortal.”
“There's a rule in life that you can't trust anyone who can't grow facial hair, and somehow Jay-Z fits that bill and yet he doesn't.”
“THOUGHT ONE: Jay-Z really can't grow a proper mustache.”


"Numbness / duet" in memory of the late Chester Bennington
"It's a tacky shut door."
"For reference only, he still loves Kanye to death. If I'm a gambler," Otis "and" escape "are Jay-Z's two favorite Kanye West videos."
"All the bad luck and gloom, breaking up with Kanye, Elaine and Beyonce are on these boards."
"One, because four spinners are playing the old Jay-Z video, each still frame is on fire."
The second thought: "kill Jay-Z" is the perfect tone for the show
"Or highlanders."
"Someone entrusted 92 bricks to Jez, and he lost them, but somehow he didn't die because of them, which made him close to immortality."
"There's a rule in life that you can't trust anyone who can't grow facial hair. Somehow, Jay-Z meets that standard, but he doesn't
"Think about it: Jay-Z really can't grow the right beard."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Christina has recently been sharing snapshots from the set of “Flip or Flop.””
“Each episode chronicles the pair’s search for a property, construction and design work.”
“El Moussa stars with her now ex Tarek on HGTV’s hit “Flip or Flop.” On the series, the two take dated, often crumbling homes and flip them in the hopes of turning a serious profit.”
““Christina is currently focused on filming new episodes of ‘Flip or Flop’ and has not been approached by Bravo executives,” a source told us.”
“OK Magazine reported earlier this month that Bravo was hoping to get El Moussa on “The Real Housewives of Orange County.” But so far, nothing is in the works, Fox News has learned.”
“Rumors have been swirling that Christina El Moussa could be headed to the “Real Housewives” franchise, but a source with knowledge of the situation told Fox News the “Flip or Flop” star hasn’t been in touch with Bravo execs.”


Christina has been sharing a snapshot of "flop or flop" recently
"Each episode records their search for real estate, architecture and design."
El Moussa and her predecessor Tarek starred in HGTV's hit show "flip or floor.". In this series, the two filmed some old-fashioned, often crumbling houses, hoping to make a fortune
A source told us: "Christina is currently focused on shooting a new episode of" flop or flop ", and Bravo's executives have not approached her."
OK magazine reported earlier this month that Bravo wanted El Moussa to be featured in "the real housewife of Orange County.". But Fox News learned that so far, there has been no progress
"There have been rumors that Christina El Moussa might join Real Housewives, but a person familiar with the matter told Fox News that the unscrupulous star has not contacted Bravo executives."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And in the worst case scenario, they can always ask the Queen for some central air!”
“Wherever they end up living, they'll likely be very happy.”
“So now that they've made things official and are about to get married, it's fair to wonder if Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are living together now or if royal protocol has kept them under different roofs.”
“The answer is not all that surprising.”
“When the couple first met, Suits was still filming in Toronto, which is where Meghan was posted up.”
“To visit each other, the couple had to carry out an elaborate bait and switch plan to distract the paparazzi and keep their romance a secret, according to Us Weekly.”
“Meghan would travel to London for events and they took vacations together, but it wasn't until late 2016 that the The Sun reported they were "virtually inseparable" and that Markle had "practically moved in" with Harry.”
“By that time, the couple had made their relationship public.”
“An anonymous source also told the outlet, "They’ve taken things to the next level.”
“They’re practically living together.”


"In the worst case, they can always ask the queen to provide some central air conditioning!"
"No matter where they end up living, they will be very happy."
"So now that they've made it public and are about to get married, we can't help asking whether Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are living together or whether Royal etiquette puts them under different roof."
"The answer is not so surprising."
"When the couple met for the first time, the suit was still shooting in Toronto, where Megan posted his post."
In order to visit each other, the couple had to implement a well-designed bait diversion plan to distract the paparazzi and keep their relationship secret, US Weekly reported
"Megan will go to London to participate in the event and they will go on holiday together, but it was not until the end of 2016 that the Sun reported that they were" almost inseparable "and that markel" almost moved "into Harry's house."
"At that time, the couple had made their relationship public."
"They've taken things to a new level," an anonymous source told the media
"They actually live together."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...kids pick up the new issue of Us Weekly on newsstands now...”
“It fills her heart and makes her love him even more Even more the couple has scaled back on work projects to spend more time with their children as their top priority is always family For more on Roberts and Moder s relationship and life at home with their three...”
“The duo, who are very “hands-on parents,” the source says, love their “simple, laid-back life in Malibu, attending school functions and community events.”“Julia just loves watching [Danny] with the kids,” says the pal, adding that the family of enjoy love hitting the waves.”
““They have a really solid, loving marriage.”Their strong bond has helped them remain a united front for their three children, twins Hazel and Phinnaeus, 13, and Henry, 10.”
“...they always come out on the other side very much together adds the insider...”
“They still have crazy passion and love for each other a source reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly noting that the pair s secret to success is always making time for each other Although the Wonder star 50 and the cinematographer 49 have faced challenges throughout their relationship...”
““When you see them together, there is no doubt about it.”
“Despite experiencing their fair share of ups and downs, the A-list couple is in it for the long haul.”
“The couple, who are celebrating 16 years of marriage in July, are stronger than they’ve ever been.”
“Julia Roberts and Danny Moder’s love story is one for the ages.”


“… Now the children are buying a new issue of American weekly at the newsstand
"It made her happy, and it made her love him more. The couple cut back on their work projects and spent more time with their children, because their first priority is always the family, to learn more about the relationship between Roberts and Maud and the lives of the three of them at home... "
"Both of them are very" hands-on "parents, and the source said they like to" live a simple and leisurely life in Malibu, participate in school activities and community activities. " "Julia just likes to see Denny with the kids," the friend said, adding that the loving family enjoys the shock wave. "
"They have a really strong, loving marriage." Their strong ties helped them maintain the united front of three children, 13-year-old twins hazel and Phineas, and 10-year-old Henry
“… They always come out on the other side together, the insider added
"They still have crazy passion and love for each other. A source revealed in the new issue of American weekly that the secret of their success is always to make time for each other, although miracle star 50 and photographer 49 have been facing challenges in their relationship..."
"When you see them together, there's no doubt about it."
"Despite quite a lot of ups and downs, this A-class rich couple will still be involved for a long time."
"The couple, who celebrated their 16th wedding anniversary in July, are stronger than ever."
"The love story between Julia Roberts and Denny Maud is eternal."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Richie, driver Redena McManus and a 3-year-old boy, Christopher McManus, all died during or shortly after the collision, while the bus driver and passengers were uninjured, according to police reports.”
“He was just 14 when his older brother Richie died on Nov. 13, 1990.”
“And, as Shelton noted in a tweet Monday, "It changed my life forever."”
“Lost my brother 27 years ago today.”
“I was only 14 at the time but it changed my life forever... Made me realize that life is precious and there's no time like RIGHT NOW to go for it... We still miss you Richie!!”
“— Blake Shelton (@blakeshelton) November 13, 2017Richie was 24 when he died in a car accident in the Sheltons' home state of Oklahoma.”
“Two years ago, Shelton sent out a message for the 25th anniversary of his loss:Wow... 25 years ago today we lost my brother Richie Shelton.”
“He's still my hero going strong.”
“Wish everyone could've known him.”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
Ritchie, driver redna McManus and a 3-year-old boy Christopher McManus all died during or shortly after the crash, while neither the driver nor the passengers were injured, police reported
On November 13, 1990, when his brother Richie died, he was only 14 years old
"And, as Sheldon tweeted on Monday," it changed my life forever. "
"27 years ago today, I lost my brother."
"I was only 14 at the time, but it changed my life forever... Let me realize that life is precious, there is no time to pursue it like now... We still miss you, rich! "
"Black Shelton (@ blakeshelton) on November 13, 2017, rich died in a car accident in Shelton's home state of Oklahoma, when he was 24 years old."
"Two years ago, Sheldon sent a letter for his 25th birthday: Wow... 25 years ago today, we lost my brother, rich Sheldon. "
"He's still my hero. Be strong."
"I hope everyone knows him."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple may not have been dating long, but they know the importance of love and family.”
““Kylie actually likes me for me,” the rapper told the magazine.”
“Although the pair has been dating for just over a year, after meeting at the music festival Coachella, Scott is confident in the relationship he’s built with Forbes self-made billionaire Jenner.”
“As for 27-year-old rapper Scott, with whom Jenner had daughter Stormi earlier this year, he seems relatively unconcerned by the threat of a curse.”
“There’s a lot of people who love us, but there’s also a huge handful of people who don’t like us,” Jenner explained.”
“It’s the negative.”
“It’s people who come and just don’t know how to handle it.”
“...newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here But it s not just men it s friends...”
“...to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE”
“INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like...”


"The couple may not be dating long, but they know the importance of love and family."
"Kelly actually likes me because of me," the rapper told the magazine
"Although the two have only been dating for more than a year, after meeting at the cochella Festival, Scott is confident of the relationship he has established with Forbes' self-made billionaire Jenner."
"As for 27 year old rapper Scott Jenner, who gave birth to his daughter Tommy earlier this year, he seems relatively indifferent to the threat of curse."
"There are a lot of people who love us, but there are a lot of people who don't like us," Jenner explained
"It's negative."
"It's people who come, but they don't know how to deal with it."
“… Newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors independent newspaper would like to inform you by email about offers and updates please check the box if you would like to contact please read our complete mailing list agree terms here, but not just men, its friends... "
“… To keep you informed of the offers and the latest news via email, please check the box. If you want to contact us, please read our complete mailing list agreement terms. Here, Indy life newsletters are inspired by the latest lifestyle trends. Thank you for registering with Indy Life Weekly
"Inspired by the latest lifestyle trends every week, Indy life newsletters please enter your email address please enter a valid email address please enter a valid email address registration thank you for registering in Indy life newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent hope..."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Paris Jackson Explains Why She Embraced a Life in the Spotlight...”
“That said, we're glad to see that she’s not afraid to clap back.”
“...life...”
“They are friends who want to help the helpless The starlet broke up with her then boyfriend Michael Snoody last year so while she is single that doesn t mean she has to be cool about speculation on her love...”
“"Both are big animal lovers and advocates and are working on a ‘Be Pawsome, Adopt!’ campaign for local L.A. shelters....”
“Trevor, who is 38, also denied the relationship in a statement provided to Just Jared Jr.“They are just friends,” a rep for the actor said.”
“"Y'all need to chill lol hand-holding is a very common thing," she posted in a since-deleted tweet along with pictures of her holding hands with her female friends, including Sofia Richie.”
“However, after being spotted holding hands with 90210 actor Trevor Donovan in Los Angeles, the 19 year-old model and actress took to Twitter to dispel relationship rumors.”
“Paris Jackson is no stranger to public scrutiny, as most young celebrities are.”


"Related report: Paris Jackson explains why she embraced life in the spotlight..."
"After all, we're happy to see that she's not afraid of clapping."
“… Life... "
"They want to help the friends of those helpless people. The little star broke up with her then boyfriend Michael snowdy last year, so although she is single, it doesn't mean that she must keep calm about her love speculation..."
"Both of them are big animal lovers and advocates. They are committed to" becoming ponies, adopting! "Los Angeles local shelter campaign..."
Trevor, 38, also denied the relationship in a statement provided to Jared Jr. "They're just friends," said a representative of the actor
"You all need to be calm. Lol holding hands is a very common thing," she posted photos of herself holding hands with female friends, including Sofia Richie, on a deleted microblog
"However, the 19-year-old model and actress refuted the rumors on twitter after being found in Los Angeles holding hands with 90210 actors Trevor Donovan."
"Paris Jackson, like most young celebrities, is no stranger to public scrutiny."



**Something goes wrong**
“But then he gets to a tattoo on his arm that is clearly Selena Gomez and it gets a little awkward.”
“Some of his body art has really deep meaning, and he seems to have a lot of ink dedicated to his mother, which is sweet.”
“Case in point: Justin Bieber explaining some of his tattoos during his photo shoot with GQ magazine.”
“And that is having to explain how you will go about covering up the photo of your former lover that you had permanently inked onto your skin.”
“Unfortunately, we've now discovered that there is actually something harder than getting your stuff back from an ex.”
“(Google it).”
“So said the famed philosophers 2gether.”
“"The hardest part of breaking up is getting back your stuff."”


"But the tattoo on his arm is obviously Selena Gomez, which makes him a little embarrassed."
"Some of his body art is really meaningful. He seems to have a lot of ink for his mother. It's very sweet."
"For example: Justin Bieber explains some of his tattoos when taking a photo with GQ magazine."
"It has to explain how you're going to cover up the photo of your ex lover, which you've always printed on your skin."
"Unfortunately, we now find that there are more difficult things to do than get your stuff back from your predecessor."
"Google it."
"So said the famous philosopher."
"The hardest part of breaking up is getting your things back."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blake and the boys really do have a special bond and they couldn’t imagine not being in each other’s lives.””
““Gwen is happy with Blake and her boys right now and she knows marrying Blake is inevitable.”
“We’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details.”
“Blake Shelton, 41, and girlfriend Gwen Stefani, 48, have never been happier, and the icing on the cake would be if they tied the knot.”
“They already live together and spend all of their time with each other so they’re practically married anyway.”
““Timing is everything for Gwen and Blake, and they both know they will probably marry each other, it’s only a matter of when.”
“They talk about it all the time and they way they live together it’s like they are already married.”
“With their busy schedules, Gwen has even talked to Blake about skipping the engagement and instead just eloping on a beach, or in the country somewhere when the romantic mood is right, which is fine by Blake,” a source close to Gwen tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“She loves him and couldn’t imagine living without him,” our insider adds.”
““Gwen loves how good Blake is with her boys, their relationship is special and it really means a lot to her.”


"Black and the children do have a special bond. They can't imagine their lives apart."
"Gwen is happy with Blake and her children now. She knows it's inevitable to marry Blake."
"We have exclusive details."
"Black Sheldon, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 48, have never been so happy. If they get married, it will be the icing on the cake."
"They've lived together and spent all their time with each other, so they're actually married."
"For Gwen black, timing is everything. They all know that they are likely to get married. It's just a matter of time."
"They talk about it all the time, and they live together like they're married."
A source close to Gwen told Blake: "because of his busy work, Gwen even talked to Blake about skipping the engagement and just eloping on the beach, or somewhere in the countryside where the romantic atmosphere is appropriate, which is good for Blake." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She loves him and can't imagine life without him," our insider added
"Gwen likes how well Blake gets along with her children. Their relationship is very special. It really means a lot to her."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… We always respected each other and we still respect each other.”The “Bad Liar” songstress began dating The Weeknd, 27, in January, while the “Baby” crooner has been linked to Kourtney Kardashian, Sofia Richie and Hailey Baldwin.”
“They’re grown up a lot in the past couple of years and are mature about the situation.”Bieber, 23, and Gomez, 25, have also spent some time together at her home in the Studio City neighborhood of Los Angeles.”
“Three years after their stormy breakup, Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber have mended fences, multiple sources exclusively tell Us Weekly.”
““Selena is simply trying to make peace with Justin after her illness,” one insider reveals, referring to the kidney transplant that the “Wolves” singer underwent earlier this year due to complications with lupus.”
““He has been great to her since her surgery and they are on good terms right now.”
“They got back in touch recently through their friends and have seen each other at church.”A second source tells Us that the exes began speaking “a couple months after her surgery.”Meanwhile, a source close to Gomez tells Us, “Justin and Selena recently started speaking.”
“I don’t know when exactly but it’s because of the same church they go to.”
“The community there is pretty tight knit and Justin and Selena have a lot of mutual friends who brought them back together.”
“They realized it was time to grow past their history and move on.”
“The Ontario native was spotted arriving in his white G-Wagon to his ex-girlfriend’s $2.25 million property on Sunday, October 22.”


“… We have always respected each other, and we still respect each other. " The "bad liar" singer has been dating since January 27, while the "baby" singer has been associated with Courtney Kardashian, Sophia Ritchie and Haley Baldwin
"In the past few years, they have grown up a lot and are very mature about this situation." Bieber, 23, and Gomez, 25, also spent some time at their homes near Studio City in Los Angeles
"After three years of stormy breakup, Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber have mended their relationship," a number of sources told weekly
"Serena just wants to make up with Justin after her illness," a source said, referring to the wolf singer's kidney transplant earlier this year for lupus complications
"He's been very nice to her since her operation, and they're very close now."
"They recently re contacted through friends and met at church." A second source told us that ex girlfriends started talking "months after the surgery.". Meanwhile, a source close to Gomez told us, "Justin and Serena have started talking recently."
"I don't know the exact time, but that's because they went to the same church."
"The community there is very close. Justin and Selena have a lot of friends in common, and they bring them together."
"They realized it was time to go beyond history and move on."
On Sunday, October 22, an Ontario man was found driving his white G-shaped carriage to his ex girlfriend's $2.25 million property



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She deleted her entire Instagram history in August, before dropping her provocative comeback single “Look What You Made Me Do,” but she still hasn’t come out from underground.”
“Paparazzi have only gotten glimpses of her, bundled in hoodies and dashing into cars with her new boyfriend, British actor Joe Alwyn, 26.”
“Other than her July court hearing to testify against the DJ who was convicted of groping her, she hasn’t made any public appearances in nearly nine months.”
“Once Hollywood’s ultimate social butterfly, the pop star has remained mysteriously out of the spotlight this year — way out.”
“Taylor Swift hasn’t been quite so good at “shaking it off” recently.”


"She deleted all of instagram's history in August, then gave up the provocative comeback single" look what you made me do ", but she still didn't get out of the ground."
"The paparazzi just caught a glimpse of her. Wearing a hoodie, they rushed into the car with her new boyfriend, 26-year-old British actor Joe Alvin."
"She hasn't appeared in public for nearly nine months, except that she appeared in court in July and was accused of violating her DJ."
"The pop star used to be Hollywood's ultimate social butterfly, but this year he mysteriously turned away from the spotlight - the way out."
"Tyler swift is not very good at" getting rid of it "these days."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out the video below, and be sure to subscribe to Bustle’s YouTube page for more hacks and tricks!”
“Carlos Alvarez/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesWant more style tips?”
“Images And then when he kept it short and natural looking LUCY NICHOLSON AFP Getty Images I mean even when this happened he made it work LUCY NICHOLSON AFP Getty Images Point is whatever he decides to do I m behind him 100 percent...”
“Jason Merritt Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images Or when he let his hair grow out and the ends were a sun kissed blonde Gareth Cattermole Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images And then there was that time he went REALLY blonde and still made it look good CARLO ALLEGRI AFP Getty...”
“Although I'm loving the new silver look, his natural brown hue is not too bad on the eyes.”
“Anyway, it's clear that Pitt looks good regardless of his hair color, so rock on.”
“...s era...”
“Luckily for Pitt gray hair has continued to remain trendy ever since Kylie Jenner rocked some long silver extensions in 2014 even though the gray hair trend has been making random appearances since 2007 and if you remember correctly from history class silver hair was very popular during Marie Antoinette...”
“OK, sorry, clearly Brad Pitt is blessed with good genetics, whether he has to dye his hair to keep if from naturally going gray.”
“My guess is he's got a handful of gray hairs, otherwise, he has some really good genes.”


"Take a look at the video below and be sure to subscribe to the YouTube page of Buster to learn more about hackers and tricks!"
"More fashion tips from Carlos Alvarez / Getty Pictures Entertainment / Getty pictures?"
"When he stays short and natural, I mean, even if something like this happens, he succeeds. No matter what he decides to do, I support him 100%..."
"When Jason Merritt Getty Images or Gareth cattermole Getty Images, a blonde with sun kisses at the end of his hair, becomes a real blonde and still makes it look beautiful Carlo Allegri AFP Getty Images..."
"Although I love the new silver look, his natural brown color is not too bad for my eyes."
"Anyway, it's obvious that Pete looks good no matter what the color of his hair is, so keep rolling."
“… "The age..."
"Fortunately, since Kylie Jenner introduced some long silver hair in 2014, Pitt's white hair has been on the trend, although the trend has been random since 2007. If you remember correctly, the silver hair in history class was very popular in the period of Marie Antoinette..."
"Well, I'm sorry. It's obvious that Brad Pitt has a good genetic background. Does he need to dye his hair to prevent it from turning white naturally?"
"I guess he has white hair, otherwise, he has some very good genes."



**Something goes wrong**
“Of course, West has been making sexercise jokes since the first album, and he ends the song with another new workout plan.”
“...same bitch Yeah he might have hit it first Only problem is I m rich A reference to Rob Kardashian and Blac Chyna s sexercise regimen also suggests that this verse was recorded in the last two or three weeks...”
“4.”
“...music signee Desiigner—all before a melancholy vocoder coda that sounds like Imogen Heap.”
“I love my Dad.” But West has always embraced contradictions, and these confessional lyrics play over a repeated sample of “Panda”—a swaggering, a street-tough track from new G.O.O.D.”
“The day of the album’s release, West tweeted the lyrics, saying, “I cried writing this.”
“2”After a sample from Street Fighter II (“Perfect!”) brings Part 1 to a close, Part 2 turns confessional, as West reflects on the calamities his family has faced, including his mother’s tragic death, his father’s struggles with money, and his own nearly fatal car crash.”
““Father Stretch My Hands Pt.”
“As Wests raps at the top of the opening verse, over a Metro Boomin beat, “Now if I f--k this model/ And she just bleached her asshole/ And I get bleach on my T-shirt/ I’mma feel like an asshole.”3.”
“Barrett’s “Father Stretch My Hands,” this two-parter quickly moves from the sacred to the profane.”


"Of course, West has been joking about sex since his first album, and he put forward another new exercise plan at the end of the song."
“… The same whore yes, he may be the first to hit it. The only problem is that I am very rich. A reference to the sexual health regimen of Robert Kardashian and blackchener also shows that this poem is recorded in the past two or three weeks... "
“4.”
"The music signer designed it before the end of the melancholy vocoder. It sounds like Imogen Heep."
"I love my dad." But west always likes to contradict himself, and these confessional lyrics repeat the example of "Panda" - a flamboyant, street tough song from the new G.O.D
"On the day of the album's release, West posted lyrics on his microblog, saying," I cried when I wrote this song. "
"2" from Street Fighter II ("perfect!) After finishing the first part and turning the second part into confession, West reflects on the disasters facing his family, including his mother's tragic death, his father's struggle with money, and his own nearly fatal car accident
"My father held out my hand."
As West sang at the top of the opening line, on the beat of a subway boom, "now, if I fall in love with this model / she just bleaches her asshole / I have bleach on my T-shirt / I feel like an asshole." three
Barrett's "father reaches out my hand", these two people quickly from sacred to secular



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She is not looking but her heart is open if love comes knocking,” our insider adds.”
“She found out in late spring that she desperately needed a life-saving kidney transplant due to complications from lupus, and quickly too.”
“We’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s not looking to rebound from him.”
“While Justin Bieber, 24, has reignited his romance with Hailey Baldwin in the most public of ways, his ex Selena Gomez isn’t looking for relationship payback.The 25-year-old doesn’t care that he rebounded back to the 21-year-old model, who he briefly dated in 2016.”
““Selena is not treating love as a game or a competition and whatever Justin is doing or getting into is not dictating her love life.”
“She wants to spend this summer in her best health and everything else can and will fall into place.” a source close to the “Wolves” singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“What a difference a year makes.”
“This time last summer Selena did have a loving boyfriend with The Weeknd, 28, but she sure didn’t have her health.”
“Fortunately her best friend Francia Raisa, 29, turned out to be a perfect match and Sel didn’t have to agonize over being on a waiting list for the organ.”
“Selena’s been a single lady ever since, but if the right guy comes along she might get back in the dating game.”


"She didn't look, but her heart was open if love came knocking," our insider added
"At the end of the spring, she found that because of the complications of lupus, she urgently needed a life-saving kidney transplant, and soon found out."
"We've got the exclusive details that she doesn't want to bounce back from him."
Although Justin Bieber, 24, rekindled his relationship with Haley Baldwin in the most public way, his ex girlfriend Selena Gomez did not look for a return. That's the 25-year-old, and he doesn't care if he can go back to the 21-year-old model he dated briefly in 2016. "
"Selena doesn't regard love as a game or competition. Whatever Justin is doing or participating in, it doesn't influence her love life."
"She wants to spend the summer in her best health. Everything else can and will be in place," a source close to the "wolf pack" singer told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"How different a year is."
"At this time last summer, Selena did have a lovely boyfriend with her 28 year old at the weekend, but she really wasn't healthy."
"Fortunately, her best friend, Francia Raisa, 29, turned out to be the perfect couple, and Searle didn't have to worry about being on the organ waiting list."
"Since then, Serena has been a single woman, but if the right man shows up, she may start dating again."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Said one insider, “The wedding can’t come soon enough for Blake!”We pay for juicy info!”
“Stefani proved to be a calming influence after they hooked up in November 2015, but the source said that Shelton is ready to get rowdy again.”
“As Radar has reported, the country stud has long loved the lush life.”
“Shelton’s box bulged with multiple bottles of tequila, and was packed so tightly that even the burly 40-year-old struggled to carry it only a few feet to his car!”
“Or, at the very least, take a few cheat days,” a source told Radar.”
““When Gwen is away, Blake seems to play!”
“What’s more, the bad boy launched his booze-buying spree just hours after Stefani, 47, chatted it up with late-night TV host Seth Meyers 2,500 miles away in New York City!”
“But then, late last month, he was caught leaving an L.A. liquor store with enough swill to soak Skid Row for a month.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"For Blake, the wedding won't come too soon," said a person familiar with the matter! "We pay for interesting information!"
"Stefani in November 2015 proved to be a calming influence after they colluded in November 2015, but the source said Sheldon was ready to be rowdy again."
"As the radar reports, countrymen have long loved the luxuriant life."
"Sheldon's box is full of bottles of tequila, and it's so tightly packed that even the burly 40 year old can't lift it to the front of the car a few feet away!"
"Or, at least, a few days," one source told radar
"Black seems to be playing when Gwen is away!"
"More importantly, just a few hours after Stephanie, 47, talked to Seth Meyers, a late night TV host in New York City 2500 miles away, the bad boy started his drinking spree!"
But at the end of last month, he was found leaving a Los Angeles liquor store with enough swill to soak for a month



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Neither Brad nor Jen’s reps have yet commented on Star’s story.”
“It seems just like old times, only better.’While Star notes that George Clooney’s rep had denied their story, the magazine goes on to note that Jennifer ‘wants to keep the reunion under the radar’, given that she only announced her marriage split weeks ago.”
“‘They reminisced about the past and had a lot of laughs.”
“‘Their evening together was very relaxed and low-key,’ the source told Star.”
“...the pair to her home...”
“The plan was to head over to Jen s place afterward for a nightcap but of course George would just drop Brad off The magazine claims that Jen was so excited by the idea that she even went to the extreme of lending George her bodyguard so he could drive...”
“...a private pre Oscars party in Beverly Hills...”
“After Jen and Justin Theroux announced their split he encouraged Brad to reach out and give their relationship another chance The magazine cover that all of America is talking about today Star magazine According to the magazine the duo had their first post slip meet up an March 3 at...”
“‘George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angie imploded.”
“‘They’ve been secretly getting together for late night hook ups, and it’s all because of George,’ a source told Star.”


"Neither Brad nor Jennifer's representatives have commented on the star's story."
"It seems to be the same as in the past, but better." Although star pointed out that George Clooney's representatives denied their story, the magazine went on to point out that Jennifer "wanted to ignore the reunion" because she announced her divorce a few weeks ago
"They recalled the past and laughed a lot."
"Their night together was very relaxed and low-key," the source told sky
“… They went to her house... "
"The plan is to go to Zhan's house for supper afterwards, but of course George will put Brad down from the magazine, claiming that Zhan is very excited about this idea. She even loaned her bodyguard to George to let him drive..."
“… A private party before the Oscars at Beverly Hills... "
"After Jan and Justin Cyrus announced their breakup, he encouraged Brad to lend a helping hand and give their relationship a chance to talk about today's magazine cover, star magazine. According to the magazine, a meeting between them on March 3 was at..."
"George was the first person to call him when his marriage with Angie broke up."
"They've been getting together in secret, getting ready to chat up late at night, because of George," a source told sky



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on Gossip Cop:Story claiming the truth about Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez having kids is made-upSofia Richie and Scott Disick are NOT moving to MexicoPrince William NOT struggling with parenthood despite report...”
“The outlet was apparently too busy making up details about a fictional trip to report on the real one that actually took place.”
“It's even claimed the actor spent as much as $2 million for the celebration.”
“Gossip Cop, however, is exclusively told by a rep for the couple that the claims aren't true.”
“The allegations are featured in the New Zealand edition of Woman's Day, under the headline, "Party In Paradise: George Spoils His Girl."”
“The story begins by asserting that although the Oscar winner is now a father of twins he still knows how to keep the romance alive treating his wife Amal to a lavish 2 million worth of gifts to celebrate her...”
“40th birthday early this month...”
“A so-called "insider" is quoted as saying, "George wanted to go all-out for Amal's milestone and do something extra-special, so he hired out a private island."”
“Amal's birthday was on February 3 and it's not said exactly when this supposed trip allegedly took place.”
“But the gossip magazine maintains George "had been scouting locations for months before deciding on the exclusive Fijian island resort of Vatu Vara, which set him back more than $1.2 million for a six-night stay."'”


"More about gossip police: the story about Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez having children is like this: rich and Scott Disick didn't move to Mexico because William didn't struggle for parenthood, despite reports that..."
"This media is obviously busy making up the details of a trip, instead of reporting the actual trip."
"There's even news that the actor spent as much as $2 million on the celebration."
"However, the gossip police were told exclusively by a representative of the couple that these statements were not true."
The charges appeared on the New Zealand edition of women's day, titled "party in heaven: George spoils his girl"
"From the beginning of the story, it is asserted that although the Oscar winner is now the father of twins, he still knows how to keep the relationship going and celebrate his wife Amar with a luxury gift worth 2 million dollars..."
"40th birthday at the beginning of this month..."
To quote a so-called "insider," George wanted to go all out for Amar's milestone and do something special, so he rented a private island
"Amar's birthday is February 3. It has not been said when the so-called trip will take place."
But gossip magazine insisted that George "had been searching for vatuwala, the only resort in Fiji, for months before he decided to go there, which cost him more than $1.2 million for six nights."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/NxwfWRFD3S — Alyssa Milano (@Alyssa_Milano) March 18, 2017R I P Chuck Berry … — Chuck D (@MrChuckD) March 18, 2017”
“Thank you.”
“Berry, a rock ‘n’ roll pioneer known for songs including “Maybellene,” “Roll Over Beethoven” and “Johnny B. Goode,” was found unresponsive by the St. Charles County police and pronounced dead minutes later.”
“The Twitter account managed by the estate of John Lennon tweeted out a quote If you had to give Rock n Roll another name you might call it Chuck Berry If you had to give Rock n Roll another name you might call it Chuck Berry John Lennon with Chuck...”
“Berry Mike Douglas TV Show 1972 pic twitter com ViJtLblEwt John Lennon johnlennon March 18 2017 The Rolling Stones called Berry a massive influence The Rolling Stones are deeply saddened to hear of the passing of Chuck Berry...”
“He was a true pioneer of rock'n'roll & a massive influence.”
“...pic.twitter.com/RT4NZH3KeQ — The Rolling Stones (@RollingStones) March 18, 2017Stones guitarist Keith Richards had a long association with Berry, having spearheaded the tribute concert that became the basis of the 1987 documentary “Hail!”
“Hail!”
“Rock ‘n’ Roll.”"One of my big lights has gone out.”– Keith, 3/18/17 pic.twitter.com/I86dHlvN5W — Keith Richards (@officialKeef) March 19, 2017“RIP.”
“And peace and love Chuck Berry Mr. rock ‘n’ roll music,” Ringo Starr wrote.”


“... https://t.co/NxwfWRFD3S Website - Alyssa Milano (@ Alyssa / u Milano) March 18, 2017 RI P Chuck Berry -Chuck D (@ mrcockd) March 18, 2017 "
"Thank you."
Berry, a pioneer of rock music, is famous for songs such as "Maybelle", "cover Beethoven" and "Johnny B. good". A few minutes later, St. Charles County police found him unresponsive and declared him dead
"John Lennon's Twitter account posted a quote on twitter. If you have to change the name of rock, you can call it Chuck Berry. If you have to change the name of rock, you can call it Chuck Berry, John Lennon and chuck..."
"Berry Mike Douglas TV show 1972 pic twitter com vijtlblewt John Lennon John Lennon March 18, 2017 the rolling stones claimed that berry had great influence and the rolling stones were deeply saddened by the death of Chuck Berry..."
"He's a real pioneer of rock and roll and has a huge impact."
“... pic.twitter.com/RT4NZH3KeQ -Rolling stones (@ RollingStones) on March 18, 2017, the guitarist Keith Richards of rolling stones has a long-term relationship with berry, and his tribute concert became the 1987 documentary hail
Long live
"Rock music." "One of my lights is out." - Keith, 3 / 18 / 17 pic.twitter.com/I86dHlvN5W -Keith Richards (@ officialkeef) March 19, 2017 "rip"
"Peace and the rock of Mr. aichak berry," wrote Ringo Starr



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“At this point, he really believes that her and Brad will get back together.”Do you think that Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston should get back together?”
“Brad was the final straw for Justin.”
““But it was too late.”
“She was basically forced to spend it with her friends.”“While celebrating with her friends, she was an emotional train wreck and she called him while she was with her friends still,” the insider told Radar.”
“He ditched her on her birthday and went to his place in New York.”
“According to the source, “Her intense talks with Brad is what drove him to leave her this week.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"At this point, he really believes that she and Brad will get back together." Do you think Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston should get back together? "
"Brad is Justin's last straw."
"But it's too late."
"She was basically forced to spend time with friends." "She was emotional during the celebration with her friends and called him while she was still with them," the person familiar with the matter told radar
"He abandoned her on her birthday and went to his New York residence."
According to the source, "her tense conversation with Brad was the reason for Brad to leave her this week."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images ) And when the fighting persisted, Jen would seek out her friends for comfort.”
“They'd fight for weeks at a time!"”
“"It didn't take long for their different personalities and relationship expectations to clash.”
“It was a classic case of opposites attracting — she liked game nights in with her celebrity pals whereas he would rather hit the town — and the source revealed that it was soon after they started initially dating that things took a turn for the worse.”
“The source explained that Jen said, "It was never a real marriage to start with."”
“And it wasn't just rough for Jen at the end of their relationship, either — apparently, they were doomed from the get-go.”
“Now, one month later, Life & Style has exclusively learned that he "put her through hell."”
“Soon after Justin Theroux and Jennifer Aniston announced their split, fans were determined to figure out what went wrong.”


"(photo source: Getty Images) when the fighting continues, Jane goes to her friends for comfort."
"They will fight for weeks at a time!"
"It didn't take long for their different personalities and expectations of the relationship to clash."
"It's a typical case of heterosexual attraction - she likes to play games with her celebrity friends, while he prefers to go to the city - and the situation gets worse soon after they start dating," the source said
"The source explained that Zhan said," this has never been a real marriage start. "
"And it wasn't just the end of their relationship for Jane - obviously, they were doomed from the beginning."
Today, a month later, life and fashion exclusive reported on his "let her go to hell"
"Shortly after Justin seru and Jennifer Aniston announced their breakup, fans were determined to find out what was wrong."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel nothing Again toxic and Bieber are practically synonymous for Abel...”
“He begins the song talking about suicidal thoughts and then comes right up to the edge of his breaking point blaming her When no one knows what love is And I know it ain t you for sure You d rather something toxic So I poison myself again again Til...”
“There are moments on this song when you could think its about his previous ex-girlfriend, Bella Hadid, but not after reading that.”
“...your mind You just wasted my time You re on top Oof...”
“As for those rough times he s alluding to he lays it all bare later in the song I said I didn t feel nothing baby but I lied I almost cut a piece of myself for your life Guess I was just another pit stop Til you made up...”
“...see photo above after also snuggling up at Coachella on Instagram...”
“It gets worse I put you on top I claimed you so proud and openly And when times were rough I made sure I held you close to me You ll recall that the Weekend and Selena Gomez made their official public debut as a couple at the Met Gala...”
“But that’s not the line that should raise eyebrows about whom this song is intended for.”
“...broken place You gave me comfort But falling for you was my mistake Selena famously was with Justin Bieber before the Weeknd a broken place indeed...”
“Call Out My Name No other song on the Weeknd s new project is more explicit about his regrets over Selena Gomez he doesn t actually say her name than the ironically titled Call Out My Name He ominously begins We found each other I helped you out of a...”


"I don't feel poisonous any more. Bieber is actually synonymous with Abel..."
"He started singing this song, talking about the idea of suicide, and then came to the verge of collapse, blaming her when no one knows what love is, I know it's not something you're sure you'd rather poison, so I poisoned myself again until..."
"There are times in this song when you think of his ex girlfriend Bella Hadid, but you don't think about it after reading it."
“… Your idea you just wasted my time, your oof on it... "
"As for the hard times he mentioned, he exposed everything in the song. I said I didn't feel it, baby, but I lied. I almost cut a piece of myself for your life. I guess I'm just another pit station until you make up for it..."
“… Cuddle up behind cochella on instagram, see above... "
"What's worse, I put you in the first place. I publicly declare that you are so proud. I must hold you close to me in difficult times. You will remember that I made a public appearance with Selena Gomez as a couple at the metropolitan celebration at the weekend..."
"But the line should not raise doubts about who the song was written for."
“… Broken place you give me comfort, but falling in love with you is my mistake. The famous thing is that Selena is a broken place with Justin Bieber a week ago. It's true... "
"Call out my name no other song in this week's new project more clearly expresses his regret for Selena Gomez. He didn't actually say her name, instead of calling out my name in ironic headlines. He started ominously. We found each other. I helped you out of a..."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The magazine says Kardashian, who goes to prayer sessions with Bieber, has “developed strong feelings” for the singer and thinks “Justin would make a great dad.” For when the reality star will announce her shocking baby news, see what a Kardashian insider leaks to Gossip Cop.”
“Kourtney Kardashian is having a baby with Justin Bieber, reveals OK!.”
“For who the mystery man is, and how serious Garner’s relationship has become, log on to Gossip Cop.”
“The magazine notes the relationship has heated up so much that Garner’s “ready to file for divorce” from Affleck and focus on her new romance.”
“Jennifer Garner is secretly dating a mystery man following her split from Ben Affleck, reports In Touch.”
“For the biggest shocker of Disick’s book, click over to Gossip Cop.”
“The publication says he plans to make millions by penning a “chapter on each member of the family,” dishing on plastic surgery, divorces, drugs, and even “outing family members” who are gay.”
“Scott Disick is writing a tell-all book exposing the Kardashians and Jenners’ secrets, reports Life & Style.”
“...to Gossip Cop...”
“The publication reveals five months after Jolie left Pitt and took their six kids she s desperately missing the life she left behind The magazine notes she now realizes how the actor was an emotionally present hands on dad and partner For how Jolie plans to win Pitt back go...”


The magazine said that Kardashian, who attended the prayer meeting with Bieber, had "strong feelings" for the singer and believed that "Justin will become a great father." Because when the reality star announced her shocking baby news, look at what Kardashian insiders revealed to the gossip police
"Courtney Kardashian is going to have a baby with Justin Bieber, all right!"
"To understand who the mystery man is and how serious Ghana's relationship is, please log in to the gossip police."
The magazine noted that the relationship had heated up and Ghana was "ready to divorce Affleck" and focused on her new relationship
"After breaking up with Ben Affleck, Jennifer Garner secretly dated a mysterious man, according to contact
"To find out the most shocking thing about Disick's book, click on" gossip police "
The magazine said he plans to earn millions of dollars by writing a "chapter on each family member," which includes plastic surgery, divorce, drug abuse and even "outing" gay family members
"Scott Disick is writing an easy to understand book, revealing the secrets of Kardashian and Janice, and reporting on life and style."
“… To the gossip police... "
"The magazine revealed that five months after Julie left Pitt and took their six children with her, she missed the life she had left behind. She now realizes that the actor is an emotional father and partner of Julie's plan to win back Pete, the magazine said. Let's go... "



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“To clarify what I said before: I feel in my soul I’m a feminist.”
“Kim Hiring New Team To Seem More 'Political' Kardashian is ready to revamp her reputation.”
“Kim Kardashian is looking for a more political image, RadarOnline.com can exclusively report.”
““Kim is looking to hire a political publicist, and Kanye is heading up the search,” an insider told Radar.”
“West s wife 36 recently expressed her desire to become more politically active in Harper s Bazaar Arabia saying Sometimes I feel like I want to speak out more about political issues You have to be really careful about what you say because a lot of things can be taken...”
“...in the wrong context and I always want to be respectful I don t want to hurt anyone s feelings I said once before that I m not really a feminist she added...”
““But I feel I do a lot more than people that claim that they’re feminist.”
“I just don’t need labels to make me feel or know what I am inside.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"To clarify what I said before: I feel like a feminist in my soul."
"In order to make Kardashian look more 'political', Kim has hired a new team and is ready to rebuild her reputation."
"Kim Kardashian is looking for a more political image, RadarOnline.com Website "can only report."
"Kim Jong Il is looking for a political propagandist, and Kanye is in charge of that," an insider told radar
"West's 36 year old wife recently expressed her political will to become more active in the Harper market in Arabia. She said," sometimes I think I want to say more about politics. You have to be very careful about what you say, because there are many things you can do... "
"In the wrong context, I always want to respect others, I don't want to hurt anyone's feelings, I said before, I'm not a real feminist, she added..."
"But I feel like I've done a lot more than people who claim to be feminists."
"I just don't need labels to make me feel or know my heart."
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“CNN said that the show saw Kylie “combine self-pity with a lack of self-awareness.”“It makes Kylie look shallow” said Business Insider, while Complex called it “the fakest reality show ever”.”
“The Life Of Kylie only managed to draw in half the viewers that brother Rob Kardashian’s reality series Rob & Chyna managed to on it's debut – and The Sun Online can exclusively reveal that the second episode is being re-cut to make it more exciting.”
“2 In Kylie's show, she agonises over taking the perfect selfie Credit: E!”
“Networks“The show was a disaster – no-one liked it,” says an LA TV source.”
“The whole family is panicking and the rest of the series is now being recut to make it more exciting The ending of the second episode needed more bang like Keeping Up With The Kardashians you need something that viewers want to come back for Everyone s worried that Kylie...”
“...s life isn t exciting enough for viewers who want drama and fighting They want to include more footage of her sister Kim as they think people will tune in to watch then They re also telling Kylie to get out there any promote it says the insider...”
“Fans have dismissed Kylie s reality show about her life in which she admits to being jealous of model sister Kendall and wanting to run away from fame as unrelatable with one saying a lot of pressure to post a selfie oh god and another calling her a superficial idiot...”
“2 Kylie attends a prom in her new show and viewers weren t impressed Credit E”
“NetworksTV reviewers weren’t much kinder.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
CNN said the show saw Kelly "combine self pity with a lack of self-awareness." "It makes Kelly look superficial," business insiders say, and complex calls it "the most hypocritical reality show of all time."
"Kelly's life has only attracted half the audience of Rob & Chyna, the brother rob Kardashian's reality TV series, while Sun online can disclose exclusively that the second episode is being re edited to make it better."
"2. In Kelly's program, she was distressed to get the credit for the perfect selfie: e!"
"Internet" is a disaster - no one likes it, said Los Angeles TV's source
"The whole family is panicking and the next series is being replayed to make it more exciting. The end of the second episode needs to be more sensational, just like keeping up with Kardashian. You need what the audience wants to come back because everyone is worried about Kelly... "
“…… For those who want to watch the drama and fight, Kelly's life is not exciting enough. They want to include more scenes of her sister Kim, because they think people will watch them, and then they tell Kelly to go there for publicity. People familiar with the situation say... "
"Fans have refuted Kelly's reality show. In the show, she admitted that she was jealous of her model sister Kendall and wanted to escape fame. This is irreparable. One said that there was a lot of pressure to release selfie Oh God, the other said that she was a superficial idiot..."
"2 Kelly's going to the ball in the new show, and the audience doesn't remember her very much"
"The commentators on Internet TV are not very friendly."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She also walks the runway in some of the biggest fashion shows, and is currently dating the NBA’s reigning Rookie Of The Year, Ben Simmons.”
“She is currently one of the highest paid super models in the world, and has contracts to endorse many big companies, including Adidas.”
“However, things have drastically changed for the sisters over the years.”
“According to a report by Gossip Cop, rumors have been flying that Kendall and Kylie Jenner are no longer as close as they used to be since Kylie became a mother to her baby girl, Stormi Webster.”
“Sources reportedly claim that since Kylie became a mother, she and Kendall really have nothing in common.”
“Meanwhile, Kendall Jenner is busy “jet-setting around the world and having fun on the dating scene” as she builds up her modeling career.”
“All the while Kylie is said to be “wrapped up” in being Stormi’s mother, as well as focusing her cosmetic company.”
“The alleged sources went on to claim that Kendall and Kylie can be very competitive with each other, which also causes problems.”
“However, the outlet claims that all of the rumors about Kendall and Kylie Jenner’s relationship are not true, citing that Kendall would have become more distant with sister Khloe Kardashian, who also welcomed a baby this year.”
“However, Khloe and Kendall are very close, and have been spotted hanging out together multiple times since Khloe’s return to L.A. in June.”


"She's also on catwalks at some big fashion shows and is currently dating NBA rookie of the year Ben Simmons."
"She is currently one of the highest paid supermodels in the world and has signed endorsement contracts with many big companies, including Adidas."
"Over the years, however, things have changed dramatically for the sisters."
"According to gossip police, since Kelly became the mother of baby girl Tommy Webster, there have been many rumors that Kendall and Kelly Jenner are not as close as they used to be."
"It's reported that since Kelly became a mother, she and Kendall really don't have much in common."
Meanwhile, Kendall Jenner is busy "jet around the world and have fun at the dating scene" as she builds her modeling career
"Kelly has always been considered to be stolmy's mother and focused on her cosmetics company."
"Sources are said to continue to claim that Kendall and Kelly can be very competitive, which also creates problems."
"However, the media claimed that all the rumors about Kendall's relationship with Kelly Jenner were not true because Kendall would become more distant from his sister, Khloe Kardashian, who also had a child this year."
"However, Khloe and Kendall are very close and have been found together many times since Khloe returned to Los Angeles in June."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The Braveheart star plays Wahlberg’s father in the upcoming comedy sequel, but according to Ok!, […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has exclusively learned the truth.”
“Did Mark Wahlberg really tease Mel Gibson about his weight and offer to become his personal trainer while filming Daddy’s Home 2?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Brave heart" stars as wolfberg's father in the upcoming comedy sequel, but according to "OK! , [… ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid newspaper said on Monday, but gossip police was the only one to know the truth."
"Does mark Walberg really make fun of Mel Gibson's weight and propose to be his personal coach for" Dad's house 2 "



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It looks like we'll have to keep our eyes peeled to see whether or not Chyna really is expecting another little one.”
“Congratulations!!"”
“The 29 year old star has been making headlines as she and her much younger boyfriend 18 year old rapper YBN Almighty Jay continue to step out together but according to a new report by MTO News that was further...”
“...confirmed by Page Six on April 30 Chyna is nearly three months pregnant with his baby...”
“Chyna sparked the pregnancy rumors when she and Jay were spotted at LAX on April 28, where fans thought she was sporting a bit of a bump, which she tried to cover up with a baggy sweatshirt.”
“According to the report, Chyna flashed a smile at the paparazzi and even rubbed her stomach.”
“In a recent interview, Jay admitted he wasn't wearing condoms, and that he wouldn't mind if Chyna got pregnant.”
“"I don’t wear condoms," he said.”
“"I would not want to f–k a bitch I did not want to get pregnant.”
“If Chyna got pregnant I would keep that s t like ohh daddy love you I love that ass If the news is true it would be the pair s first child together though Chyna is already a mom of...”


"It seems that we have to open our eyes to see if Zina is really looking forward to another baby."
"Congratulations!"
"The 29 year old star has always been in the headlines because she continues to walk with her much younger boyfriend, 18-year-old rapper YBN all-around Jay, but according to the latest MTO news report, it's a step further..."
“…… On April 30, page 6 confirmed that Gina was pregnant for nearly three months... "
"On April 28, Zina and Jay Chou were found at NASA in Los Angeles. Fans thought she was a little hunched. She tried to cover it up with a loose sweatshirt, which triggered rumors of pregnancy."
"It's reported that Gina smiles at the paparazzi and even rubs her stomach."
"In a recent interview, Jay admitted that he didn't wear a condom, and he wouldn't mind if Gina was pregnant."
"I don't wear condoms," he said
"I don't want to sleep with a bitch I don't want to be pregnant."
"If Zina is pregnant, I'll keep silent as my father loves you. I love your ass. if the news is true, this will be the first child for both of us, even though Zina is already a mother..."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in the same room would be must-see TV.”For more on this and all your favorite celebrity news, pick up the new issue of Life & Style, on stands now!”
““Love them or hate them,” says a source, “putting Caitlyn and O.J.”
““If they doit right,” says the source, “it would be fascinating.”And while the public, might be hesitant to watch such a reunion, the producers are convinced plenty of people will tune in to view the show.”
“...to the new Caitlyn and asks him probing questions about his ups and downs.”
“Though they haven’t approached her yet, producers are hoping to convince Caitlyn to sign on by pitching it as “an informative, interview-type show,” the source says, in which she introducesO.J.”
“Ron Goldman...”
“...should be interested in the show a source says but there s a snag Caitlyn has wanted nothing to do with O J since the NFL star was charged with murdering his ex wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend...”
“O.J.”
“...was best buds with Kris’ first husband, Robert.”
“They also share the Kardashian connection: Long before Caitlyn married into the family, O.J.”


“… Be sure to watch TV in the same room. " To learn more about this and all your favorite celebrity news, pick up the new issue of life and fashion and stand in the stands now
"Love them or hate them," one source said, "take Caitlin and O.J
"If they do it right," the source said, "it will be very attractive." Although the public may be hesitant to watch such a reunion, the producers believe that many people will watch the show
“… Give new Caitlin some exploratory questions about his ups and downs. "
"Although they haven't found her yet, the producers hope to persuade Caitlin to sign up by publicizing it as an" informative talk show, "the source said, introducing so. J
"Ron Goldman..."
“…… Should be interested in the show, a source said, but there's a hurdle. Since the NFL star was charged with murdering his ex-wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friends, Caitlin has never wanted to have anything to do with O.J. "
“O.J.”
“… It's Chris's first husband, Robert's best partner. "
"They also have a Kardashian connection: O.J. long before Caitlin married into a big family."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But most importantly, we want them to be happy.”
“A source explained to Star magazine that Jen and Brad “have been secretly getting together for late-night hookups, and it’s all because of George [Clooney].” So, you can understand why she’s so taken aback by the news!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why she’s ‘crushed’ by the reports!”
“Brad Pitt, 54, may have finally moved on from Angelina Jolie, 42.”
“The Oscar-winning actor has been reportedly spending a lot of time with renowned architect Neri Oxman, and word has it Jennifer Aniston, 49, is NOT happy about it.”
““Jen is crushed after hearing the rumors that Brad has been talking to a beautiful, Angelina Jolie lookalike, MIT professor.”
“Jen had her hopes up of a possible reconciliation with Brad since she and her ex started talking again.”
“When they both became recently single, Jen thought the timing couldn’t be better, and she might have her fairytale, happy ending with Brad after all.”
“Jen never stopped loving him,” a source close to Jen tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“As we previously told you, Jennifer and Brad started speaking following her separation from her husband Justin Theroux, 46.”


"But most of all, we want them to be happy."
A source explained to star magazine that Jennifer and Brad "have been secretly getting together for a late night party, and it's all about George." So you can understand why she was so surprised at the news! "
"We have the exclusive details of why she was" crushed "by the report!"
"Brad Pitt, 54, may have finally moved from Angelina Jolie, 42."
"It's reported that the Oscar winning actress spent a long time with the famous architect nery Oxman. It's said that 49 year old Jennifer Aniston is not satisfied with this."
"Jane was very sad to hear that Brad was talking to a beautiful MIT professor who looked like Angelina Jolie."
"Since she started talking to her ex again, Jane has been hopeful that she and Brad might reconcile."
"When they were all single recently, Jane felt that the time could not be better. She might have a happy ending like a fairy tale with Brad."
"Jane never stopped loving him," a source close to her told Hollywood Life exclusive
"As we said before, Jennifer and Brad started talking after they separated from their 46 year old husband, Justin selux."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(To see more of their cute moments from throughout the years, click here).”
“That August, the couple tied the knot with an intimate ceremony in their L.A. home.”
“The happy couple later showed off their engagement bling on the Daytime Emmys red carpet that same year.”
“...her talk show DeGeneres announced her plans to wed de Rossi the reveal followed the news that the California Supreme Court had struck down a law banning same sex marriage...”
“I felt weak at the knees and I was overwhelmed with how I felt but then it took me about 10 months to get the courage up to actually do anything about it FROM PEN Jada Pinkett Smith Talks Celebrating 20 Years with Will Smith In a 2008 episode of...”
“...t believe it but she turned around and it was like an arrow was shot through my heart...”
“We did talk a little bit and then over those three years we saw each other at parties or at various things but the one time that was the most significant was during a photoshoot actually She continued I just walked over to say hello to her and I couldn...”
““We actually met socially and I just felt that immediate draw,” she said.”
““Happy anniversary @theellenshow and @portiaderossi.”During an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled about falling for DeGeneres.”
“It’s still one of the most fun things I’ve ever done,” Radin wrote.”


"To learn more about their lovely moments over the years, click here."
"That August, the couple had a close wedding at their home in Los Angeles."
"The happy couple later displayed their engagement ring on the red carpet of the Emmy Awards in the daytime of the same year."
“…… Her talk show "DeGeneres" announced her plans to marry De Rossi. After the news that the Supreme Court of California has repealed the law against same-sex marriage was announced.... "
"My knees felt weak, and I was overwhelmed by my own feelings, but it took me about 10 months to get up the nerve and find a real solution from the 2008 episode of" penjada pinkert Smith celebrating 20 years with Will Smith. "
"I can't believe it, but she turned around like an arrow through my heart..."
"We did talk a little bit, and then in those three years, we saw each other at parties or all kinds of things, but the most important one was when taking pictures. In fact, she continued, I just went over to say hello to her, I can't..."
"We actually met on social occasions, and I just felt the direct attraction," she said
"Happy Anniversary @ theEllenShow and @ portiaderossi." In an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled falling in love with DeGeneres
"It's still one of the most interesting things I've ever done," Latin wrote



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty This trip could be one of many as the source claimed that Jen only stayed for about an hour but told the kids what a pleasure it was to meet them and extended an invite to them to come over sometime If that doesn...”
“After what was supposed to be a quick drop off at his place, In Touch Weekly reported that Jennifer Aniston decided to go inside ex-husband Brad Pitt’s house and spend some quality time with his children!”
“Click-through for all the details.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyOver the past year, Jennifer and Brad’s friendship has started to develop again, as she has confided in him about issues like her troubled marriage to Justin Theroux.”
“Source: GettyTheir bond has also strengthened due to a mutual love of decorating, which is why Jennifer stopped by his home in Los Angeles one afternoon to drop off a book on interior design.”
“What she didn’t expect was to spend a fun-filled day with four of his six children he shares with ex Angelina: Zahara, Shiloh and twins Vivienne and Knox.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyBrad’s kids were playing outside when Jen showed up with her book.”
““Taking the situation in stride, Brad casually introduced them to her as they played,” claimed an insider.”
“Then, they all went inside as Brad poured his kids some lemonade and Jennifer and him drank water.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"The article continues with the following advertising source. Getty's trip may be one of them, because the source claimed that Jane only stayed for about an hour, but told the children how happy she was to meet them and invited them to come for a period of time. If it doesn't..."
After what should have been a brief stay at his home, contact Weekly reported that Jennifer Aniston decided to walk into her ex husband Brad Pitt's house and have a good time with his children
"Click here to see all the details."
The article continues with the following advertising source: in the past year, the friendship between Jennifer and Brad began to develop again, because she told Brad about her marriage with Justin selux
"Source: Geithner's relationship has been strengthened by her shared love of decoration, which is why Jennifer came to his home in Los Angeles one afternoon to buy a book on interior design."
"What she didn't expect was that four of the six children he and former Angelina shared had a fun day: Zahara, Shiloh and twins Vivian and Knox."
"The article goes on to the following source of the advertisement: while Getty Brad's children are playing outside, Jane shows up with her book."
"Brad took things easy and introduced them to her as they played," said one person familiar with the situation
"Then, when Brad poured lemonade for the kids and Jennifer drank with him, they all went in."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jamie has assured her this won’t become an issue.”For more on Spears and Federline, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on newsstands now.”
“Literally the best!”
“Britney Spears’ Most Iconic MomentsSince he has custody of their sons Sean Preston, 12, and Jayden James, 11, the rapper, 39, is requesting an increase to his monthly $20,000 in child support “to recognize the sacrifices he’s made,” reveals a source.”
““He could have threatened to cut off access to the kids, but has not.”Spears, who raked in more than $137 million during her Las Vegas residency, doesn’t buy his reasoning.”
““She’s angry Kevin is asking for more money because she pays for everything,” says the insider, noting the divorced duo have a “strained” relationship.”
““Those boys are her world.”
“She is an amazing mother.”Hollywood’s Ugliest DivorcesIt’s a description she’s worked hard to achieve.”
“Following her highly publicized breakdown in 2007, the pop star, now 36, was placed under dad Jamie’s conservatorship and full custody of her kids was handed to Federline.”
“Still, “Kevin has always allowed for very liberal visitation,” says the insider.”
““He has been supportive of her recovery.”Dinner in Hawaii.”


"Jamie assured her it wouldn't be a problem." To learn more about spears and Federline, check out the new issue of American weekly at the newsstand
"It's the best!"
"Britney Spears' most iconic moment was when he had their sons Sean Preston, 12, and Jaden James, 11, a rapper, 39, demanding an increase in his $20000 monthly child support to" acknowledge his sacrifice, "a source revealed
"He could have threatened to cut off contact with the children, but that was not the case." Spears made $137 million while living in Las Vegas, and she didn't believe him
"She was angry that Kevin was asking for more money because she had given everything," the source said, noting that the divorced couple had a "tense" relationship
"Those boys are her world."
"She's a great mother." Hollywood's ugliest divorce. It's a description of what she's trying to achieve
In 2007, the 36 year old pop star got a lot of attention because of her mental breakdown. After that, she was taken over by her father Jamie and custody of her child was handed over to Federline
"Nevertheless," Kevin has always allowed very free visits, "the person said
"He has been supporting her recovery." Dinner in Hawaii



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Do you think an engagement is imminent for Kylie and Travis?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAForbes listed Kylie’s net worth at $900 million and reported she’s on track to be a billionaire by the time she’s 21 thanks to her cosmetics empire.”
“She even told her family that she created Kylie and that she would be nothing without her,” the source told the site.”
““Kim cannot believe that Kylie did in three years what she has not done in her entire life so far.”
“Source: MEGAWhile big sister Kim Kardashian tweeted two different congratulations directed at Kylie, insiders tell Radar she’s less than thrilled about Kylie’s financial success.”
““That’s my sister,” Kourtney Kardashian wrote on her Instagram Story.”
““I am so Proud of my baby Sis @KylieJenner Keep going i Love You,” brother Rob Kardashian tweeted.”
““He feels he hit the jackpot and now isn’t worried if one day his rap career fizzles out.”Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAKylie’s siblings also took to social media to praise their baby sister’s monumental achievement.”
““There’s no doubt in Travis’ mind that he wants to marry Kylie, especially now that he knows she’s a legit billionaire,” the source claimed.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Do you think Kelly and Travis will be engaged soon?"
"The article continues with the following advertising source: megaforbes lists Kelly's net worth at $900 million and reports that she is expected to become a billionaire at the age of 21 due to her cosmetics empire."
"She even told her family that she created Kelly, and without her, she would be worthless," the source told the website
"Kim can't believe Kelly did something in three years that she hasn't done in her life yet."
"Source: Although sister Kim Kardashian tweeted two different congratulations to Kelly, insiders told radar that she was not so excited about Kelly's financial success."
"That's my sister," kurtany Kardashian wrote on instagram
My brother rob Kardashian tweeted, "I'm proud of my baby sister @ Kylie Jenner. Continue to love you."
"He felt that he had won the grand prize, and now he is not worried that one day his rap career will fail." The article continues with the following source: megakylie's brothers and sisters also praised their little sister's great achievements on social media
"There's no doubt that Travis wants to marry Kelly, especially now that he knows she's a legitimate billionaire," the source claimed



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.24731182795698925
Correct number is  46
Total number is  186
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
